AVIATION  CAPACITY  AND  CONGESTION 
CHALLENGES—SUMMER  2005  AND  FUTURE

S.  HRG.  109–373

HEARING

BEFORE THE

SUBCOMMITTEE ON AVIATION

OF THE

COMMITTEE ON COMMERCE, 

SCIENCE, AND TRANSPORTATION 

UNITED STATES SENATE
ONE  HUNDRED  NINTH  CONGRESS

FIRST  SESSION

MAY  26,  2005

Printed  for  the  use  of  the  Committee  on  Commerce,  Science,  and  Transportation

(

27–295 PDF 

WASHINGTON  : 

2006

U.S.  GOVERNMENT  PRINTING  OFFICE

For sale by the Superintendent of Documents, U.S. Government Printing Office

Internet: bookstore.gpo.gov Phone: toll free (866) 512–1800; DC area (202) 512–1800

Fax: (202) 512–2250 Mail: Stop SSOP, Washington, DC 20402–0001

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  14:42 May 04, 2006 Jkt 027295 PO 00000 Frm 00001 Fmt 5011 Sfmt 5011 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\27295.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

SENATE  COMMITTEE  ON  COMMERCE,  SCIENCE,  AND  TRANSPORTATION

ONE  HUNDRED  NINTH  CONGRESS

FIRST  SESSION

TED  STEVENS,  Alaska,  Chairman 

JOHN  MCCAIN,  Arizona 
CONRAD  BURNS,  Montana 
TRENT  LOTT,  Mississippi 
KAY  BAILEY  HUTCHISON,  Texas 
OLYMPIA  J.  SNOWE,  Maine 
GORDON  H.  SMITH,  Oregon 
JOHN  ENSIGN,  Nevada 
GEORGE  ALLEN,  Virginia 
JOHN  E.  SUNUNU,  New  Hampshire 
JIM  DEMINT,  South  Carolina 
DAVID  VITTER,  Louisiana 

DANIEL  K.  INOUYE,  Hawaii,  Co-Chairman 
JOHN  D.  ROCKEFELLER  IV,  West  Virginia 
JOHN  F.  KERRY,  Massachusetts 
BYRON  L.  DORGAN,  North  Dakota 
BARBARA  BOXER,  California 
BILL  NELSON,  Florida 
MARIA  CANTWELL,  Washington 
FRANK  R.  LAUTENBERG,  New  Jersey 
E.  BENJAMIN  NELSON,  Nebraska 
MARK  PRYOR,  Arkansas 

LISA J.  SUTHERLAND,  Republican  Staff  Director 

CHRISTINE DRAGER KURTH,  Republican  Deputy  Staff  Director 

DAVID RUSSELL,  Republican  Chief  Counsel 

MARGARET L.  CUMMISKY,  Democratic  Staff  Director  and  Chief  Counsel 

SAMUEL E.  WHITEHORN,  Democratic  Deputy  Staff  Director  and  General  Counsel 

LILA HARPER HELMS,  Democratic  Policy  Director 

SUBCOMMITTEE  ON  AVIATION 

CONRAD  BURNS,  Montana,  Chairman 

TED  STEVENS,  Alaska 
JOHN  MCCAIN,  Arizona 
TRENT  LOTT,  Mississippi 
KAY  BAILEY  HUTCHISON,  Texas 
OLYMPIA  J.  SNOWE,  Maine 
GORDON  H.  SMITH,  Oregon 
JOHN  ENSIGN,  Nevada 
GEORGE  ALLEN,  Virginia 
JOHN  E.  SUNUNU,  New  Hampshire 
JIM  DEMINT,  South  Carolina 

JOHN  D.  ROCKEFELLER  IV,  West  Virginia, 

Ranking 

DANIEL  K.  INOUYE,  Hawaii 
BYRON  L.  DORGAN,  North  Dakota 
BARBARA  BOXER,  California 
MARIA  CANTWELL,  Washington 
FRANK  R.  LAUTENBERG,  New  Jersey 
BILL  NELSON,  Florida 
E.  BENJAMIN  NELSON,  Nebraska 
MARK  PRYOR,  Arkansas 

(II)

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  14:42 May 04, 2006 Jkt 027295 PO 00000 Frm 00002 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\27295.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

C O N T E N T S 

Hearing held on May 26, 2005 ...............................................................................
Statement of Senator Burns ...................................................................................
Statement of Senator Lott ......................................................................................
Statement of Senator E. Benjamin Nelson ............................................................
Statement of Senator Pryor ....................................................................................
Statement of Senator Stevens ................................................................................

WITNESSES 

Blakey, Hon. Marion C., Administrator, Federal Aviation Administration ........
Prepared statement ..........................................................................................
Dillingham,  Gerald  L.,  Ph.D.,  Director,  Physical  Infrastructure  Issues,
Government Accountability Office ......................................................................
Prepared statement ..........................................................................................
ElSawy,  Amr  A.,  Senior  Vice  President/General  Manager  of  the  Center  for 
Advanced Aviation System Development, MITRE Corporation .......................
Prepared statement ..........................................................................................
Mead, Hon. Kenneth M., Inspector General, Department of Transportation .....
Prepared statement ..........................................................................................

Response  to  written  questions  submitted  by  Hon.  Frank  R.  Lautenberg  to: 
Gerald L. Dillingham, Ph.D. ............................................................................
Hon. Kenneth M. Mead ....................................................................................

APPENDIX 

Page 
1
1
29
29
45
2

2
6

30
32

40
42
10
12

59
59

(III)

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  14:42 May 04, 2006 Jkt 027295 PO 00000 Frm 00003 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\27295.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  14:42 May 04, 2006 Jkt 027295 PO 00000 Frm 00004 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\27295.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

AVIATION  CAPACITY  AND  CONGESTION 

CHALLENGES—SUMMER  2005  AND  FUTURE 

THURSDAY,  MAY  26,  2005

U.S. SENATE, 

SUBCOMMITTEE ON AVIATION, 

COMMITTEE ON COMMERCE, SCIENCE, AND TRANSPORTATION, 

Washington, DC. 

The  Subcommittee  met,  pursuant  to  notice,  at  10  a.m.  in  room 
SR–253,  Russell  Senate  Office  Building,  Hon.  Conrad  Burns,
Chairman of the Subcommittee, presiding. 

OPENING STATEMENT OF HON. CONRAD BURNS,

U.S. SENATOR FROM MONTANA 

Senator  BURNS.  We’ll  call  the  meeting  to  order.  We  have  some 
folks  on  the  way  I’m  told.  I’m  one  of  these  kind  of  guys  who  will 
count them when they show, but we’ve got a little bit of ground to 
cover  today.  We’re  also  conflicted  today  with  marking  up  the  en-
ergy bill. Energy, that’s where I’m supposed to be and here. I’m big 
enough to be two people, but it ain’t working. And also Intelligence 
is  marking  up  and  is  fairly  busy  today.  So  it’s  sort  of  a  busy  day 
here  on  the  Hill.  We’re  trying  to  get  ready  to  go  on  the  Memorial 
Day week break, and everybody kind of wants to go home. 

I  thank  the  panel  for  showing  up  today.  I  appreciate  you  post-
poning  any  plans  that  you  might  have  had  for  traveling  for  this 
Memorial  Day  weekend  to  be  with  us  today.  As  most  of  you  know, 
Memorial  Day  seems  to  be  the  beginning  of  a  busy  summer  travel 
season  for  most  Americans.  We  felt  there  would  be  no  better  time 
to take a look at the upcoming season than today. 

We also need to look beyond this summer and examine our long-
term challenges. It’s important to this Committee that we know the 
imminent  problems  that  face  us  today,  the  long-term  challenges, 
and what technologies and ideas are out there to effectively and ef-
ficiently modernize our system. 

Since  Congress  deregulated  the  airlines  in  the  late  1970s,  flying 
has  become  an  essential  form  of  transportation;  and  between  1980 
and  2000  it  grew  faster  than  any  other  form  of  transportation.  In 
fact,  the  number  of  travelers  more  than  doubled  during  those 
years. 

By  the  year  2000  the  growth  was  starting  to  cause  large-scale 
delays  and  bottlenecks.  In  2001  we  lived  through  the  horrific 
events  of  9/11.  Those  terrorist  attacks  drastically  impacted  the 
aviation  system;  and  for  the  past  4  years,  we’re  back  to  record 
numbers. 

(1)

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  14:42 May 04, 2006 Jkt 027295 PO 00000 Frm 00005 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\27295.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

2

We find ourselves approaching the summer of 2005, and many of 
the  problems  we  were  facing  in  2000  have  returned.  The  problem 
doesn’t stop there though. FAA is forecasting one billion passengers 
in the next decade. 

Most  of  what  we  will  hear  today  is  dependent  on  the  overall 
economy.  We  realize  that,  but  I  think  most  everyone  would  agree 
that there’s going to be a lot of planes in the skies the next couple 
of years. We’re seeing trends toward regional jets, and their use is 
projected to double by the year 2015. 

Additionally,  we  have  exciting  new  markets  for  business.  Micro, 
mini, air taxi and fractional ownership of jets. That market is also 
expected  to  double  in  the  next  decade,  and  we  need  to  be  ready. 
Our  National  Airspace  System  is  complex,  and  it  has  many  dif-
ferent aspects to it. The list of elements that cause congestion and 
delay  numbers  far  too  many  times,  and  there  are  far  too  many  of 
them to name today. 

I  anticipate  and  I  am  hopeful  that  we  will  hear  a  multi-pronged 
approach  to  the  problem.  It’s  extremely  important  we  have  ade-
quate  airport  and  air  traffic  control  infrastructure  in  place  to  han-
dle  today’s  traffic  and  the  traffic  of  tomorrow.  We  need  to  explore 
technology like the ADS-B; and it is important that we continue to 
design, manage and utilize airspace in the most efficient ways pos-
sible. 

Again, I want to thank everybody for coming today, knowing that 
we  have  a  holiday  ahead  of  us;  and  we  appreciate  you  being  here 
and sharing your ideas with this panel, with this Committee. 

We’ve  been  joined  by  the  Chairman  of  the  Full  Committee,  Sen-

ator Stevens of Alaska. 

STATEMENT OF HON. TED STEVENS,

U.S. SENATOR FROM ALASKA 

The  CHAIRMAN.  I’m  delighted  to  be  here  with  you.  I’m  here  to 

hear the witnesses. 

that before. Surprising. 

Senator BURNS. That’s very simple. He’s never handed it off like 

We  have  Director  Blakey,  FAA.  We  look  forward  to  your  state-

ment, and thank you for coming today. 

STATEMENT OF HON. MARION C. BLAKEY, ADMINISTRATOR, 

FEDERAL AVIATION ADMINISTRATION 

Ms.  BLAKEY.  Thank  you  very  much,  Mr.  Chairman  and  Chair-
man Stevens. I’m delighted to have the opportunity to testify before 
you  today  on  what  truly  is  an  important  and  critical  issue  for  us 
these days. 

And Chairman Burns, I have to congratulate you too on the new 
leadership  here.  We  have  been  looking  forward  to  working  very 
closely together. We are heading into the toughest part of the year, 
without  question,  in  terms  of  aviation.  The  delays  and  congestion 
we  worry  about  are  right  in  front  of  us,  and  the  summer  and  con-
vective weather brings it out. 

I think it’s important too for us to step back a minute. Our drive 
and determination have also brought us to the very safest point in 
aviation history. 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  14:42 May 04, 2006 Jkt 027295 PO 00000 Frm 00006 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\27295.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

3

Our record right now is one fatal accident for every seven million 
departures.  It’s  really  remarkable.  And  if  you  look  at  just  in-flight 
accidents,  not  things  that  happen  with  the  baggage  car  on  the 
tarmac, it improves to one fatal accident for every 11 million depar-
tures. So I’m very confident that with the same kind of determina-
tion and drive we can address the congestion and delay challenges 
we have in front of us. 

As  this  Subcommittee  is  very  well  aware  and,  as  Chairman 
Burns  just  outlined,  traffic  is  back.  It’s  good  news  for  the  pas-
sengers  because  as  we  have  low  ticket  prices  and  scheduling  flexi-
bility is good all around. 

Last  year  688  million  passengers  flew.  This  year  we  expect  the 
number  to  go  up  to  around  715  million.  But  with  increased  traffic 
does come delays and congestion. 

Last  year  set  a  record  for  delays,  some  455,000.  I  think  it’s  im-
portant  to  note  that  70  percent  of  those  were  weather  related.  So 
while  we  cannot  control  severe  weather,  I  think  we  can  work  very 
hard to prepare for it; and we are. 

I’m especially proud of our program to reduce vertical separation 
in the domestic airspace. DRVSM, as it’s affectionately known, has 
provided  a  tremendous  boost  since  January  because  it  essentially 
doubles  the  capacity  in  the  high  altitudes,  adding  six  jet  lanes 
above 29,000 feet. This is a huge deal because this procedure essen-
tially  permits  controllers  to  separate  properly  equipped  aircraft  in 
the high altitudes so that they are only a thousand feet apart with-
out diminishing safety. 

In  addition,  obviously,  the  issue  of  fuel  efficiency  is  huge  right 
now;  and  we  estimate  that  at  this  point  with  current  fuel  prices, 
we are talking $5 billion in savings over the next 10 years just for 
those procedures alone. 

We  are  also  using  airspace  redesign  as  one  of  the  ways  to  ad-
dress  the  problem.  We’re  using  an  air  traffic  concept  known  as 
Area  Navigation,  or  RNAV  for  short;  and  while  the  concepts,  I 
think,  are  a  little  difficult  to  envision,  what  it  does  for  aviation  is 
very clear. 

Simply, RNAV is an advance in navigation capability that begins 
to move us away from the ground-based navigational aids to a sys-
tem  that  really  is  much  more  efficient.  It’s  not  the  old  system  of 
Federal  airways  and  jet  routes  that  everyone  knew.  It  gives  us 
much greater predictability and precision for both the pilot and the 
controller. 

Now,  I  want  to  show  you  what  this  means  because  I’m  very  ex-
cited about this, I’ll have to tell you. [refers to a chart.] I think this 
chart  of  Atlanta—these  are  departure  routes  that  we  just  put  in 
place.  Over  there  before  RNAV,  you  can  see  how  it’s  all  split  out; 
and  by  the  way,  you  have  four  departure  fixes.  Not  very  efficient 
for getting them out of a very congested airport. 

Take  a  look  at  this  after  RNAV.  At  this  point  you’re  talking 
about  highly  precise  departure  routes,  six  fixes.  You  get  them  out 
quicker. By the way, it helps from a noise standpoint because these 
are  the  optimal  routes.  It’s  not  all  over  communities  that  don’t 
want it. 

From the standpoint of fuel efficiency, Delta is at this point esti-
mating a $30 million savings on an annual basis out of Atlanta just 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  14:42 May 04, 2006 Jkt 027295 PO 00000 Frm 00007 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\27295.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

4

for  this.  So  it’s  a  very  big  deal,  and  it’s  something  we  are  moving 
with a number of communities to do. 

At this point, I think it’s important to go to the Required Naviga-
tional  Performance.  You  all  have  heard  us  talk  about  RNP  before 
because  it  also  helps  us  boost  efficiency.  This  is  a  marriage  of  on-
board  navigation  technology  and  GPS  satellites.  Because  it  allows 
crews  to  fly  precisely  defined  computer  routes  with  unprecedented 
accuracy; and it’s in places where you can’t get conventional proce-
dures.  I  don’t  have  to  tell  Chairman  Stevens  how  important  RNP 
has  been  in  Alaska.  It  is  a  very  big  deal  for  us;  and  it  is  going  to 
give  us  also  very  big  savings  in  places  like  Kennedy,  LaGuardia. 
We’re hoping we will be able to unveil an RNP procedure out here 
at Reagan before the year’s out. 

As  you’ll  hear  in  a  moment,  the  Inspector  General  recently 
issued  a  report  on  our  efforts  with  airspace  redesign.  The  assess-
ment  I  think  was  fair  and  balanced.  The  report  emphasized  that 
airspace  redesign  is  important  to  enhance  capacity  and  meet  de-
mands for travel, and we agree with this. 

Our  redesign  of  national  airspace  continues  to  be  a  critical  ele-
ment  in  addressing  congestion,  especially  when  you  don’t  have  the 
option  of  putting  in  a  new  runway.  Unfortunately  we  have  a  very 
few tied-up airports where that’s the case. 

Our intensive effort also has been to address choke points. We’ve 
done  that  in  the  busy  northeast  and  Great  Lakes  corridor  where 
we are already establishing new centers and routes. They have in-
creased  the  throughput.  No  question  about  it,  we  think  this  effort 
has saved airlines over $90 million in reduced delays and fuel. 

Now  another  thing  that  has  just  come  up,  which  I’m  hearing 
from  the  airlines;  and  I  thought  this  Committee  would  find  impor-
tant is that the airlines are indicating that they plan this summer 
to  fly  full.  What  this  means  is  that  they  anticipate  full  passenger 
loads; and they will not cancel flights as they did a lot last summer 
because of convective weather. 

They  intend  to  keep  to  the  schedules,  flying  later  and  opting  to 
incur delays if need be to reach the destinations. It’s good news for 
the  passengers  because  it  means  you’re  not  looking  at  cancella-
tions;  but  boy,  I’ll  tell  you,  we  can  be  looking  at  some  real  delays. 
The lack of cancellations will extend the flying day while aircraft 
wait  out  the  storms  before  departing.  It  puts  pressure  on  the  air-
ports and will also require us to put additional staffing in place in 
the  evening  hours  to  accommodate  all  these  later  operations.  Be-
cause  I  think,  as  you  all  know,  the  National  Weather  Service  is 
talking  about  a  very  rough  convective  weather  season  this  year.  I 
hope they’re wrong, but that’s what they’re telling us. 

So  with  this  new  approach  by  the  airlines  this  summer,  we’re 
going to incur greater costs to cover the service that we’re going to 
have  to  cover;  and  it’s  a  cost,  of  course,  that  hasn’t  factored  into 
the FAA’s budget. 

We  are  making  inroads  wherever  possible  to  find  ways  to  in-
crease  capacity.  We  commissioned  a  study  of  300  airports  in  300 
metropolitan  areas,  looking  at  the  socioeconomic  trends,  to  see 
what’s  really  coming  at  us  in  the  future.  This  FACT  study,  as  we 
call  it,  serves  as  an  early  warning,  if  you  will,  of  anticipated  avia-
tion demands. 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  14:42 May 04, 2006 Jkt 027295 PO 00000 Frm 00008 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\27295.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

5

The  year  2020  and  2030  sounds  like  a  long  way  out  there,  but 
it’s  not  when  we’re  talking  about  building  runways.  Our  taskforce 
found  that  the  capacity  investment  in  making  runways  is  money 
well  spent.  If  our  targets  to  boost  capacity  are  not  met,  demand 
will  exceed  capacity  at  27  of  our  major  airports  and  metropolitan 
areas  in  that  timeframe.  That’s  why  pavement  is  one  of  our  major 
areas of focus. 

In  the  last  2  years  we’ve  opened  runways  at  Cleveland,  Denver, 
Miami, Houston, and Orlando. By the end of 2008, we’ll have added 
a  runway  at  Atlanta,  and  an  extension  in  Philadelphia,  both  of 
which  are  on  the  top  ten  list  of  the  airports  with  the  most  delays. 
This is a list that the Inspector General tracks pretty carefully. 

Also  by  the  end  of  2008,  we  will  have  added  runways  in  Min-
neapolis,  Cincinnati,  St.  Louis,  Boston,  Charlotte  and  Seattle.  All 
of  these  projects  represented  investment  of  $4.75  billion.  The  new 
runways’ improvements already in place have added investments to 
our  economy  and  will  accommodate  a  million  more  operations  an-
nually. 

Even  with  all  these  advances,  we  know  that  our  forecasts  show 
ever-increasing  operations  in  the  system.  We  will  have  a  greater 
likelihood that delays will get worse before they get better. This is 
all  the  more  reason  why  I  say  with  emphasis  that  the  financial 
health of the Aviation Trust Fund is essential. 

Under  Secretary  Mineta’s  leadership  we  have  begun  a  dialogue 
of how our services are funded. Our Next Generation Air Transpor-
tation  System,  which  takes  us  through  the  year  2025,  is  crucial  if 
we’re  going  to  be  able  to  handle  the  continued  upward  trajectory 
of  traffic.  We’ve  got  to  have  the  capacity  in  place  to  handle  it,  and 
I don’t think there’s any way to get to the Next Generation System 
and  be  able  to  pay  for  it  unless  we  expect  to  do  that  and  commit 
to it. 

This body has directed the FAA to function more like a business, 
and I’m proud to say we are. We’re controlling our costs; managing 
our resources much more efficiently; labor costs are the single-larg-
est  cost  driver  for  the  agency;  and  with  our  upcoming  labor  nego-
tiations,  I’ve  gone  on  record  to  state  we  cannot  and  will  not  sign 
an agreement we cannot afford. 

We’re  consolidating  services,  such  as  accounting  and  personnel. 
We’ve  just  made  the  largest  A–76  award  in  government  history 
through  a  private/public  competition  over  the  provision  of  auto-
mated flight services. We’re going to save the taxpayer $2.2 billion. 
So  in  closing,  my  message  is  that  in  the  short  term,  specifically 
this  summer,  we’re  going  to  do  everything  we  can  to  get  ready  for 
the traffic and the weather. The big unknown is the long term. We 
know  that  the  FAA  needs  a  stable,  consistent  revenue  stream  in 
place in order to be able to pay for the capacity enhancements we’ll 
need. 

In  the  interim,  you  have  our  firm  commitment  we’re  going  to  be 
diligent  in  using  the  resources  we  have  to  provide  the  world’s 
safest and most efficient aviation system. Thank you. 

[The prepared statement of Ms. Blakey follows:]

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  14:42 May 04, 2006 Jkt 027295 PO 00000 Frm 00009 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\27295.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

PREPARED STATEMENT OF HON. MARION C. BLAKEY, ADMINISTRATOR, FEDERAL 

AVIATION ADMINISTRATION 

6

Good  morning  Chairman  Burns,  Senator  Rockefeller,  and  Members  of  the  Sub-
committee.  Thank  you  for  the  opportunity  to  be  here  this  morning  to  discuss  our 
plans  to  ease  air  traffic  congestion  this  spring  and  summer.  Secretary  Mineta  and 
I  wish  to  offer  our  congratulations  to  you,  Mr.  Chairman,  on  assuming  the  Chair 
of this Subcommittee and to extend our good wishes to the new and returning Mem-
bers of the Subcommittee. But before we discuss capacity and delays, let me address 
safety. As you know, safety is and will always be the FAA’s top priority. Every deci-
sion we make is done with the safety of the flying public in mind. The system must 
be  safe,  as  you  know,  and  we  deliver  a  remarkably  safe  system.  I  am  pleased  to 
note that over the last three years, the commercial airline fatal accident rate is the 
lowest in history. That’s a tribute to the men and women of the FAA and the indus-
try we support. 

The  health  of  our  aviation  system  is  critical  to  our  economy,  and  the  good  news 
is that air travel has rebounded. We now project that overall passenger demand and 
commercial  activity  at  FAA  air  traffic  facilities  will  return  to  pre-9/11  traffic  levels 
by  the  end  of  this  year,  reaching  about  710  million  passengers.  Commercial  oper-
ations  at  17  of  this  country’s  top  35  airports  have  already  exceeded  their  pre  9/11 
levels, with some airports like Salt Lake City and Fort Lauderdale already showing 
very  high  growth,  above  11.5  percent  and  6.6  percent  over  pre  9/11  levels  respec-
tively. 

With  approximately  9  percent  of  our  country’s  Gross  Domestic  Product  tied  to 
aviation,  this  is  a  very  welcome  rebound.  However,  we  need  to  brace  up  because 
with  this  rebound  will  come  delays,  potentially  serious  ones,  as  early  as  this  sum-
mer, and we need to do all we can to avoid them. That’s why today’s hearing is both 
important and timely. 

Certainly  some  aviation  markets  have  fared  better  than  others,  and  new  trends 
have emerged. Low-cost carriers have increased their market share, while the larger 
‘‘legacy  carriers’’  have  been  restructuring  and  downsizing.  Also,  regional  and  com-
muter carriers have been replacing and supplementing flight routes once dominated 
by  legacy  carriers,  as  well  as  introducing  new  services  that  use  longer  range  re-
gional jets. As a result, we are seeing significant growth in the regional carrier mar-
ket, and we expect it will continue to grow. 

Following 9/11, the agency worked with this Committee and industry stakeholders 
to  prepare  for  the  return  of  air  traffic  demand.  We  developed  careful  plans  and 
worked  to  ensure  that  the  agency  was  better  situated  to  avoid  the  delay  problems 
of  past  summers.  We  will  continue  the  successful  innovative  steps  begun  in  recent 
years that have helped to avert a repeat of past delay-riddled summers. To address 
and alleviate congestion and delays over the short term we will work to implement 
new procedures, more pavement, and better technology. 

Our  plan  takes  into  account  the  myriad  of  factors—some  well  beyond  our  con-
trol—that  contribute  to  system  delays,  including  weather,  security,  airline  oper-
ations,  air  traffic  control,  airports,  infrastructure,  and  equipment.  We  are  confident 
that this approach will provide effective inroads to manage the surge in traffic that 
will coincide with the busy summer travel season. 

To emphasize the difficulty some of these factors create for the National Airspace 
System,  you  may  recall  that  last  summer  four  major  hurricanes  made  landfall  in 
the  State  of  Florida,  one  of  the  country’s  primary  tourist  and  travel  destinations, 
in  just  a  six-week  period.  Airports  and  air  traffic  facilities  across  the  state  suffered 
significant  damage,  including  Southwest  Florida  in  Fort  Myers;  Orlando  Inter-
national  in  central  Florida—which  was  hit  by  three  different  hurricanes;  and  the 
FAA’s Pensacola TRACON in the Panhandle. The FAA responded quickly to restore 
capabilities damaged by the storms. For example, the Pensacola TRACON was near-
ly destroyed by Hurricane Ivan. The facility was closed on September 15th because 
of  the  forecasted  winds  and  storm  surge.  Employees  volunteered  to  stay  behind  to 
monitor  the  facility  condition  and  begin  service  restoration  after  the  hurricane 
passed. However, during the height of the storm, the roof of the Pensacola TRACON 
was  partially  torn  off.  Employees  on  site  quickly  unplugged  and  protected  the  sen-
sitive  ATC  equipment  from  the  wind  and  rain,  saving  millions  of  dollars  worth  of 
equipment.  Through  the  dedicated  work  of  our  employees  and  the  cooperation  of 
several agencies, the Pensacola TRACON was reopened for daylight operations only 
within  two  days,  and  to  full  ATC  operations  only  20  days  after  Ivan’s  devastation. 
Additionally,  FAA’s  Airports  Organization  distributed  $25  million  from  the  Emer-
gency  Hurricane  Supplemental  Appropriations  Act  to  85  airports  in  Alabama,  Flor-
ida, Kentucky, Mississippi, North Carolina, Pennsylvania, West Virginia and Puerto 
Rico  in  record  time,  allowing  the  airports  to  make  repairs  and  resume  operations. 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  14:42 May 04, 2006 Jkt 027295 PO 00000 Frm 00010 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\27295.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

7

Many  of  the  new  procedures  we  are  now  using  were  the  result  of  a  first-of-its-
kind  meeting  of  industry  decision  makers  and  the  government,  known  as  ‘‘Growth 
Without  Gridlock,’’  which  we  convened  last  year.  The  group  agreed  to  a  series  of 
new procedures designed to relieve congestion during the heavy summer travel sea-
son. We moved away from the ‘‘first come-first served’’ model of air traffic when de-
mand far exceeds capacity by issuing revised flight plans or rerouting some aircraft 
away  from  problem  areas,  allowing  us  to  maximize  utilization  of  available  airspace 
under adverse conditions. 

The most innovative of these new procedures, a concept we call ‘‘delay triggering,’’ 
imposes  minor  delays  on  the  ground  to  avert  massive  delays  across  the  National 
Airspace System. When delays at an airport are anticipated to reach 90 minutes or 
more,  other  airports  sending  aircraft  into  the  congested  area  will  hold  flights  until 
our  controllers  clear  the  congestion.  Although  this  may  mean  brief  delays  for  some 
flights, it helps prevent the massive delays that can occur system-wide when critical 
airports  become  gridlocked.  This  procedure  has  been  so  successful  that  we  have  in-
corporated  the  philosophy  into  other  areas  of  managing  demand  and  delays.  Most 
recently, we began using this concept in managing departure delays from Fort Lau-
derdale.  The  feedback  from  our  customers  has  been  very  positive,  and  we  will  con-
tinue to apply this procedure during the upcoming convective weather season. 

A  major  accomplishment  this  year  is  our  implementation  of  Domestic  Reduced 
Vertical Separation Minimums or DRVSM. This is a tremendous boost to air traffic 
capacity because it essentially doubles capacity at high altitudes, adding six cruising 
altitudes or jet lanes above 29,000 feet. The procedure permits controllers to reduce 
minimum vertical separation at altitudes between 29,000 and 41,000 feet from 2000 
feet  to  1000  feet  for  aircraft  that  are  equipped  with  dual  altimeter  systems  and 
autopilots.  Not  only  does  this  double  the  capacity  options  for  controllers  and  pilots, 
but the higher altitude routes are more fuel efficient. We estimate the DRVSM will 
save  airlines  approximately  $5  billion  through  2016,  an  estimate  that  will  prove  to 
be conservative if fuel prices remain high. 

Another  major  initiative  is  the  expanding  implementation  of  Area  Navigation 
(RNAV) procedures to additional airports. RNAV procedures have been implemented 
and  are  performing  successfully  at  Las  Vegas,  Philadelphia,  and  Dulles  airports. 
Just last month, 13 RNAV departure procedures went into full operation at Atlanta 
Hartsfield-Jackson  International  Airport—the  world’s  busiest  airport.  These  proce-
dures provide flight path guidance incorporated in taxi procedures, with minimal in-
structions  required  during  departure  by  air  traffic  controllers.  This  significantly  re-
duces  routine  controller-pilot  communications,  allowing  more  time  on  frequency  for 
pilots and controllers to handle other safety-critical flight activities. Key benefits of 
the  RNAV  procedures  include  more  efficient  use  of  airspace,  with  improved  flight 
profiles,  resulting  in  significant  fuel  efficiencies  to  the  airlines.  RNAV  procedures 
are scheduled for implementation at Dallas-Ft. Worth airport this year as well. 

Another  technological  innovation,  known  as  Required  Navigation  Procedure  or 
RNP,  promises  to  add  to  capacity.  RNP  is  on-board  technology  that  allows  pilots  to 
fly  more  direct  point-to-point  routes  reliably  and  accurately.  RNP  gives  pilots  not 
only lateral guidance, but vertical precision as well, and the system is highly precise 
and  accurate.  RNP  reaches  all  domains  of  flight—departure,  en  route,  and  arrival. 
This  not  only  will  allow  more  efficient  airspace  management,  but  also  provide  sav-
ings in fuel costs for the airlines. For example, in January 2005, in partnership with 
Alaska  Airlines,  we  implemented  new  RNP  approach  procedures  at  Palm  Springs 
International Airport, which is located in very mountainous terrain. Under the pre-
vious conventional procedures, planes could not land unless the ceiling was at least 
2,300  feet.  With  the  new  RNP  procedures,  approved  air  carriers  can  now  operate 
to a ceiling of 684 feet, which allows much better access during bad weather. Addi-
tionally, RNP has enabled aircraft to cut significant mileage out of their flight path 
into  Palm  Springs—nearly  30  miles—which  translates  into  substantial  fuel  savings 
for  operators.  The  U.S.  is  leading  the  world  in  RNP,  by  issuing  the  first  set  of  cri-
teria and standards in this area in the very near future. Boeing and Airbus support 
RNP,  and  our  standards  are  being  embraced  in  Europe,  Asia  and  South  America, 
and by our neighbors to the north in Canada. 

In  addition,  we  improved  communication  among  the  system  users  and  the  FAA. 
Airlines  agreed  to  improve  their  input  to  the  FAA’s  flight  schedule  monitor  system 
using new software so that it will more accurately reflect the latest airline schedule 
plans.  This  move  minimizes  unused  airport  capacity  when  flights  are  rescheduled 
or  cancelled.  Also,  airlines  are  encouraged  to  file  flight  plans  earlier,  allowing  for 
more  time  to  address  potential  congestion  problems.  In  addition,  our  relationship 
with the air carriers who participate in our daily conference calls is genuinely coop-
erative,  reflecting  our  common  understanding  that  we  all  have  a  stake  in  the  proc-
ess. The conference calls—scheduled every 2 hours during the busiest portion of the 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  14:42 May 04, 2006 Jkt 027295 PO 00000 Frm 00011 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\27295.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

8

day—also  provide  an  opportunity  for  feedback.  Customers  let  us  know  if  they  be-
lieve  they  were  disadvantaged  by  a  prior  day’s  delay  reduction  measures  or  offer 
ideas  on  how  we  can  all  improve  the  system.  We  all  know  that  continued  coopera-
tion  is  essential  to  the  success  of  our  spring  and  summer  airspace  management 
plans.  Delays  are  bad  for  business,  regardless  of  whether  you  are  a  large,  legacy 
carrier, a low-cost carrier or a regional airline. 

I’d like to take a moment to recognize this Committee’s role in addressing system 
capacity constraints. With the passage of Vision 100—Century of Aviation Reauthor-
ization  Act,  you  provided  the  FAA  and  DOT  with  additional  tools  to  address  unex-
pected  challenges  that  threaten  to  reduce  capacity  or  cause  delay  at  critical 
chokepoints.  We  must  be  ready  to  react  to  situations  when  they  unfold.  For  exam-
ple, the authority provided by Vision 100 enabled us to take initial action last year 
at  Chicago  O’Hare  International  Airport  to  address  over-scheduling  by  air  carriers 
and  the  resultant  excessive  delays  that  affected  the  entire  National  Airspace  Sys-
tem. 

As  you  know,  two  major  carriers,  American  Airlines  and  United  Airlines,  have 
hubs  at  O’Hare.  The  competition  for  market  share  is  compounded  by  the  obvious 
physical  limitation  on  the  number  of  planes  that  can  take  off  and  land  during  any 
time  period.  Moreover,  it  has  been  well  demonstrated  over  the  years  that  delays  at 
O’Hare  have  the  potential  to  cause  delays  at  as  many  as  40  other  airports  nation-
wide. Consequently, managing delays at O’Hare is essential to the effective manage-
ment  of  air  traffic  nationally.  In  November  2003,  major  delays  began  occurring  as 
a result of steady increases in flights, as O’Hare’s slot rules phased out, and a shift 
by  American  Airlines  of  flights  from  St.  Louis  to  O’Hare.  Vision  100  enabled  us  to 
take action. 

Early  last  year,  Secretary  Mineta  and  I  asked  United  and  American  to  make  a 
voluntary 5 percent schedule reduction during peak travel times. This voluntary re-
duction  took  effect  March  4,  2004.  American  and  United  further  agreed  to  reduce 
their overall peak-hour schedules by another 2.5 percent by June 10, 2004. This vol-
untary  agreement  was  extended  through  last  summer,  as  negotiations  between  the 
FAA  and  all  airlines  serving  O’Hare  continued  in  an  effort  to  craft  a  more  com-
prehensive plan to reduce flight delays, and one which treated all air carriers serv-
ing  O’Hare  fairly.  Eventually,  in  August  2004,  a  voluntary  agreement  for  schedule 
reductions  during  peak  hours  was  reached  involving  all  airlines  currently  serving 
O’Hare,  and  which  allowed  some  leeway  for  new  entrant  carriers  as  well.  This 
agreement took effect in November, and in March 2005 was extended through Octo-
ber  29,  2005.  At  the  same  time  we  extended  the  agreement,  we  also  published  a 
Notice  of  Proposed  Rulemaking  (NPRM)  which  proposes  options  to  address  conges-
tion at O’Hare for the next three years. By that time, if approved by FAA, O’Hare’s 
proposed Modernization Project or a reasonable alternative to that project could pro-
vide additional airport capacity. 

Since the voluntary agreement took effect last November, O’Hare’s on-time arrival 
performance has improved by more than 10 percent, and overall delay minutes from 
November through this past February have been cut by 22 percent, as compared to 
the  previous  year.  We  estimate  that  maintaining  limits  on  the  number  of  arrivals 
through April 2008 will result in a reduction in delays at O’Hare, and save airlines 
and  passengers  over  $700  million  lost  through  delays  as  compared  to  November 
2003.  As  noted  above,  the  proposed  rule  is  timed  to  expire  as  airport  capacity  im-
provements are expected to take hold. Under the terms of the NPRM, we will review 
every  six  months  the  level  and  length  of  delays  and  other  operating  conditions,  to 
determine  if  the  airport  can  accommodate  more  arrivals.  If  additional  capacity  be-
comes available while the rule is in effect, we propose a method to assign the addi-
tional capacity to air carriers interested in initiating or expanding service at O’Hare. 
We  partner  with  airports  to  address  capacity  and  delay  concerns  and  we  support 
implementation  of  solutions  with  funding  from  the  Airport  Improvement  Program 
(AIP).  By  the  end  of  2008,  eight  new  runway  projects  are  scheduled  for  commis-
sioning. These include new runways at: Minneapolis-St. Paul; Cincinnati; St. Louis; 
Atlanta;  Boston;  Charlotte;  and  Seattle,  and  a  runway  extension  at  Philadelphia. 
Beyond  2008,  we  are  working  with  other  airports  to  increase  capacity.  We  recently 
announced  our  final  Record  of  Decision  for  Los  Angeles,  which  will  permit  the  air-
field reconfiguration project to go forward. We continue to maintain and monitor the 
schedule  for  the  Environmental  Impact  Statement  at  Chicago  as  well.  We  are  also 
working closely with Fort Lauderdale on a major runway extension, and three major 
metropolitan areas Chicago, Las Vegas, and San Diego who are considering the need 
for  new  airports.  We  are  supporting,  through  AIP  funding,  the  preparation  of  re-
gional studies in the New York Metropolitan area and the LA Basin. 

While new runway construction typically provides the largest increase in capacity, 
there  are  new  technologies  and  procedural  improvements,  such  as  Traffic  Manage-

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  14:42 May 04, 2006 Jkt 027295 PO 00000 Frm 00012 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\27295.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

9

ment  Advisor  (TMA)  and  Precision  Runway  Monitor  (PRM),  which  add  capacity,  as 
well.  TMA  is  a  tool  that  assists  the  air  traffic  controller  to  sequence  and  schedule 
aircraft  to  the  runway  to  maximize  airport  and  terminal  airspace  capacity  without 
compromising  safety.  PRM  approaches  have  been  implemented  at  San  Francisco, 
Philadelphia, Cleveland and Minneapolis-St. Paul, and are planned for Atlanta and 
St. Louis. PRM allows air traffic controllers to run simultaneous operations on close-
ly  spaced  parallel  runways.  It  should  be  noted  that  increases  in  capacity  from  new 
runway  construction  often  cannot  be  fully  realized  unless  implemented  along  with 
new procedures and technology. 

As  with  other  networks  that  experience  peak  period  demand  surges,  congestion 
management,  such  as  congestion  pricing,  could  be  an  option  at  a  small  number  of 
airports where demand may come to exceed capacity in the short term, pending ca-
pacity expansion, or in the long term if capacity expansion is not a practical option. 
In  FY  2004,  the  FAA  completed  a  study  analyzing  system  capacity,  taking  into 
account the socio-economic and demographic trends expected to occur in the United 
States  through  2020.  This  study  expanded  the  focus  of  the  35  OEP  airports  and 
evaluated  nearly  300  commercial  service  airports  nationwide.  This  study  identified 
airports  and  metropolitan  areas  expected  to  have  significant  growth  in  population 
and/or income that could result in an increase in the demand for air transportation 
that  may  not  have  been  previously  anticipated.  The  study  identified  the  airports 
that  need  additional  capacity  and  any  constraints  to  enhancing  capacity.  Without 
capacity  improvements  at  airports  in  these  areas,  this  demand  may  go  unsatisfied. 
In  FY  2005,  the  FAA  will  complete  a  second  phase  of  this  study  that  will  take  a 
more detailed look at the non-OEP airports and will begin to identify possible solu-
tions to increase long-term capacity 

We must also make sure we are using the best technology to maintain a safe and 
efficient air traffic system. One example of this is the Wide Area Augmentation Sys-
tem, known as WAAS. WAAS is a precise navigation system that enhances the sat-
ellite signals from the Global Positioning System (GPS) to provide the accuracy and 
reliability  necessary  for  pilots  to  rely  on  GPS  during  flight.  Because  the  system  is 
satellite-based,  WAAS  procedures  cost  a  lot  less  to  implement  and  maintain  than 
traditional ground-based navigation systems. WAAS makes more airspace usable to 
pilots,  provides  more  direct  en  route  paths,  and  provides  new  precision  approach 
services  to  runway  ends.  The  implementation  of  WAAS  into  the  NAS  will  result  in 
safety  and  capacity  improvements.  Since  WAAS  became  operational  in  July  2003, 
the  FAA  has  developed  3,000  WAAS  approaches.  This  is  a  significant  accomplish-
ment  in  modernizing  how  we  use  our  airspace,  and  one  which  will  have  a  lasting, 
positive effect on capacity. 

In  the  longer  term,  however,  we  know  that  these  short  and  mid-term  efforts  will 
simply  not  be  enough.  The  recent  FAA  aviation  forecast  provides  further  evidence 
that  our  current  system,  already  coming  under  stress  in  some  areas,  will  be 
stretched  to  its  limit  as  future  demands  continue  to  grow.  Passenger  totals  are  ex-
pected  to  exceed  one  billion  by  2015,  and  we  project  up  to  a  tripling  of  passengers, 
operations and cargo by the year 2025. As Secretary Mineta said in a speech before 
the Aero Club in January 2004: ‘‘The changes that are coming are too big, too funda-
mental for incremental adaptations of the infrastructure. We need to modernize and 
transform our air transportation system—starting right now.’’

Our overarching goal in the Next Generation initiative is to develop a system that 
will be flexible enough to accommodate very light jets and large commercial aircraft, 
manned  or  unmanned  air  vehicles,  small  airports  and  large,  business  and  vacation 
travelers  alike,  and  to  handle  up  to  three  times  the  number  of  operations  that  the 
current  system  does  with  no  diminution  in  safety,  security  and  efficiency.  At  the 
same  time,  the  system  would  minimize  the  impact  of  aviation  on  the  environment. 
However,  the  move  to  a  modern,  efficient  and  technology-driven  aviation  system 
is  going  to  require  sustained,  long  term  investments.  The  problem  we  face  is  that 
the  status  of  the  Aviation  Trust  Fund,  which  supports  these  investments,  is  inex-
tricably  tied  to  the  fortunes  of  the  aviation  industry.  Policy  makers  need  to  know 
that  there  is  a  gap  that  exists  between  our  revenue  and  expenses,  and  this  gap  is 
quickly  eroding  the  Trust  Fund.  The  FAA  needs  a  stable  source  of  funding  that  is 
based both on our costs and the services we provide so that we can meet our mission 
in  an  extremely  dynamic  business  environment.  Tying  fees  to  the  cost  of  providing 
service  protects  both  FAA  and  the  customers  who  use  FAA  services  by  not  sub-
jecting our ability to provide a critical level of service to unrelated factors like ticket 
prices.  A  stable,  cost-based  revenue  stream  can  also  ensure  funding  for  long-term 
capital needs. We also believe that a cost-based revenue structure would provide in-
centives  to  our  customers  to  use  resources  efficiently  and  to  the  FAA  to  operate 
more efficiently, as stakeholder involvement can help us ensure that we are concen-
trating on services that the customer wants and is willing to pay for. 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  14:42 May 04, 2006 Jkt 027295 PO 00000 Frm 00013 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\27295.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

10

Mr. Chairman, with a comprehensive plan in place, cooperative initiatives under-
way,  and  thanks  to  the  tools  provided  to  us  by  this  Committee,  we  are  ready  for 
the spring and summer travel season. This completes my statement. I will be happy 
to answer your questions at this time.

Senator  BURNS.  Thank  you  very  much.  The  Honorable  Kenneth 
Mead,  Inspector  General,  United  States  Department  of  Transpor-
tation. 

STATEMENT OF HON. KENNETH M. MEAD, INSPECTOR 

GENERAL, DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION 

Mr.  MEAD.  Thank  you,  Mr.  Chairman,  Chairman  Stevens,  and 
Senator  Nelson.  On  May  18  of  last  year,  this  Committee  had  a 
hearing on the same subject; and it’s timely as we approach the un-
official  start  of  summer  this  weekend.  In  2004  the  number  of  pas-
sengers on planes were nearly 700 million, just short of 2000 levels; 
and  flight  operations  this  past  April  were  4  percent  greater  than 
in  April  of  2000.  One  factor  stimulating  growth  is  the  decline  in 
airfares. 

Last month the average fare on a thousand-mile flight was $118. 
In  2000  the  fare  on  that  same  flight  was  $147.  A  major  exception 
to the rebounding traffic levels is in the area of small communities 
and  cities  with  non-hub  airports  like  Missoula,  Texarkana,  and 
Charleston. Scheduled flights to these airports this coming July are 
down  21  percent  from  July  of  2000.  Congestion-related  delays  are 
also  coming  back.  In  the  first  quarter  of  this  year,  delays  affected 
more  than  one  in  every  four  flights  and  in  some  airports,  one  in 
every three flights. 

Last  year  delays  affected  22  percent  of  all  flights.  Delays  this 
year  are  averaging  about  52  minutes  a  flight,  last  year  it  was  49 
minutes. This summer you can expect delays to get worse. In addi-
tion,  as  Administrator  Blakey  pointed  out,  there’s  the  inevitable, 
but unpredictable, summer storms that can compound delays. 

The  airports  to  watch  this  summer  include  Philadelphia,  Wash-
ington-Dulles,  New  York-Kennedy,  Newark,  Fort  Lauderdale,  New 
York-LaGuardia,  and  Atlanta.  All  these  airports  are  currently  ex-
periencing  delays,  and  traffic  at  most  of  them  is  projected  to  grow 
substantially this summer. 

Now, you’ll note that Chicago-O’Hare was not on my list. O’Hare 
went  from  the  worst  airport  last  year  to  number  14  this  year.  The 
delay  rate  went  from  37  percent  in  2004  to  27  percent  this  year. 
The  improvement  is  at  least,  in  part,  due  to  the  Department’s 
interventions three times this past year. 

Here’s  another  interesting  factoid:  Only  five  of  the  fifteen  most 
delayed  airports  are  among  the  Nation’s  fifteen  busiest  airports. 
And  based  on  the  lessons  we  learned  this  past  Christmas  season 
when one airline’s understaffing, weather problems and traffic vol-
ume nearly tripled traffic in Philadelphia, to say nothing of the lug-
gage  problems,  it’s  imperative  that  FAA,  airports  and  the  airlines 
are ready for what I think is shaping up to be the busiest summer 
travel season in 6 years. 

Several  factors  are  driving  delays.  These  factors  change  a  bit 
from year to year, but here’s what it appears to be for this summer: 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  14:42 May 04, 2006 Jkt 027295 PO 00000 Frm 00014 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\27295.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

11

Low-cost  carrier  growth,  especially  in  markets  that  have  histori-
cally  been  legacy  carrier  strongholds.  This  is  driving  down  fares, 
stimulating demand, and sparking scheduling battles. 

Another factor is legacy carrier hub downsizing. For example, US 
Airways  downsized  its  Pittsburgh  hub  and  shifted  operations  to 
hubs  in  Philly,  Charlotte  and  Fort  Lauderdale.  At  those  airports 
delays increased by more than 60 percent. Another factor, Adminis-
trator  Blakey  pointed  out,  is  traffic  growth  by  smaller  jet  aircraft. 
It is really driving congestion as network carriers continue to shift 
service to regional jets. Benchmark back to 2000 when regional jets 
accounted for about 10 percent of flights. Now it’s about 32 percent. 
Also general aviation jet traffic is growing. Beyond this summer, 
congestion’s  likely  to  grow  as  low-cost  carriers  continue  to  expand. 
We  also  expect  international  cargo  and  international  passenger 
flights to pick up as well. 

More  affordable  microjets.  That’s  a  price  tag  of  $1  million,  com-
pared  to  about  $4  million  for  a  business  jet  today.  They  may  come 
online as early as next spring and will pose challenges to air traffic 
control. This is because microjets are likely to operate in the same 
airspace as the larger jets. 

Since  the  gridlocked  summer  of  2000,  FAA  has  taken  actions  to 
improve the flow of air traffic. These include putting administrative 
controls  in  place  at  O’Hare,  improving  communications  between 
airlines  and  FAA’s  Command  Center,  and  relying  on  new  proce-
dures to better manage effects of bad weather. Also, this past Janu-
ary  FAA  reduced  vertical  separation  for  aircraft  traveling  at  high 
altitudes, in effect, creating more highways in the sky. 

Moreover,  seven  new  runways  have  come  online  since  1999.  So 
without  question,  things  would  be  much  worse  if  these  things  had 
not been done. I’d like to highlight five key actions. I think they’re 
important for both the short and long term. 

First,  keeping  new  runway  projects  on  schedule.  There  are 
projects  in  Minneapolis,  Cincinnati,  St.  Louis,  Atlanta,  Boston, 
Philadelphia,  Charlotte  and  Seattle.  Only  three  of  those  fifteen, 
though,  are  among  the  fifteen  most  congested  airports.  Those  air-
ports are Atlanta, Boston, and Philadelphia. All three are expected 
to  complete  new  runway  projects  within  the  next  two  to  3  years. 
This year, we are facing a key decision point on Chicago O’Hare’s 
Runway  Expansion  and  Modernization  Program.  This  decision 
point focuses on the environmental impact statement. 

A  second  factor  that  I  think  FAA  needs  to  move  on  is  taking 
steps  to  materially  improve  its  management  of  Airspace  Redesign 
projects.  Sometimes  you  can  complete  a  runway  project;  but  if  you 
don’t  make  changes  in  the  airspace,  you’re  not  going  to  yield  the 
benefits  of  the  runway.  And  I  know  Administrator  Blakey  alluded 
to  that.  I  think  they’re  committed  to  making  a  good  number  of 
changes that we recommended there. 

A  third  factor  is  addressing  the  wave  of  controller  retirements. 
Over  the  next  10  years,  three-quarters  of  the  controller  workforce 
is  planning—will  be  eligible  to  retire.  FAA  has  published  a  plan, 
and later this year they need to come out with numbers by facility. 
There’s over 300 of them in the country. 

The  fourth  factor  focuses  on  getting  a  handle  on  exactly  what 
FAA’s new office for developing a Next Generation Air Traffic Sys-

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  14:42 May 04, 2006 Jkt 027295 PO 00000 Frm 00015 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\27295.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

12

tem  can  do  in  5  and  10  year  benchmarks.  The  2025  timeframe  is 
just  not  that  meaningful.  It’s  difficult  for  people  to  relate  to  25 
years  from  now,  and  that  is  why  I  think  we  need  benchmarks  in 
5 and 10 year intervals. 

Also,  the  current  air  traffic  system  was  designed  to  handle  a 
much  lower  level  of  traffic  than  we  have  today.  It’s  largely  based 
on a paradigm of ground based systems and procedures that hasn’t 
changed  appreciably  in  the  last  three  decades.  So  I’m  hoping  that 
this  year  FAA  will  be  able  to  articulate  what  new  capabilities  it 
needs, when they need them, and what the financing requirements 
will be for them. 

Finally,  in  the  short  term  we  are  facing  decision  points  at  two 
airports,  O’Hare  and  LaGuardia.  I  mentioned  the  runway  decision 
for  September,  but  administratively  imposed  flight  caps  are  in 
place now at O’Hare. They’re set to expire this November, and FAA 
is  considering  whether  or  not  to  extend  them  for  another  3  years 
until the runway is built. 

At  LaGuardia  slot  restrictions  imposed  under  the  High  Density 
Rule  are  in  place.  They  are  due  to  expire,  I  believe,  in  January 
2007.  New  construction’s  not  an  option  at  LaGuardia.  FAA  will 
have to do something at LaGuardia. 

Market-based  solutions  may  offer  some  relief,  but  the  devil’s 
going  to  be  in  the  details  if  we  move  to  market-based  solutions. 
Some  of  those  details  will  be  how  to  value  capacity,  how  to  price 
it,  small  community  access,  and  of  course,  who’s  going  to  get  the 
money. That concludes my statement. 

[The prepared statement of Mr. Mead follows:]

PREPARED STATEMENT OF HON. KENNETH M. MEAD, INSPECTOR GENERAL, 

DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION 

Mr. Chairman and Members of the Subcommittee, 
Thank  you  for  inviting  us  to  testify  today.  As  we  venture  into  the  summer 
months—historically  the  peak  air  travel  time—congestion  and  delays  are  on  the 
forefront  of  concern.  In  many  markets,  traffic  and  delays  are  back  at  a  rate  as  se-
vere as 2000, when travel disruptions were at their peak. And in some markets they 
are  worse.  Today  I  want  to  describe  the  scenario—what  we’ve  seen  recently,  and 
where  we’re  likely  to  be  this  summer,  what  is  driving  the  delays,  and  what  FAA 
must do to address congestion in both the short- and long-term. 
Traffic Levels Are Growing as Are the Number, Rate, and Length of Delays 

in Key Markets 

Both enplanements and operations are back to or greater than 2000 levels, when 
air  travel  was  at  its  peak.  Enplanements  in  2004  were  698.7  million,  just  about 
250,000  short  of  2000  enplanements.  Flight  operations  in  April  2005  actually  ex-
ceeded April 2000 operations by 4 percent. 

One  of  the  factors  stimulating  traffic  growth  is  the  continued  decline  in  average 
airfares.  In  April  2000,  the  average  one-way  airfare  on  a  1,000-mile  flight  was 
$147—this  past  April  the  fare  was  down  20  percent  to  $118.  The  one  exception  to 
rebounding traffic levels is in the area of small communities. In cities with non-hub 
airports  like  Missoula,  Montana;  Texarkana,  Arkansas;  Yuma,  Arizona;  and 
Charleston,  West  Virginia,  scheduled  flights  in  July  2005  to  large,  medium,  small, 
and other non-hub airports are down 21 percent and seats are down 12 percent from 
July  2000. 1 Service  levels  remain  depressed  despite  a  doubling  in  recent  years  in 
Essential  Air  Service  funds,  and  a  near  50  percent  increase  in  the  number  of  sub-
sidized cities. 

As traffic has increased, so have delays. In the first quarter of 2005, arrival delays 
were up 17 percent over the first quarter of 2004, and affected more than 25 percent 
of  all  flights.  The  average  length  of  delay  is  also  rising,  with  first  quarter  2005 

1 Includes all domestic and international flights. 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  14:42 May 04, 2006 Jkt 027295 PO 00000 Frm 00016 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\27295.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

13

delays  averaging  52.3  minutes  compared  to  48.5  minutes  in  the  same  period  in 
2000.  During  the  first  quarter  of  2005,  more  than  one-third  of  all  arrivals  were  de-
layed at five airports, including LaGuardia, Philadelphia, and Newark. We note that 
the most delayed airports are not necessarily the busiest airports. In fact, of the 15 
highest-volume  airports  during  the  first  quarter  of  2005,  only  5  are  among  the  top 
15 most delayed airports. 

Overall,  we  expect  the  traffic  and  delay  growth  to  continue,  especially  in  those 
markets  where  we  are  already  experiencing  problems.  Total  operations  are  con-
tinuing  to  increase,  and  summer  storms  are  notorious  for  adding  delays  in  South-
east and Northeast markets like Atlanta and New York which are already suffering 
from capacity-related delays. 
Outlook for This Summer and Beyond: Six Airports to Watch 

Airports  to  watch  this  summer  include  Philadelphia,  LaGuardia,  Newark,  Wash-
ington-Dulles,  Atlanta,  and  Fort  Lauderdale.  All  have  some  or  all  of  the  following 
characteristics:  significant  delays  last  summer,  in  most  cases  exceeding  summer 
2000  delays;  substantial  projected  traffic  growth  this  summer;  or  consistently  ele-
vated  delay  rates  sustained  over  the  past  year  or  longer.  On  a  cautionary  note,  we 
learned  a  hard  lesson  last  December  when  weather  problems  and  traffic  volume  in 
a  handful  of  cities  bumped  up  against  the  pared-down  operations  of  one  network 
carrier.  Many  network  carriers  have  been  trimming  operations  to  lower  costs  and 
improve  their  financial  conditions.  With  traffic  expected  to  grow  this  summer,  the 
airlines—as  well  as  FAA  and  the  airports—need  to  ensure  that  staff  and  resources 
are commensurate with the level of scheduled operations. 

On  a  positive  note,  delays  appear  to  be  improving  at  Chicago-O’Hare,  an  airport 
which  has  been  plagued  by  congestion  for  more  than  30  years,  despite  regulatory 
intervention.  We  expect  the  improvement  to  continue  through  the  summer  months. 
O’Hare  ranked  fourteenth  in  delays  during  the  first  quarter  of  2005  in  contrast  to 
its rank of first in the same period in 2004. The improvement appears to be, at least 
in  part,  a  result  of  the  Department’s  administrative  actions  in  2004  to  cap  hourly 
operations  at  O’Hare  at  a  level  consistent  with  available  capacity.  The  controls  on 
landing slots and schedules have temporarily brought some short-term relief, but in 
the long run, controls do not accommodate demand and can stifle competition. 
Causes  of  Delay  Growth  Include  Significant  Low-Cost  Carrier  Expansion, 
Down-Sizing  of  Network  Carrier  Hubs  and  Subsequent  Transfer  of 
Service  to  Alternative  Hubs,  and  Continued  Growth  in  Regional  Jet
Operations 

Incursion  of  Low-cost  Carriers  into  Legacy  Hubs  Spurs  Traffic  and  Con-
gestion  Growth.  Low-cost  carriers  are  now  challenging  legacy  carriers  in  their 
hubs  in  most  large-  and  medium-sized  markets,  increasing  traffic  and  contributing 
to  delays.  For  example,  the  increasing  presence  of  JetBlue  and  other  low-cost  car-
riers at New York-JFK are causing delays in an airport that has been operating at 
under-capacity  since  traffic  dropped  off  in  late  2000.  During  the  first  quarter  of 
2005,  low-cost  carrier  traffic  increased  more  than  five-fold  while  other  traffic 2 was 
down by 34 percent from the first quarter of 2000. During this same period, delays 
at  JFK  were  34.5  percent  higher  than  during  the  same  period  in  2000  and  rep-
resented  an  increase  of  more  than  52  percent  over  the  first  quarter  of  2004.  Like-
wise, following the start-up of new low-cost carrier Independence Air at Washington-
Dulles,  traffic  levels  there  increased  by  79  percent  and  delays  more  than  doubled. 
New  market  entry  by  low-cost  carriers  can  have  dramatic  effects  on  the  average 
fares in those markets, often stimulating demand and driving additional service fre-
quencies.  For  example,  when  Southwest  began  service  between  Philadelphia  and 
Providence  in  2004,  the  average  one-way  fare  dropped  from  $328  to  $54  and  the 
number  of  passengers  in  the  quarter  following  Southwest’s  market  entry  (third 
quarter 2004) increased from fewer than 10,000 to more than 100,000. 

Displaced  Traffic  from  Down-sized  Legacy  Carrier  Hubs  Contributes  to 
Congestion Growth in Other Hubs. In an effort to reduce costs and improve effi-
ciency,  several  mainline  carriers  have  closed  hub  operations  at  some  airports  and 
transferred operations into remaining hubs. For example, US Airways downsized its 
Pittsburgh hub operations by 3,800 flights in the fourth quarter of 2004 and shifted 
mainline  aircraft  and  operations  to  its  hubs  in  Philadelphia,  Charlotte,  and  Fort 
Lauderdale.  While  delays  in  Pittsburgh  were  down  minimally  in  the  first  quarter 
of  2005  from  the  first  quarter  of  2004,  delays  increased  in  each  of  the  other  three 
hubs by more than 60 percent. 

2Domestic  and  international  operations  by  U.S.  flag  carriers,  international  operations  by  for-

eign flag carriers, and charter service. 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  14:42 May 04, 2006 Jkt 027295 PO 00000 Frm 00017 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\27295.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

14

Increased Regional Jet Operations and Rebounding Jet-powered General 
Aviation  Traffic  Are  Increasing  Demands  on  High-Altitude  Airspace  and 
Airport  Runways.  Network  carriers  continue  to  shift  service  to  regional  jet  air-
craft.  In  July  2000,  scheduled  flights  aboard  regional  jets  accounted  for  10  percent 
of  all  flights.  In  July  2005,  they  will  account  for  32  percent  of  all  flights.  Unlike 
their turbo-prop driven predecessors, regional jets occupy the same airspace and re-
quire access to the same runways as larger jet aircraft. 

While the rest of the industry has shown signs of recovery, general aviation (GA) 
operations as a whole have continued to decline and remain 12.4 percent below 2000 
levels. However, within the GA market, one sector—jet aircraft activity—is improv-
ing.  Flight  hours  logged  by  GA  jets  in  2004  were  up  6.2  percent  over  2000  levels. 
Future  Drivers  of  Congestion  Will  Include  Continued  Low-Cost  Carrier 
and  Expanding

International  Operations, 

Growth, 
Jet-powered General Aviation Traffic 

Increased 

Continued growth of low-cost carrier networks in hubs formerly dominated by leg-

acy carriers will increase demand on airport and air traffic control operations. 

International traffic, which has lagged behind domestic rebounding traffic, is once 
again picking up. In the summer 2005, scheduled international passenger and cargo 
operations are projected to exceed summer 2000 levels by 16 percent and 12 percent, 
respectively. 

One  of  the  new  challenges  that  we  are  likely  to  encounter  within  the  next  year 
is  operations  by  a  new  class  of  aircraft  called  Very  Light  Jets  (VLJs)  or  microjets, 
which  are  scheduled  to  enter  the  market  as  early  as  March  2006.  Priced  as  low  as 
$1 million per aircraft, microjets may be more attractive to the business travel mar-
ket  than  the  currently  available  comparable  aircraft  priced  at  about  $6  million. 
Microjet  manufacturers  anticipate  that  these  twin-engine,  4–6  passenger  jets,  will 
find a niche among a variety of corporate and private owners as well as on-demand 
air  taxi  service.  While  supporters  believe  that  microjets  have  the  potential  to  rede-
fine business travel, others are more conservative about how quickly, where, and to 
what extent the market will materialize. 
FAA  Has  Made  Progress  in  Managing  and  Enhancing  Capacity  but
Additional  Actions  Need  To  Be  Taken  To  Meet  the  Demand  for  Air 
Travel in the Short- and Long-Term 

Since the Summer of 2000, FAA has taken a range of actions that have improved 
the flow of air travel. These include putting administrative controls in place at Chi-
cago O’Hare, improved communications between airlines and FAA’s Command Cen-
ter,  and  procedural  changes  to  help  manage  the  affects  of  bad  weather.  Moreover, 
a  number  of  new  runways  have  come  on-line.  Most  recently  in  January  2005,  FAA 
reduced  vertical  separation  for  aircraft  traveling  at  high  altitudes  (between  29,000 
and 41,000 feet) to enhance the flow of air travel. 

Without question, congestion and delays would be much worse this summer with-
out  these  actions,  particularly  the  administrative  controls  at  Chicago  O’Hare  and 
the commissioning of new runways. However, the anticipated demand for air travel 
highlights the need for additional actions in both the short- and long-term. 

Keeping new runway projects on schedule, including projects at Minneapolis, Cin-
cinnati,  St.  Louis,  Atlanta,  Boston,  Philadelphia,  Charlotte,  and  Seattle  Airports,  is 
important  because  FAA  reports  that  new  runways  provide  the  largest  increases  in 
capacity. We note that of the 15 most congested airports (in terms of percent of op-
erations  delayed  in  the  first  quarter  of  2005),  only  3  airports  (Atlanta,  Boston,  and 
Philadelphia)  are  expected  to  complete  new  runway  projects  within  the  next  2  to  3 
years. 

Getting  FAA’s  airspace  redesign  efforts  on  track  is  critical  to  enhance  capacity. 
Earlier this month, we issued a report on FAA’s airspace redesign efforts and found 
that  cost  and  schedules  for  projects  are  not  reliable,  projects  are  delayed  3  years 
or  more,  and  airspace  redesign  efforts  are  not  effectively  coordinated  among  FAA 
organizations. We made recommendations aimed at strengthening and speeding the 
transition  from  project  planning  to  implementation  by  establishing  cost  and  sched-
ule  controls  for  airspace  projects,  prioritizing  efforts,  and  linking  airspace  projects 
to agency budgets. 

Addressing  the  pending  wave  of  controller  retirements  will  be  a  challenge.  Over 
the  next  10  years,  FAA  estimates  that  approximately  73  percent  of  the  organiza-
tion’s  15,000  controllers  will  become  eligible  to  retire.  This  past  December,  FAA 
issued  the  first  in  a  series  of  reports  outlining  how  the  problem  will  be  addressed. 
While a good first step, the plan does not discuss cost nor hiring and staffing needs 
by location. This information is critical because FAA has over 300 air traffic control 
facilities,  and  many  (like  Chicago  O’Hare)  have  the  potential  to  impact  the  entire 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  14:42 May 04, 2006 Jkt 027295 PO 00000 Frm 00018 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\27295.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

15

National  Airspace  System.  Without  accurate  facility-level  planning,  FAA  runs  the 
risk  of  placing  too  many  or  too  few  controllers  at  key  locations  and  could  waste  a 
one-time  opportunity  to  address  longstanding  concerns  about  controller  staffing  im-
balances.  FAA  must  also  be  cognizant  that  a  much  higher  percentage  of  its  con-
troller workforce will be trainees. FAA will need to continually monitor the training 
results  from  individual  facilities  to  ensure  that  the  significant  increase  in  trainees 
does not adversely impact efficiency or safety. 

Setting expectations for FAA’s new Joint Planning and Development Office is crit-
ical.  This  office  was  mandated  by  Congress  to  develop  a  vision  for  the  next  genera-
tion  air  traffic  management  system  in  the  2025  timeframe.  There  are  a  number  of 
reasons  why  this  effort  is  important,  including  the  forecasted  demand  in  air  travel 
and the factors (i.e., microjets) that may drive increased operations. It is also impor-
tant  because  much  of  FAA’s  current  capital  account  focuses  on  keeping  things  run-
ning (i.e., infrastructure sustainment), not new initiatives. FAA reports that the cur-
rent  air  traffic  control  system  (or  ‘‘business  as  usual’’)  will  not  be  sufficient  to  ac-
commodate  future  growth  in  traffic  or  the  changes  facing  the  aviation  community. 
Key  issues  focus  on  what  new  systems  are  needed  and  how  new  systems,  capabili-
ties,  procedures,  and  changes  in  airspace  management  can  transform  the  way  air 
traffic  services  are  provided.  FAA  needs  to  determine  what  the  new  office  can  do 
in 5- and 10-year intervals and establish corresponding funding requirements. 

In  the  immediate  term,  there  are  two  airports—Chicago-O’Hare  and  New  York-
LaGuardia—where  traffic,  if  unchecked,  is  likely  to  overtax  available  capacity.  Slot 
restrictions were in place in both airports through 2002, when O’Hare’s were lifted. 
At LaGuardia, slot controls were lifted in 2002 and then reinstated when delays be-
came  unmanageable.  At  O’Hare,  the  Administration  has  imposed  administrative 
controls  to  cap  the  number  of  hourly  flights  at  a  level  consistent  with  the  airport’s 
capacity. The Department has a rulemaking underway that would extend these caps 
for 3 years until planned runway projects can add capacity. 

At  LaGuardia,  however,  new  construction  is  not  a  viable  option  because  of  land 
constraints.  At  LaGuardia,  and  potentially  other  airports  where  delays  may  return 
to a crisis level faster than capacity can be added, market-based solutions may offer 
some  temporary,  or  even  permanent,  relief.  Market-based  solutions  such  as  conges-
tion pricing or slot auctions may allocate scarce capacity without distorting the mar-
ket,  but  they  entail  difficult  policy  decisions  such  as  how  to  value  capacity,  what 
the  appropriate  price  is  for  the  respective  users,  who  should  determine  the  price, 
who collects the revenues, and how the revenues should be used. 

Mr.  Chairman,  this  concludes  my  formal  statement.  An  attachment  to  this  state-
ment includes charts, graphs, tables and other data that further illustrate the issues 
I have highlighted today. I would be happy to answer any questions. 
ATTACHMENT 
Traffic  Growth  In  Key  Markets  Is  Driving  Delays  and  Congestion  While 
Smaller  Communities  Continue  To  Experience  Depressed  Service
Levels 

Both  enplanements  and  operations  are  back  to  or  at  even  greater  levels  than 
2000,  when  air  travel  was  at  its  peak.  Enplanements  in  2004  were  698.7  million, 
just about 250,000 short of 2000 enplanements. Flight operations in April 2005 actu-
ally exceeded April 2000 operations by 4 percent.

Traffic  growth  has  led  to  a  resurgence  in  congestion  and  delays.  Systemwide  ar-
rival  delays  in  the  first  quarter  of  2005  were  up  17  percent  over  the  first  quarter 
of  2004,  affecting  more  than  25  percent  of  all  flights.  The  number  and  percentage 
of  delays  in  the  first  quarter  of  2005  were  also  greater  than  the  number  of  delays 
in the first quarter of 2000, generally considered to be the hallmark of poor on-time 
performance.  The  average  length  of  delay  is  also  rising,  with  first  quarter  2005 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  14:42 May 04, 2006 Jkt 027295 PO 00000 Frm 00019 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\27295.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

.

s
p
e
m
6
2
5

delays  averaging  52.3  minutes  compared  to  48.5  minutes  in  the  same  period  in 
2000.

16

The  increased  rate  of  flight  delays  for  the  first  quarter  of  2005  was  concentrated 
in  airports  in  the  Northeast  and  Florida.  We  note  that  the  most  delayed  airports 
are  not  necessarily  the  busiest  airports.  In  fact,  of  the  15  highest-volume  airports 
during the first quarter of 2005, only 5 are among the top 15 most delayed airports. 
The  following  table  identifies  the  Top  15  highest-volume  airports  as  ranked  by 
scheduled arrivals and their delay profiles.

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  14:42 May 04, 2006 Jkt 027295 PO 00000 Frm 00020 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\27295.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

s
p
e

.
1
m
6
2
5

17

Most of the Top 15 Delayed Airports Experienced Traffic Growth, Increased 

Delay Rates, and Longer Average Delays. 

Twelve  of  Fifteen  Airports  Experienced  Traffic  Growth.  Among  the  top  15 
delayed  airports,  as  ranked  by  percent  of  flights  delayed,  12  airports  experienced 
traffic  growth  of  between  1  and  18  percent  over  first  quarter  2004  levels,  with  the 
largest  growth  at  Indianapolis  (+18  percent),  Philadelphia  (+16  percent),  and  Fort 
Lauderdale (+15 percent). Scheduled arrivals were flat at LaGuardia and scheduled 
arrivals at Newark and O’Hare actually declined by 2 percent and 3 percent, respec-
tively.  Both  O’Hare  and  LaGuardia  are  operating  under  administratively-imposed 
traffic caps. 

Fourteen of Fifteen Airports Experienced Growth in Delay Rates. The per-
cent  of  flights  delayed  increased  over  first  quarter  2004  levels  in  all  of  the  top  15 
delayed  airports  except  O’Hare,  most  notably  at  Fort  Lauderdale  (+11.3  percentage 
points),  LaGuardia  (+11.2  percentage  points),  and  Philadelphia  (+9.6  percentage 
points). The percentage of flights delayed at O’Hare actually decreased by nearly 10 
percentage points from this period. 

Fourteen  of  Fifteen  Airports  Experienced  Increased  Average  Lengths  of 
Delay.  In  the  first  quarter  of  2005,  the  average  length  of  delay  increased  over  the 
first  quarter  of  2004  at  14  of  the  15  airports,  with  the  greatest  increases  at  Fort 
Lauderdale  (47  to  57  minutes),  Philadelphia  (50  to  60  minutes),  and  Atlanta  (52  to 
61  minutes).  The  average  length  of  delay  at  O’Hare  was  62  minutes,  which  was 
more than a 2 minute decrease from the average 65 minute delay experienced dur-
ing the first quarter of 2004. 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  14:42 May 04, 2006 Jkt 027295 PO 00000 Frm 00021 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\27295.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

s
p
e

.
2
m
6
2
5

18

The  following  table  identifies  the  15  most  delayed  airports  and  their  net  growth 
in  traffic,  percent  of  flights  delayed,  and  change  in  average  length  of  delays.  Chi-
cago-O’Hare  is  highlighted  because  it  is  the  only  airport  on  the  list  that  improved 
in the first quarter 2005 over the first quarter of 2004.

Of  the  top  15  delayed  airports,  the  only  airport  to  improve  over  the  first  quarter 
of 2004 was O’Hare. For the first quarter 2005, O’Hare ranked fourteenth in percent 
of  delayed  arrivals  (27  percent),  a  sea-change  from  its  ranking  of  first  in  the  same 
period  in  2004,  when  37  percent  of  flights  arrived  late.  This  improvement,  at  least 
in  part,  can  be  attributed  to  the  Administration’s  interventions  with  the  carriers 
serving  O’Hare.  In  2004,  the  Department  intervened  on  three  separate  occasions  to 
negotiate  and/or  impose  schedule  reductions  to  cap  operations  at  a  level  consistent 
with  O’Hare’s  available  capacity.  The  first  intervention  in  March  2004  resulted  in 
a 5 percent reduction in schedules by United and American. The second intervention 
in  June  2004  reduced  schedules  another  2.5  percent.  The  third  and  final  interven-
tion  in  November  2004  capped  scheduled  peak-hour  departures  at  88  combined 
among  all  carriers.  Congestion  in  the  Chicago  area  was  also  mitigated  after  bank-
rupt ATA Airlines reduced operations out of Chicago-Midway Airport by 19 percent. 
Growth in Low-Cost Carriers, Hub Consolidation, and Regional Jet Growth 

Drive Congestion 

Incursion of Low-Cost Carriers into Legacy Hubs Spurs Traffic and Con-
gestion  Growth.  Low  cost  carriers  (LCCs),  which  once  opted  to  operate  at  alter-
native  but  more  affordable  secondary  airports,  are  now  challenging  legacy  carriers 
in  their  hubs  in  most  large  and  medium-sized  markets.  Based  on  July  2005  sched-
uled flights, low-cost carriers will account for 26 percent of all departures, compared 
to  18  percent  in  2000.  The  share  of  service  provided  by  network  carriers  and  their 
regional  affiliates  has  likewise  declined  from  82  percent  in  July  2000  to  74  percent 
in July 2005.

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  14:42 May 04, 2006 Jkt 027295 PO 00000 Frm 00022 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\27295.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

s
p
e

.
3
m
6
2
5

19

The entry of new low-cost carrier service can have dramatic effects on the average 
fares  on  those  markets  as  all  carriers  are  pressured  to  reduce  fares  to  levels  com-
petitive with the new low-cost service. 

Significant  fare  reductions  often  stimulate  demand,  driving  additional  service  of-
ferings.  For  example,  when  Southwest  began  service  between  Philadelphia  (PHL) 
and  Raleigh-Durham  (RDU),  the  average  one-way  fare  dropped  from  $213  to  $61, 
spurring passenger growth of 263 percent in the third quarter of 2004 over the third 
quarter of 2003. 

Similar  effects  occurred  when  Southwest  initiated  service  from  Philadelphia  to 
Providence (PVD), AirTran began service to Newport News (PHF) and Akron (CAK) 
from  Boston  (BOS),  Independence  Air  began  service  to  Raleigh  Durham  and  Port-
land,  Maine  (PWM)  from  Washington  (WAS-Dulles),  and  JetBlue  began  service  to 
Oakland (OAK) and Long Beach (LGB) from Boston.

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  14:42 May 04, 2006 Jkt 027295 PO 00000 Frm 00023 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\27295.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

s
p
e

.
4
m
6
2
5

20

Systemwide,  the  effects  of  low-cost  carriers  are  taking  their  toll  on  average  air-
fares.  In  April  2005,  the  average  fare  for  a  1000-mile  trip 3 was  $118,  a  drop  of  20 
percent from the $147 average fare for a 1,000-mile trip in April 2000. 

3 For eight major U.S. Airlines, as reported to the Air Transport Association.

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  14:42 May 04, 2006 Jkt 027295 PO 00000 Frm 00024 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\27295.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

s
p
e

.
5
m
6
2
5

21

The  new  low-cost  carrier  operations,  coupled  with  competitive  responses  from  ex-
isting  service  providers  can  significantly  tax  runways  and  airspace  at  airports  that 
may  be  already  congested.  Examples  of  the  impact  of  low-cost  carrier  entry  on  con-
gestion  include  Independence  Air’s  operation  out  of  Washington-Dulles  and 
JetBlue’s growing operation at New York- JFK. 

In 2004, Independence Air (formerly Atlantic Coast Airlines) launched a new low-
cost  service  with  its  hub  operation  at  Dulles  Airport.  United,  the  incumbent  legacy 
carrier, matched Independence Air on fares, further stimulating growth in the mar-
kets served by both carriers. As a result, flights increased 79 percent in March 2005 
over March 2004 levels. In the same period, the number of delayed flights increased 
by 7,700 or more than 100 percent. 

Growth  at  New  York- JFK  is  almost  entirely  attributable  to  growth  in  low-cost 
carrier service, led predominantly by JetBlue. In the first quarter of 2005, total JFK 
traffic  was  down  11  percent  from  the  highs  of  the  first  quarter  of  2000,  largely  as 
a result in lagging International traffic. However during this period, low-cost carrier 
traffic  increased  more  than  five-fold  while  other  traffic 4 was  still  down  by  34  per-
cent. Delays as well have increased as traffic has grown. In the first quarter of 2005, 
the number of delayed arrivals was 35 percent higher than the same period in 2000 
and represented a more than 52 percent increase over the first quarter of 2004. 

4 Domestic  and  international  operations  by  U.S.  flag  carriers,  international  operations  by  for-

eign flag carriers, and charter service.

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  14:42 May 04, 2006 Jkt 027295 PO 00000 Frm 00025 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\27295.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

s
p
e
.

7
m
6
2
5

s
p
e

.
6
m
6
2
5

22

Displaced  Traffic  from  Down-sized  Legacy  Carrier  Hubs  Contribute  to 
Congestion Growth in Other Hubs. In an effort to reduce costs and improve effi-
ciency, several mainline carriers have closed hubs and transferred operations to re-
maining hubs. For example, Delta Airlines eliminated 7,500 flights from its hub op-
erations  in  Dallas/Fort  Worth  Airport  (DFW)  during  the  first  quarter  of  2005  and 
shifted its DFW-based mainline and regional affiliate aircraft to Atlanta, Cincinnati, 
and Salt Lake City. Other carriers backfilled some of the vacated slots, but the net 
impact was a 17 percent decrease in total scheduled operations at DFW. 

On  the  flip  side,  however,  operations  in  Atlanta,  Cincinnati,  and  Salt  Lake  City 
in  March  2005  were  7  percent,  5  percent,  and  22  percent  greater  than  operations 
in March 2004, respectively. Delays in the first quarter at these airports showed ef-
fects  of  these  shifts,  with  delays  down  14.4  percent  at  DFW  from  the  first  quarter 
of  2004  and  up  in  Atlanta,  Cincinnati,  and  Salt  Lake  City  7.9  percent,  13  percent, 
and 3.4 percent, respectively. 

In  a  similar  pattern,  US  Airways  cut  its  Pittsburgh  hub  operations  by  3,800 
flights  during  the  fourth  quarter  of  2004,  shifting  mainline  aircraft  and  service  to 
Philadelphia,  Charlotte,  and  Fort  Lauderdale.  Overall  traffic  in  Philadelphia  in-
creased  by  29  percent,  and  was  up  20  percent  in  Charlotte  and  23  percent  in  Fort 
Lauderdale. Compared to the 402 daily Philadelphia departures scheduled on a typ-
ical  day  last  summer,  US  Airways  is  now  scheduling  495  daily  flights,  an  increase 
of  23  percent.  While  delays  in  Pittsburgh  were  down  minimally  in  the  first  quarter 
of  2005  over  the  first  quarter  of  2004,  they  were  up  62.4  percent  in  Philadelphia, 
65.2 percent in Charlotte, and 63.7 percent in Fort Lauderdale. 

Increased Regional Jet Operations and Rebounding Jet-powered General 
Aviation  Traffic  Are  Increasing  Demands  on  High-Altitude  Airspace  and 
Airport  Runways.  The  shift  from  turboprop  or  piston  aircraft  to  jet  aircraft  (re-
gional jets, jet-powered general aviation aircraft, and microjets) are posing new chal-
lenges to airports and air traffic control. The shift essentially pushes the former low-
altitude  turboprop  traffic  up  to  the  35,000  to  40,000+  foot  airspace—the  same  alti-
tudes where larger jet aircraft fly—and thus crowding the high-altitude airspace. In 
addition,  regional  jets  and  jet-powered  general  aviation  aircraft  have  the  same  air-
field requirements, utilizing the same runways as larger jets. In some congested air-
ports,  such  as  Newark,  the  runways  that  once  accommodated  propeller-driven  re-
gional  aircraft  are  underutilized,  while  delays  mount  as  jet-powered  general  avia-
tion,  regional  jets,  and  large  aircraft  vie  for  landing  slots  on  the  longer  runways. 
Regional  Jets  Now  Represent  Nearly  One-third  of  All  Scheduled  Flights. 
The  airlines  are  continuing  to  shift  service  to  jet  aircraft.  In  July  2000,  scheduled 
flights  aboard  jets  accounted  for  66  percent  of  all  flights  offered.  In  July  2005, 
scheduled flights aboard jets will account for 81 percent of all offered flights. In con-
trast, scheduled turboprop flights decreased from 28 percent in July 2000 to 14 per-
cent  in  July  2005.  The  growth  in  jet  traffic  reflects,  in  large  part,  significantly  in-
creased reliance on regional jets. In July 2000, scheduled flights aboard regional jets 
accounted for 10 percent of all offered flights. In July 2005, scheduled flights aboard 
regional jets will account for 32 percent of flights.

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  14:42 May 04, 2006 Jkt 027295 PO 00000 Frm 00026 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\27295.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

23

General  Aviation  Jet-powered  Aircraft  Activity  Is  on  the  Rebound.  While 
the  rest  of  the  industry  has  shown  signs  of  recovery,  general  aviation  (GA)  has  not 
improved since a steep drop-off after September 11th. In fact, GA operations at com-
bined FAA and contracted towers declined 1.6 percent in 2004 and remain 12.4 per-
cent below 2000 levels. However, within the GA market, one sector—jet aircraft ac-
tivity—is  showing  signs  of  improvement.  The  number  of  GA  jets  filing  instrument 
flight  rule  flight  plans  (generally  not  filed  by  locally  operating  recreational  pilots) 
and  the  number  of  flight  hours  were  up  1.6  percent  and  6.2  percent,  respectively, 
during 2004. 

And it appears the trend will continue. The General Aviation Manufacturers Asso-
ciation  (GAMA)  reports  that  shipments  of  business  jet  units  were  up  26  percent  in 
the  first  quarter  of  2005  compared  to  the  first  quarter  of  2004.  FAA  forecasts  the 
number  of  general  aviation  hours  flown  by  jet  aircraft  to  expand  at  an  average  an-
nual  rate  of  6.7  percent  over  the  next  12  years.  The  large  increase  in  jet  hours  is 
largely  due  to  expected  increases  in  the  fractional  ownership  fleet  and  its  activity 
levels. The growth of this traffic sector is a concern to the FAA because GA jets fly 
at  the  same  altitudes,  occupy  the  same  airspace,  and  could  potentially  require  use 
of the same runways as large commercial jets. 

Microjets Have Potential To Further Crowd Dense Airspace.  Beginning  as 
early as March 2006, microjets or VLJs (Very Light Jets) are scheduled to enter the 
market  priced  between  $1  million  and  $3  million  per  aircraft. 5 Manufacturers  an-
ticipate that these twin-engine jets carrying four to six passengers will be attractive 
to  a  variety  of  owners  and  operators.  For  example,  Florida-based  DayJet  has  or-
dered 239 Eclipse 500 microjets and plans to use them to operate what it calls ‘‘Per-
Seat, On-Demand’’ jet services. The company plans to provide point-to-point service 
to and from small community airports, including markets that have limited, if any, 
scheduled airline services. The Eclipse 500TM and several other VLJ models are un-
dergoing  testing  this  spring,  and  manufacturers  have  announced  that  customer  de-
liveries will begin in 2006, pending FAA certification. 

Beyond  the  air  taxi  business  model,  manufacturers  of  VLJs  also  see  a  market  in 
private ownership, corporate business jet fleets, and logistics (on-demand air cargo—
when  ‘‘overnight’’  is  not  fast  enough).  While  supporters  believe  that  the  microjets 
have  the  potential  to  redefine  business  travel,  others  are  more  conservative  about 
how quickly and to what extent the market will materialize. FAA’s forecast assumes 
that  the  VLJs  begin  to  enter  the  fleet  in  2006  (100  aircraft)  and  grow  by  between 
400  to  500  aircraft  a  year  thereafter,  reaching  a  total  of  4,500  aircraft  by  2016. 
However,  some  industry  estimates  suggest  that  the  market  could  reach  5,000  air-
craft by as early as 2010, although it is not clear to what extent this represents do-
mestically deployed aircraft.

5 Compared to comparable aircraft currently priced at around $6 million. 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  14:42 May 04, 2006 Jkt 027295 PO 00000 Frm 00027 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\27295.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

s
p
e

.
8
m
6
2
5

24

Short-term Outlook Is for Trouble Spots This Summer 

The  summer  travel  season  is  historically  the  busiest  travel  time  for  the  airlines. 
Schedules increase to accommodate increased demand and traffic volume increases, 
elevating  the  potential  for  an  increased  number  of  delays.  Extreme  weather  condi-
tions  often  add  an  additional  layer  of  difficulty  in  meeting  on-time  performance 
goals. The following table identifies the 13 airports with summer 2004 arrival delays 
of greater than 25 percent. The airports with an asterisk, (Washington-Dulles, New 
York- JFK,  and  Fort  Lauderdale)  are  those  airports  whose  absolute  delays  in  the 
summer of 2004 exceed the number during the summer of 2000 (considered the peak 
in  aviation  delays),  and  are  projecting  scheduled  operations  growth  of  greater  than 
10 percent for the summer of 2005. 

In  addition  to  Washington-Dulles,  New  York-JFK,  and  Fort  Lauderdale,  three 
other  airports  are  likely  to  experience  significant  disruptions  this  summer.  Delays 
in Philadelphia last summer affected more than 29 percent of all flights and sched-
uled departures this summer are 18 percent higher than the summer of 2004. New-
ark and Atlanta bear watching as both have sustained consistently high delays since 
the  summer  of  2000  and  are  likely  to  experience  similar  delay  levels  this  summer.

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  14:42 May 04, 2006 Jkt 027295 PO 00000 Frm 00028 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\27295.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

s
p
e
.

0
1
m
6
2
5

s
p
e

.
9
m
6
2
5

25

Long-Term Outlook Calls For Continued Growth 

International Traffic Is on the Rebound. International traffic is forecast to ex-
ceed  pre-September  11th  levels  this  year,  with  approximately  145  million  pas-
sengers  traveling  to  and  from  the  United  States;  an  increase  of  11  million  pas-
sengers  since  2004.  In  the  summer  2005,  scheduled  international  passenger  and 
cargo  operations  are  projected  to  exceed  summer  2000  levels  by  16  percent  and  12 
percent, respectively. According to the FAA, the move toward deregulation overseas, 
privatization  of  national  carriers,  and  expansion  of  open-skies  agreements  could  re-
sult  in  significantly  greater  international  traffic  growth.  This  month  the  United 
States  signed  a  bilateral  open-skies  agreement  with  the  Maldives  which  follows 
agreements recently signed by India, Sri Lanka, Paraguay, and Pakistan. 

General Aviation Will Continue To Grow. The Department will need to close-
ly  monitor  the  growth  and  utilization  of  VLJs,  which  will  expand  jet  traffic  in  air-
space  above  38,000  feet  and  increase  the  demand  for  air  traffic  services  for  jet  air-
craft. Depending on how and where VLJ traffic materializes—much of which is un-
known  at  this  point—the  impact  on  safety,  staffing  needs,  airspace,  and  infrastruc-
ture  could  be  significant.  In  addition,  VLJs  could  raise  complex  policy  issues  in 
areas such as landing rights, airport congestion, and security. 
Despite  Growth  in  Traffic  and  Congestion  at  Large  and  Medium-Sized 
Hubs, Small and Non-hub Airports Still Lag Their Larger Counterparts 
in Service Recovery Since 2000

Service  this  summer  connecting  the  smallest  airports—otherwise  known  as  non-
hub  airports—to  large,  medium,  and  small  hub  airports  will  remain  significantly 
below service scheduled during the summer of 2000. Non-hub airports include those 
in cities like Key West, Florida; Missoula, Montana; Roanoke, Virginia; Lincoln, Ne-
braska;  Charleston,  West  Virginia;  and  Redmond,  Oregon.  Access  to  large  hub  air-
ports  (like  Phoenix,  Honolulu,  and  Newark)  from  non-hub  airports  is  down  16  per-
cent from July 2000 levels. Scheduled flights to medium-sized hub airports (like San 
Antonio,  San  Jose,  and  Manchester)  are  down  26  percent  from  July  2000  levels. 
Scheduled  flights  to  small-hub  airports  (like  Spokane,  Washington;  El  Paso,  Texas; 
and Portland, Maine) are down 32 percent. Finally, flights between non-hub airports 
(e.g.  Helena-Great  Falls,  Montana;  Juneau-Ketchikan,  Alaska;  and  Ithaca-Elmira 
(New York) are down 24 percent. 

Service  levels  remain  depressed  despite  funding  increases  in  the  Essential  Air 
Service  (EAS)  program.  Annual  funding  between  FY  2002  and  FY  2005  has  aver-
aged  about  $100  million,  or  twice  the  level  of  subsidy  available  in  2000  and  2001. 
The  number  of  cities  with  EAS  subsidies  has  increased  also,  growing  from  106  in 
2000 to 151 in 2005.

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  14:42 May 04, 2006 Jkt 027295 PO 00000 Frm 00029 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\27295.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

s
p
e
.
1
1
m
6
2
5

The  Department  Faces  Short-  and  Long-term  Challenges  in  Addressing 

Congestion and Delays 

26

Since the Summer of 2000, FAA has taken a number of actions in managing and 
enhancing  capacity.  These  include  putting  administrative  controls  in  place  at  Chi-
cago O’Hare, improved communications between airlines and FAA’s Command Cen-
ter,  and  procedural  changes  to  help  manage  the  impact  of  bad  weather  (including 
greater  use  of  joint  civilian/military  airspace  on  the  East  Coast).  FAA  has  also  es-
tablished a new office to develop a vision for the next generation air traffic manage-
ment  system.  Most  recently  in  January  2005,  FAA  reduced  vertical  separation  for 
aircraft traveling at high altitudes which provided for six new flight levels between 
29,000  and  41,000  feet.  In  addition,  a  number  of  new  runways  have  come  on-line. 
Without  question,  congestion  and  delays  would  be  much  worse  without  these  ac-
tions,  particularly  the  administrative  controls  at  Chicago  O’Hare  and  the  commis-
sioning of new runways. However, the anticipated demand for air travel and the fac-
tors  we  discussed  earlier  highlight  the  need  for  additional  actions.  We  see  several 
areas that require attention in the short- and long- term:

capacity,

• Keeping new runway projects on schedule,
• Getting  FAA’s  airspace  redesign  efforts  on  track,  which  is  critical  to  enhance 
• Determining what FAA’s new Joint Planning and Development Office can do in 
5-  and  10-year  intervals  and  establishing  corresponding  funding  requirements, 
and
• Continuing  to  explore  market-based  and  administrative  solutions  where  alter-
natives  for  providing  new  capacity  are  limited  in  the  immediate  term,  for  Chi-
cago O’Hare and LaGuardia airports.

Keeping New Runway Projects on Schedule 

FAA reports show that new runways provide the most significant increases in ca-
pacity  but  these  increases  vary  by  location.  New  runways  have  been  built  at  the 
Phoenix,  Detroit,  Miami,  Denver,  Houston,  Orlando,  and  Cleveland  airports.  With-
out a doubt, congestion would be much worse this summer without the new capacity 
in the system. 

Between  2005  and  2008,  eight  additional  new  runway  projects  (7  new  runways 
and  a  major  extension  of  an  existing  runway)  are  expected  to  be  completed.  FAA 
will  need  to  make  sure,  among  other  things,  that  new  procedures  and  navigation 
equipment  are  in  place  when  new  projects  are  commissioned.  We  note  that  of  the 
15  most  congested  airports  (in  terms  of  percent  of  operations  delayed  in  the  first 
quarter of 2005) only 3 airports (Atlanta, Boston, and Philadelphia) are expected to 
complete new runway projects within the next 2 to 3 years. The following table pro-
vides  information  on  the  eight  runway  projects  FAA  is  monitoring  as  part  of  its 
Operational Evolution Plan (OEP), the agency’s blueprint for enhancing capacity.

Status of Major New Runway Projects—May 2005

Airport 

Minneapolis 
Cincinnati 
St. Louis 
Atlanta 
Boston 
Philadelphia 

Charlotte 
Seattle 

Initial OEP 
(June 2001) 
Estimated 
Completion 

Date 

Current
Estimated 
Completion 

Date 

Dec. 2003
Dec. 2005
May 2006
May 2005
Dec. 2005
Not in initial 

OEP 

June 2004
Nov. 2006

Oct. 2005
Dec. 2005
Apr. 2006
May 2006
Nov. 2006
Dec. 2007

Feb. 2008
Nov. 2008

Phase 

Construction 
Construction 
Construction 
Construction 
Construction 
Design 

Design 
Construction 

Cost

Estimate 
as of Oct 

2001

(Millions) 

Current 

Cost

Estimate 
(Millions) 

$563
$233
$1,100
$1,200
$95
n/a 

$187
$773

$682
$255
$1,043
$1,200
$118
$40

$201
$1,129

Note: The Philadelphia project is a runway extension 
Source: FAA and Airport Sponsors 
There are about 10 other new runway projects in various planning stages, includ-
ing major efforts at Chicago O’Hare, Los Angeles, and Washington-Dulles. However, 
FAA  does  not  yet  have  firm  completion  dates  for  them  and  therefore  has  not  yet 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  14:42 May 04, 2006 Jkt 027295 PO 00000 Frm 00030 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\27295.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

27

included them in the OEP. 6 We will issue a report shortly on plans to revamp Chi-
cago O’Hare, which represents the largest and most costly reconfiguration of an ex-
isting airport in the United States. 

While  adding  new  capacity  (via  new  pavement)  may  ultimately  be  the  most  com-
prehensive  solution,  it  is  not  always  a  feasible  one.  For  example,  at  congested  New 
York-LaGuardia,  where  slot  controls  are  slated  to  expire  in  2007,  land  constraints 
preclude new construction. This is why FAA and some airports are looking into mar-
ket-based  or  administrative  solutions  to  manage  congestion  and  delays.  However,  a 
number of policy questions need to be resolved with such approaches. 
Getting  FAA’s  Airspace  Redesign  Efforts  on  Track  Is  Critical  to  Enhance 

Capacity 

Airspace  redesign  efforts  are  critical  in  getting  the  most  benefits  (in  terms  of  ca-
pacity  and  delay  reduction)  from  new  runways.  FAA’s  OEP  indicates  that  40  to  60 
percent  of  projected  capacity  improvements  from  new  concrete  will  be  lost  without 
corresponding  changes  in  airspace.  In  some  cases,  airspace  redesign  plays  an  even 
greater role. 

For  example,  very  few  of  the  benefits  of  the  Chicago  O’Hare  Modernization  Pro-
gram (the addition of one new runway, the extension of two runways, and the relo-
cation of three others) will be realized without significant airspace changes. For the 
first  stage  of  the  O’Hare  Modernization  Program  expected  to  be  complete  in  2007 
(the  new  north  runway  only),  a  combination  of  airfield  and  airspace  changes  pro-
vides for more than a 50 percent reduction in the average minutes of projected delay 
per  flight,  from  19.6  to  9.6  minutes.  FAA  and  Mitre  analyses  show  the  new  north 
runway,  without  corresponding  airspace  changes,  will  have  little  impact  on  delays. 
On  the  other  hand,  the  Choke  Point  initiative  (following  the  summer  of  2000) 
demonstrated  that  airspace  changes  can  also  have  important  benefits  even  without 
new  runway  construction.  FAA  reports  that  the  Choke  Point  initiative  reduced 
delays  and  resulted  in  an  annual  savings  to  airspace  users  of  $70  million.  The 
Choke Point initiative was successful because it was placed on a fast track, had sig-
nificant  management  oversight,  and  linked  plans  and  resources—all  of  which  are 
best practices that need to be transferred to all airspace projects. 

We recently issued a report on the importance of FAA’s airspace redesign projects 
in enhancing capacity and the range of actions the agency needs to take to get these 
efforts  on  track. 7 We  reviewed  the  42  approved  airspace  redesign  projects  in  FY 
2004  and  found  that  FAA’s  overall  process  for  controlling  costs,  mitigating  risks, 
and  coordinating  local,  regional,  and  headquarters  efforts  is  diffused  and  frag-
mented. Specifically, we found: 

• Cost  and  schedule  estimates  for  the  vast  majority  of  airspace  redesign  projects 
are  not  reliable.  Cost  estimates—for  the  program  as  well  as  individual 
projects—include  costs  for  planning  but  not  for  implementation.  Therefore,  we 
could  not,  nor  could  FAA,  determine  the  cost  of  implementing  the  42  approved 
projects in FY 2004.
• FAA’s  redesign  projects  are  often  delayed  3  years  or  more  because  of  changes 
in a project’s scope, environmental issues, and problems in developing new pro-
cedures  for  more  precise  arrival  and  departure  routes.  For  example,  of  the  42 
approved  projects  in  FY  2004,  7  were  affected  by  environmental  concerns,  10 
by  problems  in  developing  new  procedures,  and  21  by  changes  in  a  project’s 
scope.
• Projects  are  not  effectively  coordinated  among  agency  organizations  that  man-
age resources (e.g., new equipment and radio frequencies) or linked to the agen-
cy’s  budget  process.  This  directly  affects  a  project’s  implementation.  We  found 
that  19  of  the  42  approved  projects  in  FY  2004  had  unresolved  equipment 
issues.

We  recommended  that  FAA  (1)  establish  cost  and  schedule  controls  for  airspace 
redesign  projects  (and  include  costs  for  both  planning  and  implementation),  (2)  es-
tablish  procedures  to  ensure  projects  are  coordinated  among  agency  offices,  (3) 
prioritize  airspace  projects  and  establish  criteria  for  assessing  a  project’s  system-
wide  impact,  and  (4)  re-evaluate  how  resources  are  used  at  the  local  and  regional 
levels. FAA has actions underway to address our recommendations. 

6 FAA includes a new runway in the OEP when all the planning and environmental processing 
has  been  completed,  a  Record  of  Decision  has  been  issued,  and  the  sponsor  has  provided  FAA 
with the dimensions, timing, and planned use of the runway. FAA just recently added Philadel-
phia to the plan. 

7 OIG Report Number AV–2005–059, ‘‘Airspace Redesign Efforts Are Critical To Enhance Ca-

pacity But Need Major Improvements,’’ May 13, 2005.

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  14:42 May 04, 2006 Jkt 027295 PO 00000 Frm 00031 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\27295.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

28

FAA’s  Joint  Planning  and  Development  Office—Determining  What  Can  Be 
Done  in  5-  and  10-  year  Benchmarks  and  Establishing  Funding
Requirements 

Another  important  effort  to  help  meet  the  anticipated  demand  for  air  travel  is 
FAA’s  Joint  Planning  and  Development  Office  (JPDO).  The  establishment  of  this 
new  office  was  mandated  by  Congress  to  coordinate  research  and  development  ef-
forts among diverse Federal agencies, including the National Aeronautics and Space 
Administration  and  the  Department  of  Defense,  and  develop  a  vision  for  the  next 
generation air traffic management system in the 2025 timeframe. 

There  are  a  number  of  reasons  why  this  effort  is  important,  including  the  fore-
casted  demand  in  air  travel  as  well  as  the  factors  (i.e.,  microjets)  that  may  drive 
increased  operations.  The  new  office  is  also  important  because  the  majority  of 
projects  in  FAA’s  current  capital  account  ($2.4  billion  for  fiscal  year  2006)  focus  on 
keeping things running, or ‘‘infrastructure sustainment.’’ The combined effects of in-
creased  operations  costs  and  the  fact  that  modernization  projects  have  suffered  so 
much  cost  growth  over  the  years  has  left  little  room  for  new  initiatives. 8 This  is 
one  of  the  reasons  why  there  is  so  much  discussion  about  how  to  finance  new  air 
traffic management initiatives. 

FAA  reports  that  the  current  air  traffic  control  system  (or  ‘‘business  as  usual’’) 
will not be sufficient to accommodate the anticipated future growth in traffic or the 
changes  facing  the  aviation  community.  Key  issues  focus  on  what  new  systems  are 
needed  and  how  new  systems,  capabilities,  procedures,  and  changes  in  airspace 
management  can  transform  the  way  air  traffic  services  are  provided.  The  JPDO 
published  its  first  plan  this  past  December.  It  laid  out  goals  and  strategies  but  did 
not  provide  details  on  what  capabilities  will  be  pursued  or  how  much  they  would 
cost to implement. 

While the 2025 timeframe has merit, benchmarks for what can be done in 5- and 
10-year  intervals  are  also  important.  Other  imperatives  focus  on  determining  what 
level  of  funding  is  actually  required,  how  much  other  agencies  will  contribute,  what 
specific capabilities will be pursued, and when they can be implemented. The Depart-
ment  committed  to  Congress  that  by  the  year’s  end,  it  would  provide  specifics  on 
how much money is needed, when, and for what purposes. 
Administrative  and/or  Market-Based  Solutions  May  Provide  Congestion

Relief in Markets Where Alternatives are Limited 

As delays return, FAA and some airports are considering a variety of administra-
tive  and/or  market-based  solutions  that  would  allow  variable  pricing  of  access  in 
order  to  control  congestion  and  delays.  Some  of  the  congestion  management  alter-
natives  under  study  include  slot  auctions,  congestion  pricing,  administratively  im-
posed scheduling caps, and incentives for up-gauging aircraft. 

In  2004  and  2005,  the  FAA  used  administrative  actions  to  reduce  delays  at  Chi-
cago-O’Hare  by  first  negotiating  and  later  imposing  schedule  reductions  with  the 
carriers  serving  O’Hare.  The  FAA  is  now  soliciting  comments  on  whether  to  con-
tinue the administrative controls at O’Hare for another 3 years, until ultimately, the 
first  phase  of  the  O’Hare  Modernization  Plan  is  complete  and  additional  capacity 
could relieve some of the congestion. At LaGuardia, another airport where scheduled 
operations are anticipated to exceed capacity when slot controls expire in 2007, new 
construction is not a viable option. At LaGuardia, some demand management tool—
whether market based or administrative, will likely be needed to prevent what could 
be crippling delay conditions. 

Market-based  approaches,  while  on  paper  appear  to  be  a  reasonable  solution  for 
some  airports,  entail  difficult  policy  considerations,  such  as  who  sets  the  fees,  how 
the fees should be set, who collects the fees, how (and whether) fees are shared be-
tween  airports  and  the  FAA,  how  general  aviation  will  be  treated,  and  small  com-
munity  access.  These  are  difficult  questions  that  will  need  definitive  answers—the 
consequences  of  moving  forward  without  working  out  the  details  could  result  in  se-
vere market consequences. We believe this debate needs to be joined with the debate 
taking shape on financing FAA—there should be some degree of equity between who 
benefits  from  premium  services  (i.e.,  rush  hour  departure  slots),  and  who  pays  for 
these privileges.

8 We  reviewed  16  of  FAA’s  major  acquisitions.  We  found  that  11  of  the  16  experienced  cost 
growth  of  about  $5.6  billion,  which  is  more  than  double  the  amount  of  FAA’s  Fiscal  Year  2006 
budget  request  for  its  Facilities  and  Equipment  account.  Additionally,  10  of  these  16  projects 
accounted for schedule delays ranging from 2 to 12 years and 2 projects have been deferred until 
at  least  2008.  For  additional  details  on  FAA’s  major  acquisitions  as  well  perspectives  on  the 
JPDO,  see  our  testimony  entitled  ‘‘Next  Steps  for  the  Air  Traffic  Organization’’  (CC–2005–022, 
April 14, 2005). 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  14:42 May 04, 2006 Jkt 027295 PO 00000 Frm 00032 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\27295.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

29

Senator BURNS. Thank you very much. We’ve been joined by Sen-
ator Nelson of Nebraska. He’s worried about McCook International. 
And  I’m  sorry,  Senator,  I  didn’t  recognize  you  before  we  went  to 
Mr. Mead. Do you have a statement——

STATEMENT OF HON. E. BENJAMIN NELSON,

U.S. SENATOR FROM NEBRASKA 

Senator BEN NELSON. No. Thank you for the opportunity, but I’m 

anxious to get to their statements first. Thank you. 

Senator  BURNS.  We  have  with  us  this  morning  Mr.  Gerald 
Dillingham.  He  is  Director  of  Aviation  Issues  with  the  GAO,  and 
he’ll be next. 

Senator  Lott,  thank  you  for  being  here.  We  were  just  going  over 
the  advances  that  have  been  made  in  the  FAA  and  in  aviation 
under  your  tutelage  when  you  were  Chairman  of  this  Committee, 
and we thank you for your service. 

Do you have a statement or anything? 

STATEMENT OF HON. TRENT LOTT,
U.S. SENATOR FROM MISSISSIPPI 

Senator  LOTT.  Yes.  Just  very  briefly,  Mr.  Chairman.  Thank  you 
for  having  the  hearing,  and  thank  you  for  your  comments.  I’ve  en-
joyed  very  much  working  with  the  FAA  Administrator,  Mr.  Mead, 
and  all  those  involved  in  aviation.  I  think  we  have  made  some 
progress,  and  we  dealt  with  this  industry.  And  with  what’s  trying 
to be done at FAA, we obviously still have work to do. 

Modernization  still  has  a  long  way  to  go,  and  we  still  have  air-
lines  that  have  a  great  deal  of  difficulty.  But  actually,  I  just  came 
from  a  meeting  on  dealing  with  that  very  issue,  how  we’re  going 
to  deal  with  the  pension  problem;  and  I  expect  the  Finance  Com-
mittee to take this issue up in June. If it doesn’t, I’m going to offer 
it as an amendment on the floor in June or July. 

I made it clear we’re going to act on this pension issue, and we’re 
going  to  do  it  this  summer.  I  think  that  would,  set  up  a  way  for 
the  pension  issue  to  be  dealt  with  appropriately  while  we  move 
from the old system to the new. 

But I just want to thank our witnesses today for being here. 
Keep  up  the  work.  We  need  to  make  more  progress.  This  is  a 
vital  part  of  our  economy,  and  we  must  find  a  way  to  make  it 
healthy and safe. Thank you, Mr. Chairman. 

Senator  BURNS.  Thank  you,  Senator.  And  now  Mr.  Gerald 

Dillingham from the Government Accountability Office. 

And thank you for your report, Mr. Dillingham. Good report. And 
it’s sort of an eye-opener to many of us who are going to be dealing 
with  this  business  of  keeping  everybody  in  the  air  and  getting 
there  on  time.  So  thank  you  for  joining  us  this  morning.  We  look 
forward to your testimony.

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  14:42 May 04, 2006 Jkt 027295 PO 00000 Frm 00033 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\27295.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

30

STATEMENT  OF  GERALD  L.  DILLINGHAM,  PH.D.,  DIRECTOR, 
ISSUES,  GOVERNMENT

PHYSICAL 
ACCOUNTABILITY OFFICE 
Dr.  DILLINGHAM.  Thank  you,  Mr.  Chairman,  Chairman  Stevens, 

INFRASTRUCTURE 

Senator Lott and Senator Nelson. 

A few months after 9/11, GAO issued a report to this Committee 
on  airspace  capacity  issues.  The  key  message  in  that  report  was 
that the decline in air traffic was only a temporary reprieve for sys-
tem congestion and delays. We characterized it as a window of op-
portunity  to  develop  and  implement  plans  for  long-term  capacity 
enhancements. 

As  you  may  recall  in  2000,  which  was  billed  as  one  of  the  worst 
years  for  aviation  delays,  one  in  every  four  flights  experienced  a 
delay.  In  2004  one  in  every  five  flights  experienced  a  delay.  The 
2004  ratio  was  achieved  even  though  air  traffic  was  near  pre-9/11 
levels. This could be seen as an indicator of some progress in reduc-
ing  delays.  It  could  also  be  seen  as  an  indicator  that  much  more 
needs to be done. 

For  example,  the  Air  Transport  Association  has  reported  that 
flight delays in 2004 cost the airline industry an estimated $6.2 bil-
lion  in  direct  operating  costs.  These  are  costs  that  the  airline  in-
dustry can ill-afford. Neither can the Nation’s economy nor its posi-
tion in the global economy continue to withstand what has been es-
timated  to  be  a  $30  billion  annual  loss  to  the  Nation’s  economy 
when people and products do not reach their destination within ex-
pected time periods. 

Since  our  earlier  report,  and  as  you’ve  heard  from  the  previous 
witnesses,  FAA  and  the  other  stakeholders  have  undertaken  or 
planned a wide variety of initiatives to address the delay problems 
this summer. FAA and the airlines have also focused special atten-
tion on some of the choke points in the system, such as in the New 
York area and Chicago, where delays and congestions tend to have 
a ripple effect throughout the system. 

Mr.  Chairman,  we  believe  that  the  initiatives  that  FAA  and  the 
other  stakeholders  have  implemented  will  minimize  system  delays 
and  congestion  for  the  upcoming  travel  season.  To  address  system 
congestion and delays for the longer term, FAA has also developed 
a long-term strategy, the OEP. 

The  centerpiece  of  the  OEP  and,  by  general  consensus,  the  OEP 
initiative  which  holds  the  greatest  promise  for  increasing  system 
capacity  is  runway  construction.  Under  the  OEP,  15  new  runways 
are  scheduled  to  be  in  service  by  the  end  of  2008;  but  only  three 
of  the  nine  airports  that  experienced  the  highest  rates  of  delay  in 
2004 are scheduled for additional runways. There is a general con-
sensus that even if all of the OEP initiatives are implemented, the 
National Airspace System is not expected to keep up with demand, 
resulting  in  increased  congestion  and  delays  over  the  10-year  OEP 
time frame. 

The  question  seems  to  be,  how  much  congestion  and  delays  will 
there  be?  On  the  one  hand,  FAA’s  Management  Advisory  Council 
estimates  passengers  will  experience  63  percent  more  total  delay 
hours in 2012 than they did in 2000. On the other hand, FAA’s po-
sition is that if all the OEP initiatives are implemented, delays will 
be maintained at or below the delay levels of 2000. 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  14:42 May 04, 2006 Jkt 027295 PO 00000 Frm 00034 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\27295.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

31

You  will  recall  that  in  2000,  one  in  every  four  flights  was  de-
layed. Both of these scenarios indicate that the OEP initiatives will 
not  be  enough  to  solve  the  delay  and  congestion  problems.  Our 
written  statement  identifies  some  other  potential  capacity-increas-
ing  options  that  are  not  in  the  OEP  but  have  been  cited  by  GAO 
and  others  over  the  last  decade.  These  options  basically  fall  into 
two categories. 

The  first  category  involves  measures  to  add  new  infrastructure, 
such  as  building  new  airports  or  greater  utilization  and  develop-
ment of regional airports near major cities. 

The  second  category  focuses  on  developing  alternative  modes  of 
intercity  travel  other  than  air  transportation,  such  as  high-speed 
rail to reduce the number of short-haul flights. 

We recognize that adopting many of these other options is likely 
to  be  a  much  greater  challenge  than  implementing  initiatives  in 
the OEP principally because of stakeholder opposition. 

Mr. Chairman, as has been made clear from the statements this 
morning,  there  are  certainly  numerous  challenges  that  lie  ahead 
for  enhancing  system  capacity  and  moving  toward  the  Next  Gen-
eration Air Transportation System for 2025. FAA has taken a first 
and very important step toward addressing the challenges by devel-
oping a series of plans, including the 5-year flight plan, the 10-year 
OEP, and the twenty-year Next Generation Air Transportation Sys-
tem plan, all of which give direction and focus to enhancing system 
capacity. 

However, we think one of the most serious challenges to the suc-
cessful  implementation  of  the  plans  is  the  availability  of  funding. 
We  agree  with  the  Administrator  that  the  FAA  is  in  an  untenable 
financial position where its costs are exceeding its revenues. 

In 2004 the gap between its costs and revenues was about $4 bil-
lion.  Although  FAA  has  been  able  to  fund  its  key  systems  acquisi-
tions,  the  FAA  budget  accounts  that  fund  capacity-enhancing 
projects  and  the  acquisition  of  ATC  systems  had  reduced  funding 
in 2005, and further reductions are proposed for 2006. 

Additionally  to  meet  budget  targets,  FAA  also  eliminated  all  of 
the  $1.4  billion  that  it  had  designated  for  early  R&D  activities  in 
support of new system projects. Taken together, it would seem that 
FAA  will  have  a  difficult  time  moving  from  its  current  investment 
strategies,  wherein  as  much  as  80  percent  of  its  annual  budget  is 
to maintain the status quo rather than increasing capacity and effi-
ciency within the system. 

In  a  final  analysis,  Mr.  Chairman,  we  think  that  most  of  what 
can be done for the short term is at various stages of implementa-
tion.  However,  meeting  the  challenge  of  keeping  up  with  the  in-
creasing  demand  for  safe  and  efficient  air  transportation  services 
in  the  21st  Century  will  require  additional  actions  including  inte-
grating  the  various  plans  that  currently  exist  and  adequate  fund-
ing to implement the plan through new or existing funding mecha-
nisms. 

Meeting  the  challenge  will  also  require  continuous  use  and  im-
provement  of  sound  business  practices  and  cost  control  efforts  by 
the FAA. 

Thank you, Mr. Chairman. 
[The prepared statement of Dr. Dillingham follows:]

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  14:42 May 04, 2006 Jkt 027295 PO 00000 Frm 00035 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\27295.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

PREPARED STATEMENT OF GERALD L. DILLINGHAM, PH.D., DIRECTOR, PHYSICAL 

INFRASTRUCTURE ISSUES, GOVERNMENT ACCOUNTABILITY OFFICE 

32

Mr. Chairman and Members of the Subcommittee: 
We  are  pleased  to  be  here  today  to  discuss  flight  delays  and  capacity  issues  in 
the national airspace system. Since the unprecedented flight delays in 2000, a year 
in  which  flight  delays  totaled  1.4  million  and  one  in  four  flights  were  delayed,  our 
aviation system has been adversely affected by many unanticipated events—such as 
the  September  11  terrorist  attacks,  the  Iraq  war  and  associated  security  concerns, 
and Severe Acute Respiratory Syndrome (SARS)—that significantly reduced the de-
mand  for  air  travel.  However,  that  demand  for  air  travel  is  rebounding.  For  exam-
ple,  the  number  of  passengers  traveling  by  air  increased  from  642  million  in  2003 
to  688  million  in  2004.  FAA  estimates  that  by  2015  there  will  be  as  many  as  one 
billion travelers per year in the United States. 

The  current  rebound  in  air  travel  has  been  a  significant  factor  in  a  resurgence 
of flight delays today. Flight delays have many causes. Historically, the major cause 
of  flight  delays  has  been  bad  weather.  For  example,  70  percent  of  the  flight  delays 
from  2000  to  2004  were  weather-related.  Apart  from  weather,  the  next  main  cause 
is  lack  of  capacity—that  is,  the  inability  of  the  national  airspace  system  to  handle 
the  amount  of  traffic  seeking  to  use  it.  Changes  in  the  composition  of  the  aircraft 
fleet—including the airlines’ greater reliance on regional jets with an average of 49 
seats—has  also  increased  the  number  of  aircraft  in  the  national  airspace  system, 
which has placed greater demand on the system. Besides airlines, other parts of the 
aviation community are also likely to place more demands on the national airspace 
system.  For  example,  corporations  may  make  increasing  use  of  their  corporate  jets, 
which often use the same airports and airspace as those used by airlines. 

Flight delays have also been among the most vexing problems in the national air-
space  system  and  are  defined  by  the  Department  of  Transportation  as  instances 
when  aircraft  arrive  at  the  gate  15  minutes  or  more  after  scheduled  arrival  time. 
In 2004, the number of flight delays totaled over 1.4 million and almost one in five 
flights were delayed primarily at New York La Guardia, Newark International, Chi-
cago O’Hare, and Atlanta Hartsfield. Because these are some of the busiest airports 
in  the  country,  their  delays  generally  have  significant  ramifications  for  the  rest  of 
the  national  airspace  system.  Our  Nation’s  airspace  system  is  a  critical  engine  of 
economic growth that facilitates the safe and efficient movement of people and goods 
around  the  globe,  consequently  flight  delays  and  capacity  issues  have  significant 
ramifications.  According  to  the  Commission  on  the  Future  of  the  United  States 
Aerospace  Industry,  consumers  stand  to  lose  $30  billion  dollars  annually  if  people 
and  products  do  not  reach  their  destinations  within  expected  time  periods.  The  Air 
Transport  Association  also  reports  that  flight  delays  in  2004  cost  the  airline  indus-
try an estimated $6.2 billion in direct operating costs (e.g., pilots, flight attendants, 
and fuel). 

My  statement  today  updates  our  2001  report  entitled:  National  Airspace  System: 
Long-Term  Capacity  Planning  Needed  Despite  Recent  Reduction  in  Flight  Delays 1 
and addresses the following questions: 

• What initiatives are ongoing by the Federal Government, airlines, and airports 

to address flight delays and enhance capacity?

• What are some of the challenges in reducing flight delays and enhancing capac-

ity?

• What other options are available to address flight delays and enhance capacity?
To answer these questions, we obtained and analyzed information from FAA, Air-
ports Council International, and the Air Transport Association on the status and im-
pact of initiatives to reduce flight delays that were identified in our December 2001 
report.  We  performed  our  work  in  accordance  with  generally  accepted  government 
auditing standards. 

In summary: 
Several  initiatives  to  reduce  flight  delays,  such  as  those  shown  in  figure  1,  and 

enhance capacity are ongoing.

1 U.S. Government Accountability Office, National Airspace System: Long-Term Capacity Plan-
ning Needed Despite Recent Reduction in Flight Delays, GAO–02–185 (Washington, D.C.: Decem-
ber 14, 2001).

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  14:42 May 04, 2006 Jkt 027295 PO 00000 Frm 00036 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\27295.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

33

Many  of  these  initiatives  are  reflected  in  FAA’s  February  2005  Operation  Evo-
lution  Plan  which  is  a  10-year  plan  to  increase  capacity  and  efficiency  of  the  na-
tional  airspace  system  and  focuses  on  airport  congestion,  air  traffic  management 
flow efficiency, en route congestion, and terminal area congestion at 35 of the busi-
est airports in the United States. 2 FAA acknowledges, however, that the OEP is not 
intended  as  the  ultimate  solution  to  congestion  and  delay  problems.  Also,  over  the 
last  six  years,  new  runways  were  opened  at  the  Phoenix,  Detroit,  Denver,  Miami, 
Cleveland,  Houston,  and  Orlando  airports,  which  provided  those  airports  with  the 
potential  to  accommodate  about  one  million  more  annual  operations  (take-offs  and 
landings). Seven more runways and one runway extension are scheduled to open by 
the end of 2008 with the potential to accommodate 889,000 more annual operations. 
In  addition  to  building  runways,  several  new  systems  or  technologies  were  imple-
mented.  For  example,  in  January  2005,  FAA  implemented  the  Domestic  Reduced 
Vertical  Separation  Minimum  which  is  designed  to  increase  available  high  altitude 
routes which gives pilots and air traffic controllers more choices so that aircraft can 
fly more direct routes at the most fuel-efficient altitudes. FAA is also pursuing some 
additional solutions for flight delays that are not in the OEP. To reduce flight delays 
at  some  of  the  delay-prone  airports  such  as  New  York  La  Guardia  and  Chicago 
O’Hare,  FAA  is  also  exploring  administrative  and  market-based  options.  For  exam-
ple, FAA is considering auctioning off landing and take off rights and using conges-
tion pricing at New York La Guardia and limiting the number of takeoffs and land-
ings during peak periods at Chicago O’Hare. 

A number of challenges in reducing flight delays and enhancing capacity remain. 
Chief among them is obtaining funding for many of the initiatives mentioned above; 
their  successful  implementation  is  predicated  on  the  availability  of  funding  from 
several  sources,  including  FAA,  airlines,  and  airports.  However,  since  2000,  the  fi-
nancial  condition  of  the  aviation  industry  has  changed  significantly.  Many  struc-
tural changes, such as the growth of the low cost carriers which led to lower average 
fares  and  external  events  (e.g.,  global  recessions  and  a  steep  decline  in  business 
travel)  have  caused  a  dip  in  demand  for  air  travel  and  resulted  in  sharp  decreases 
in airline industry revenue and the amount of revenues flowing into the Airport and 
Airway  Trust  Fund. 3 FAA  expects  that  over  the  next  four  years  there  may  be  an 
$8.2 billion dollar gap between its costs and revenues. In 2004, the airline industry 
losses totaled $14 billion and the industry is expecting similar losses in 2005, which 
will make it difficult for them to equip their aircraft with some of the new air traffic 
control technology, according to Air Transport Association officials. 

Other  options  are  available  to  address  delay  problems.  One  option  is  to  add  new 
capacity—not by adding runways to existing capacity-constrained airports, but rath-

2 See appendix 1 for a list of the 35 airports that are in the OEP. 
3 The Airport and Airway Trust Fund help funds the development of a nationwide airport and 

airway system and air traffic control facilities. 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  14:42 May 04, 2006 Jkt 027295 PO 00000 Frm 00037 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\27295.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

s
p
e
.
1

l
l
i

d

34

er  by  building  entirely  new  airports.  According  to  FAA,  airport  authorities  in  Chi-
cago,  Las  Vegas,  and  San  Diego  are  evaluating  the  need  for  new  airports.  Another 
option  is  to  develop  other  modes  of  intercity  travel,  such  as,  but  not  limited  to, 
highspeed rail where metropolitan areas are relatively close together. These options 
may conflict with the interests of one or more key stakeholder groups, and, in many 
cases, would be costly. 
Background 

Although  recent  events  may  have  moved  airport  congestion  off  center  stage  as  a 
major  national  issue,  delays  remain  a  pervasive  problem,  in  part  because  of  the 
interdependence of the Nation’s airports. The effect of delays can quickly spread be-
yond  those  airports  where  delays  tend  to  occur  most  often,  such  as  New  York  La 
Guardia,  Chicago  O’Hare,  Newark  International,  and  Atlanta  Hartsfield.  Delays  at 
these  airports  can  quickly  create  a  ‘‘ripple’’  effect  of  delays  that  affects  many  air-
ports  across  the  country.  For  example,  flights  scheduled  to  take  off  from  these  air-
ports  may  find  themselves  being  held  at  the  departing  airport  due  to  weather  or 
limited  airspace.  Similarly,  an  aircraft  late  in  leaving  the  airport  where  delays  are 
occurring  may  be  late  in  arriving  at  its  destination,  thus  delaying  the  departure 
time for the aircraft’s next flight. 

Delays  have  many  causes,  but  weather  is  the  most  prevalent.  Figures  compiled 
by  FAA  indicate  that  weather  causes  about  70  percent  of  the  delays  each  year. 
Apart  from  weather,  the  next  main  cause  is  lack  of  capacity—that  is,  the  inability 
of  the  national  airspace  system  to  handle  the  amount  of  traffic  seeking  to  use  it. 
Capacity can be measured in a variety of ways. For example, at individual airports, 
one  measure  is  the  maximum  number  of  takeoffs  and  landings  that  can  be  con-
ducted in a given period, such as 15 minutes or 1 hour. In our 2001 report, we noted 
that  FAA  had  established  such  a  capacity  benchmark  at  each  of  the  31  of  the  Na-
tion’s  busiest  airports. 4 FAA’s  data  on  capacity  and  demand  at  these  airports 
showed that even in optimum weather conditions, 16 airports had at least three 15-
minute periods each day when demand exceeded capacity. 5 

Weather and capacity problems are often linked, because bad weather can further 
erode capacity. For example, some airports have parallel runways that are too close 
together  for  simultaneous  operations  in  bad  weather.  When  weather  worsens,  only 
one of the two runways can be used at any given time, thereby reducing the number 
of aircraft that can take off and land. FAA’s data in 2001 showed that in bad weath-
er, 22 of the 31 airports had at least three 15-minute periods when demand exceed-
ed capacity. Another measure of capacity, apart from the capacity of individual air-
ports,  is  the  number  of  aircraft  that  can  be  in  a  given  sector  of  the  airspace.  For 
safe  operations,  aircraft  must  maintain  certain  distances  from  each  other  and  re-
main  within  authorized  airspace.  If  too  many  aircraft  are  trying  to  use  the  same 
airspace, some must wait, either on the ground or en route. 

Addressing  flight  delay  problems  also  requires  action  by  multiple  aviation  stake-
holders  because  no  single  entity  has  the  authority  or  ability  to  solve  delay-related 
problems. The Federal Government, especially through the Federal Aviation Admin-
istration  (FAA)  and  its  parent  agency,  the  Department  of  Transportation  (DOT), 
plays  a  major  role  by  operating  the  national  airspace  system,  distributing  Federal 
funding  for  airports,  and  setting  operating  standards  for  all  aircraft  and  airports. 
Airports  and  airlines  are  also  important  decision  makers  and  funding  sources.  The 
Nation’s  airports  are  primarily  owned  and  operated  by  local  units  of  government, 
so that decisions about such steps as expanding airport capacity are primarily local 
in  nature.  Airlines’  business  decisions  have  a  strong  effect  on  the  volume  and  rout-
ing  of  flights,  the  type  and  size  of  aircraft  used,  and  the  degree  to  which  aircraft 
are upgraded to take advantage of new technology. 
A Number of Initiatives to Reduce Flight Delays and Enhance Capacity Are 

Ongoing 

Several initiatives to reduce flight delays and enhance capacity are ongoing. These 
initiatives  which  FAA,  the  airlines,  and  the  airports  are  implementing  are  incor-
porated  into  FAA’s  major  capacity-enhancing  effort:  the  Operation  Evolution  Plan 
(OEP).  The  OEP  is  a  rolling  10-year  plan  to  increase  capacity  and  efficiency  of  the 
national  airspace  system  and  focuses  on  airport  surface  infrastructure,  and  techno-
logical and procedural initiatives at 35 of the busiest airports in the United States. 
FAA acknowledges, however, that the OEP is not intended as the ultimate solution 
to  congestion  and  delay  problems.  Responsibility  for  the  various  initiatives  is  still 
shared  among  the  various  segments  of  the  aviation  community.  In  February  2005, 

4 FAA updated its capacity benchmark report in 2004. 
5 The current OEP includes 35 of the busiest airports in the U.S. 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  14:42 May 04, 2006 Jkt 027295 PO 00000 Frm 00038 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\27295.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

35

FAA  published  version  7  of  the  OEP  and  organized  it  into  the  following  four  quad-
rants: 

Airport  Congestion.  The  Airport  Congestion  quadrant  focuses  on  capacity  en-
hancements  for  the  airport  surface.  One  of  the  most  effective  ways  to  increase  ca-
pacity  is  to  build  runways;  however,  it  takes  an  average  of  10  years  from  the  time 
planning begins for a runway until it is commissioned. To help expedite the process 
for  building  runways,  Congress  and  FAA  streamlined  the  environmental  review 
phase of the runway process. In addition, according to FAA, over the last six years, 
seven  new  runways  were  opened  at  Phoenix,  Detroit,  Denver,  Miami,  Cleveland, 
Houston,  and  Orlando  airports  which  provided  those  airports  with  the  potential  to 
accommodate  about  one  million  more  annual  operations  (take-offs  and  landings). 
Seven  more  runways  and  one  runway  extension  are  included  in  the  OEP  and  are 
scheduled to open by the end of 2008. These runways are expected to provide those 
airports  with  the  potential  to  accommodate  889,000  more  annual  operations  in  the 
system, as shown in figure 2.

In addition to the runways listed in the OEP, nine more projects are in the plan-
ning or environmental stages, including one new runway, three airfield reconfigura-
tions,  one  runway  extension,  and  three  new  airports  in  major  metropolitan  areas. 
FAA also has additional flight reduction activities that are not included in the OEP. 
To  reduce  flight  delays  at  some  of  the  delay-prone  airports,  such  as  New  York  La 
Guardia and Chicago O’Hare, FAA is exploring administrative and market based op-
tions. For example, FAA is considering auctioning off landing and take off rights at 
New  York  La  Guardia  and  is  currently  limiting  the  number  of  scheduled  arrivals 
during peak periods at New York La Guardia and Chicago O’Hare. 

Air Traffic Management Flow Efficiency. This quadrant focuses on new tech-
nology and procedures to optimize the flow of traffic and maximize system through-
put  which  may  allow  better  control  and  utilization  of  current  airspace.  Included  is 
the  Collaborative  Convective  Forecast  Product  which  is  a  graphical  forecast  of  po-
tential  convective  activity  areas  (i.e.,  thunderstorms)  for  use  in  the  strategic  plan-
ning  and  management  of  air  traffic.  It  is  intended  to  provide  advance  planning  for 
long  haul  flights  and  allows  for  schedule  predictability  based  on  2-,  4-,  and  6-hour 
forecasts.  This  tool  is  most  useful  during  the  severe  weather  avoidance  procedures 
season, which is from March to October. Another program is Collaborative Decision 
Making,  which  is  a  joint  government/industry  initiative.  Collaborative  Decision 
Making  focuses  on  electronic  data  exchange;  optimized  airspace  utilization;  shared 
planning  and  decision-making;  and  post-analysis  reporting.  In  addition,  the  Traffic 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  14:42 May 04, 2006 Jkt 027295 PO 00000 Frm 00039 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\27295.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

s
p
e
.
2

l
l
i

d

36

Management Advisor, which is in operation at eight air route traffic control centers, 
is  an  automated  decision  support  tool,  is  intended  to  provide  controllers  and  traffic 
management coordinators more information on airport arrival demand and available 
capacity for making decisions on aircraft spacing. 

En  Route  Congestion.  Although  the  flying  public  is  impacted  by  delays  at  the 
airports,  many  times  this  occurs  in  the  en  route  areas  as  the  airways  become  con-
gested. The tools in this quadrant reduce delays and contribute to time and fuel sav-
ings  for  the  vast  majority  of  airspace  users.  One  of  the  tools  currently  in  use  is  re-
duced  lateral  (side-to-side)  separation  may  provide  space  for  additional  routes  be-
tween current city pairs or allow for new direct routes. Reduced longitudinal (nose-
to-tail)  separation  may  provide  more  opportunities  to  add  flights  without  incurring 
delays.  For  domestic  flights,  Domestic  Reduced  Vertical  Separation  Minimum  was 
implemented  in  Fiscal  Year  2005  in  the  contiguous  United  States  and  Alaska  and 
adds  six  additional  flight  levels  between  existing  flight  levels.  The  User  Request 
Evaluation  Tool  which  was  installed  at  l7  air  route  traffic  control  centers  and  is 
operational  at  13  air  route  traffic  control  centers,  allows  controllers  to  predict  air-
craft-to-aircraft and aircraft-to-airspace conflicts, which allows them to construct al-
ternative  flight  paths.  Airspace  redesign  projects  also  provide  significant  capacity 
improvements.  For  example,  new  routes  added  as  part  of  the  High  Altitude  Rede-
sign  increased  en  route  throughput  from  the  Pacific  Northwest  into  the  San  Fran-
cisco Bay and the Los Angeles Basin areas. 

Terminal Area Congestion. Terminal airspace is a critical component in the ef-
ficient use of airport capacity. In instances where volume has increased and the cur-
rent airspace structure is the limiting factor, redesigning arrival and departure pro-
cedures,  including  the  addition  of  Area  Navigation  and  Required  Navigation  Per-
formance procedures, will allow more efficient use of constrained terminal airspace. 
Also,  by  applying  existing  technology  with  new  procedures  may  provide  instrument 
approaches  to  nearly  all  runways  greater  than  5,000  feet  and  under  a  wider  range 
of meteorological conditions that are insensitive to airport surface traffic. Area navi-
gation procedures provide flight path guidance from the runway to the en route air-
space with minimal instructions given by air traffic controllers. As a result, routine 
controller/pilot  communications  are  reduced,  which  frees  time  to  handle  other  safe-
ty-critical flight activities. Other key benefits include more efficient use of airspace, 
with improved flight profiles, resulting in significant fuel efficiencies to the airlines. 
Additional  solutions  for  increasing  capacity  in  this  arena  are  Time  Based  Meter-
ing  which  is  used  in  conjunction  with  Traffic  Management  Advisor, 6 became  oper-
ational  at  seven  air  route  traffic  control  centers.  By  optimizing  the  flow  of  aircraft 
from the en route to the terminal area, Time Based Metering with Traffic Manage-
ment Advisor may help an airport to efficiently use the full capacity of its runways 
which increases acceptance rates as well as peak throughput. An air traffic manage-
ment  tool  called  Integrated  Terminal  Weather  System  which  provides  full  color 
graphic  displays  of  essential  weather  information  to  promote  the  safety,  capacity, 
and  efficiency  of  air  traffic  control  operations  was  also  implemented  at  Boston 
Logan,  Denver  International,  and  Minneapolis-St.  Paul  airports  in  2004.  According 
to FAA, the plan is to install the production version of Integrated Terminal Weather 
System at the New York terminal radar control facility in 2006. 
Challenges in Reducing Flight Delays and Enhancing Capacity Remain 

A number of challenges in reducing flight delays and enhancing capacity remain. 
A daunting challenge that FAA and other aviation stakeholders will have to address 
is funding the various initiatives that are designed to address flight delays and en-
hance capacity. The successful implementation of many of these initiatives is predi-
cated on the availability of funding. However, since 2000, which is to date the worst 
year  in  history  for  delays,  the  financial  condition  of  the  aviation  industry  has 
changed  significantly.  A  number  of  structural  changes  within  the  airline  industry, 
such  as  the  growth  of  the  Internet  as  a  means  to  sell  and  distribute  tickets,  the 
growth  of  the  low  cost  airlines,  and  fare  reductions  by  legacy  carriers,  all  trans-
formed the industry and led to lower average fares. These lower fares have resulted 
in  lower  ticket  taxes  and  less  revenue  into  the  Airport  and  Airway  Trust  Fund.  In 
addition, a series of largely unforeseen events, including the September 11 terrorist 
attacks,  war  in  Iraq  and  associated  security  concerns,  SARS,  global  recessions,  and 
a  steep  decline  in  business  travel  seriously  reduced  the  demand  for  air  travel  and 
resulted in sharp decreases in airline industry revenue. 

6 Traffic  Management  Advisor  provides  an  aircraft  arrival  schedule  in  the  en  route  and  ter-
minal  units  and  produces  meter  lists  for  controllers  that  display  that  estimate  optimal  arrival 
times. 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  14:42 May 04, 2006 Jkt 027295 PO 00000 Frm 00040 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\27295.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

37

Consequently,  FAA  expects  that  over  the  next  four  years  there  may  be  a  multi-
billion  dollar  gap  between  its  costs  and  revenues.  According  to  one  aviation  expert, 
this  gap  could  have  consequences  that  would  increase  air  traffic  delays.  For  exam-
ple,  FAA’s  Facilities  and  Equipment  account,  which  provides  funding  for  modern-
izing  the  air  traffic  control  system  and  improving  its  reliability,  capacity,  and  effi-
ciency,  was  reduced  by  15  percent  in  Fiscal  Year  2005  and  the  President’s  2006 
budget proposes to reduce it by 20 percent in Fiscal Year 2006. These are the funds 
that  are  key  to  the  national  airspace  system’s  future  ability  to  handle  demand  and 
to minimize delays. For example, to provide the $4.4 billion needed for its major sys-
tem acquisitions while remaining within its budget targets through fiscal year 2009, 
FAA  has  made  significant  cuts  elsewhere  in  its  capital  funding  plans.  Specifically, 
FAA eliminated all of the $1.4 billion that it had set aside for what it calls the ‘‘ar-
chitecture segment.’’ These funds would have been used to perform about two years’ 
worth  of  early  research  on  new  programs  before  they  are  mature  enough  to  receive 
formal  Joint  Resources  Council  approval. 7 FAA  also  made  significant  reductions  in 
planned  investments  for  facilities—an  action  that  runs  counter  to  its  reported  need 
to  refurbish  or  replace  its  physical  infrastructure.  Thus,  even  if  all  OEP  initiatives 
are  implemented  the  national  airspace  system  is  expected  to  fall  behind  demand, 
resulting  in  an  increase  in  congestion  and  delays  over  the  10-year  period  of  the 
OEP. FAA’s Management Advisory Council estimates that passengers would experi-
ence 63 percent more total delay hours in 2012 than they did in 2000. 

In contrast, FAA states that if all of the OEP initiatives are implemented, delays 
will  be  maintained  at  or  below  the  flight  delay  levels  in  2000.  However,  FAA  also 
stated  that  capacity  at  some  airports  will  not  keep  pace  with  demand  and  in  these 
cases  delays  will  get  worse  over  time  because  not  all  airports  have  improvements 
planned.  In  2004,  the  airline  industry  losses  totaled  $9  billion  and  the  industry  is 
expecting similar losses in 2005, which will make it difficult for them to equip their 
aircraft with some of the new air traffic control technology, according to Air Trans-
port Association officials. 

Another  important  challenge  is  reducing  flight  delays  and  enhancing  capacity  at 
delay-prone  airports,  such  as  those  shown  in  table  1,  some  of  which  have  little  ca-
pacity  to  physically  expand  and  would  find  it  difficult  to  build  even  one  more  run-
way, either because they lack the space or would face intense opposition from adja-
cent communities.

Table 1: Most Delay-Prone Airports in 2004

Airport 

Chicago-O’Hare 
Atlanta Hartsfield 
Newark International 
Philadelphia International 
New York La Guardia 
Houston International 
Washington Dulles International 
San Francisco International 
New York John F. Kennedy 

Delays per 1,000 operations 

97
72
70
58
56
36
36
32
27

Source: FAA. 
Although  eight  runways  were  opened  during  the  last  six  years  and  seven  new 
runways  are  scheduled  to  be  opened  by  the  end  of  2008,  only  three  (Atlanta 
Hartsfield,  Philadelphia  International,  and  Houston  International)  of  the  nine  air-
ports that experienced the highest rate of delays in 2004 will receive new runways. 
Because these delay-prone airports can cause delays that ripple throughout the sys-
tem,  other  airports  that  have  increased  their  own  capacity  could  still  experience 
delays.  For  example,  in  2000,  Phoenix  Sky  Harbor  International  put  an  additional 
runway  into  service,  and  the  airport  had  sufficient  capacity  to  allow  flights  to  take 
off on time. However, the airport ranked among the top 15 in the United States for 
flight  delays.  According  to  airport  officials,  most  of  the  delays  in  Phoenix  were  the 
result of delays and cancellations at other airports—circumstances unrelated to the 
capacity  at  Phoenix.  FAA  also  projects  that  the  three  New  York-area  airports—La 

7 The  Joint  Research  Council  is  a  FAA  executive  body  consisting  of  associate  and  assistant 
administrators,  acquisition  executives,  the  chief  financial  officer,  the  chief  information  officer, 
and  legal  counsel.  The  council  determines,  among  other  things,  whether  an  acquisition  meets 
a mission need and should proceed. 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  14:42 May 04, 2006 Jkt 027295 PO 00000 Frm 00041 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\27295.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

38

Guardia, Newark, and Kennedy—will experience relatively small capacity gains dur-
ing  this  decade—just  7  percent  for  Newark  and  1  percent  each  for  the  other  two 
airports. 

In  addition  to  addressing  the  capacity  needs  of  the  most  delay-prone  airports, 
FAA,  airlines,  and  airports  will  also  have  to  address  the  emerging  capacity  needs 
of  new  metropolitan  areas  in  the  South  and  Southwest.  Among  those  metropolitan 
areas  FAA  believes  will  need  additional  capacity  by  2013  are  Tucson,  AZ;  Austin-
San Antonio, TX; and South Florida. 
Other Options Could Help Address Capacity Needs 

Other  options—not  in  the  OEP—exist  as  potential  measures  to  address  capacity 
needs  as  shown  in  table  2.  These  options,  which  have  been  cited  by  various  re-
searchers  and  policy  organizations  over  the  last  decade,  basically  fall  into  two  cat-
egories.  The  first  category  involves  measures  for  adding  airport  infrastructure  be-
sides  adding  runways  to  existing  airports,  such  as  building  new  airports  or  using 
nearby  underdeveloped  regional  airports.  The  second  category  includes  developing 
alternative  modes  of  intercity  travel  other  than  air  transportation,  such  as  high-
speed rail.

Table 2: List of Potential Options—Not in OEP—to Reduce Airport Capacity Gap 

Options 

Category 1: Adding 
airport infrastruc-
ture

Building new airports 

in metropolitan areas. 

Developing regional air-

ports. 

Category 2: Using 
ground transpor-
tation alternatives

Building high-speed, 

intercity ground 
transportation. 

Connecting nearby air-

ports with high speed 
ground transpor-
tation. 

Description 

This measure involves new airports within metropolitan areas to pro-
vide  additional  capacity,  especially  where  the  existing  airport  has 
little  expansion  potential.  This  measure  has  recent  limited  use 
since only two major new airports—at Dallas-Fort Worth and Den-
ver—have been built in large metropolitan areas since 1973. 

Existing  regional  airports  located  within  50  miles  of  metropolitan 
hubs  would  be  developed  to  take  advantage  of  unused  system  ca-
pacity. A regional approach is in place at several airports including 
Boston  Logan  and  is  being  contemplated  in  other  areas  such  as 
New York and Los Angeles.

Building  high-speed  ground  transportation  (e.g.,  rail)  between  popu-
lous  cities  within  200  miles  of  each  other  may  free  up  capacity  at 
congested airports by reducing the air traffic demand at those loca-
tions. Such trains could travel at speeds of 200 mph or more. Tech-
nologically,  high-speed  rail  has  proven  successful  in  Europe  and 
Asia;  efforts  are  under  way  in  the  United  States  to  develop  high-
speed rail in several designated corridors. 

Using high-speed ground transportation to connect congested airports 
with  underused  airports  nearby  could  accommodate  passenger 
transfers  within  the  current  hub-and-spoke  system.  This  measure 
has not been done in the United States. 

Source: GAO analysis of previous studies 
The applicability of any particular option is likely to vary by location, considering 
the circumstances at each major airport. There is no ‘‘one-size fits-all’’ solution; rath-
er,  substantially  reducing  delays  will  probably  require  a  combination  of  options 
spread out over time. For example, the airspace surrounding the greater New York 
metropolitan  area  is  perhaps  the  most  congested  airspace  in  the  Nation.  The  three 
major airports in the area (La Guardia, Newark, and Kennedy), which currently are 
among the nation’s most delay-prone airports, are expected to continue to experience 
substantial air traffic growth. But these airports have very limited expansion poten-
tial, largely because they cannot realistically build new runways. Building new air-
ports or developing regional airports to serve these airports are long-term solutions 
that  will  likely  take  many  years  to  materialize.  In  the  meantime,  other  short-term 
options  would  need  to  be  considered  as  passenger  demand  increases,  such  as  ways 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  14:42 May 04, 2006 Jkt 027295 PO 00000 Frm 00042 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\27295.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

39

to use existing facilities more efficiently. This is the direction that FAA and the New 
York/New Jersey Port Authority, which operates the three area airports, were mov-
ing before the drop in passenger demand following the events of September 11. 

As demand and delay are once again increasing, the FAA and Port Authority are 
reevaluating  a  regional  approach  to  addressing  these  issues.  As  noted  earlier,  FAA 
and  the  Port  Authority  are  also  considering  market-based  and  administrative  ap-
proaches,  such  as  auctioning  off  landing  and  take-off  rights  and  congestion  pricing 
for  La  Guardia.  However,  the  airlines  oppose  auctions  because  of  the  uncertainty 
regarding  the  number  of  slots  and  gates  that  they  might  receive.  The  airlines  also, 
to a lesser degree, oppose a market-based mechanism such as congestion pricing be-
cause of concerns over who would have responsibility for the revenue generated. Be-
cause  major  airports  in  other  locations  may  face  different  circumstances  than  the 
New  York  airports  face,  they  may  need  an  entirely  different  set  of  solutions  to  ad-
dress flight delays. 

Options—such  as  building  new  airports,  developing  regional  airports,  or  using 
ground transportation alternatives—are likely to be a more daunting challenge than 
implementing  initiatives  in  the  OEP.  Implementing  the  OEP’s  initiatives  will  not 
be  easy,  but  the  opportunity  for  success  is  enhanced  because  FAA  has  the  support 
of  major  aviation  stakeholders  on  nearly  all  of  the  initiatives.  By  contrast,  gaining 
consensus  on  any  of  these  other  options  could  be  much  more  difficult  because  they 
change  the  nature  of  the  system  to  the  degree  that  each  one  could  adversely  affect 
the interests of one or more key aviation stakeholder groups—including passengers; 
air  carriers;  and  aircraft  operators,  airports,  and  local  communities.  For  example,
• Large infrastructure projects, such as building new airports that are located in 
metropolitan  areas,  could  create  major  controversy.  Such  projects  are  often  op-
posed by adjacent communities that are fearful of noise, displacement, or other 
environmental concerns. Also, finding suitable sites for such projects in crowded 
metropolitan  areas—with  enough  land  that  is  compatible  with  other  potential 
land  uses—may  be  difficult.  Airlines  may  oppose  some  types  of  infrastructure 
projects if they fear that the projects would adversely affect them. For example, 
an airline with a dominant market position at a major hub airport may oppose 
building  an  additional  airport  nearby  because  the  dominant  carrier  may  view 
it  as  an  opportunity  for  their  competitors  to  enter  the  market  in  that  area.  In 
addition,  some  airlines  are  concerned  about  the  need  to  divide  their  hub  re-
sources between the current airport and a new airport.

• Administrative,  regulatory,  and  other  measures  for  managing  the  demand  for 
existing  capacity  could  generate  opposition  from  various  sources  as  well.  Air-
lines may oppose such measures if they perceive that these measures would re-
strict  their  choices  in  determining  rates,  schedules,  and  aircraft  sizes—all  of 
which could affect their profits and competitive status relative to other airlines. 
Smaller  communities  may  also  oppose  such  measures,  fearing  that  commercial 
air  service  to  and  from  their  airports  may  be  reduced  or  curtailed  because  air-
lines  would  react  by  choosing  more  profitable  routes  for  the  limited  number  of 
airport slots available.

• Cost,  a  factor  to  be  weighed  in  adding  runways  to  existing  airports,  is  also  an 
important  consideration  when  building  a  new  airport.  For  example,  the  last 
major  new  airport—the  Denver  International  Airport  completed  in  1995—cost 
almost  $5  billion  to  build.  This  cost  would  have  been  greater  had  the  airport 
been located closer to the city, but since it was located on open land away from 
established communities, the costs of noise mitigation and other land-use issues 
were  minimized.  Also,  the  construction  of  fast-rail  service  in  populated  metro-
politan  corridors  is  likely  to  be  costly.  For  example,  Amtrak  estimates  the  cost 
to  construct  fast-rail  service  in  Federally  designated,  high-speed  corridors  and 
the Northeast Corridor of the United States will be about $50 billion to $70 bil-
lion.

In summary, the initiatives implemented by FAA, airlines, and the airports might 
help  to  reduce  flight  delays  and  increase  capacity  in  the  national  airspace  system 
in  the  short  term.  However,  FAA  and  other  aviation  stakeholders  continue  to  face 
a number of challenges in reducing delays at the most delay-prone airports and de-
veloping  long  term  solutions  for  enhancing  capacity.  Addressing  these  challenges  is 
perhaps more difficult today in comparison to 2000 because a number of issues have 
exacerbated  the  situation.  Chief  among  them  is  funding  these  initiatives  during  a 
time when the Federal Government and the aviation industry are experiencing sig-
nificant fiscal problems. Consequently, keeping up with the economy’s increasing de-
mand for air transportation services will require a tremendous amount of planning; 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  14:42 May 04, 2006 Jkt 027295 PO 00000 Frm 00043 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\27295.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

40

making  some  tough  choices  about  which  initiatives,  both  short-term  and  long-term, 
to pursue; and efforts to ensure that such initiatives are adequately funded. 

For  further  information  on  this  testimony  please  contact  Dr.  Gerald  Dillingham 
by  email  at  dillinghamg@gao.gov  or  Tammy  Conquest  at  conquestt@gao.gov.  Alter-
natively,  we  can  be  reached  by  phone  at  (202)  512–2834.  Individuals  making  key 
contributions  to  this  testimony  include  Colin  Fallon,  Simon  Galed,  David  Hooper, 
Maureen Luna-Long, Richard Scott, Laura Shumway, and Nicolas Zitelli. 

APPENDIX I: LIST OF 35 AIRPORTS IN THE FEDERAL AVIATION ADMINISTRATION’S 

OPERATION EVOLUTION PLAN, FEBRUARY 2005

1. Atlanta Hartsfield International 
2. Baltimore-Washington International 
3. Boston Logan International 
4. Charlotte/Douglas International 
5. Chicago Midway 
6. Chicago O’Hare International 
7. Cincinnati-Northern Kentucky 
8. Cleveland-Hopkins International 
9. Dallas-Fort Worth International 
10. Denver International 
11. Detroit Metro Wayne County 
12. Fort Lauderdale-Hollywood International 
13. George Bush Intercontinental 
14. Greater Pittsburgh International 
15. Honolulu International 
16. Lambert St. Louis International 
17. Las Vegas McCarran International 
18. Los Angeles International 
19. Memphis International 
20. Miami International 
21. Minneapolis-St Paul International 
22. New York John F. Kennedy International 
23. New York LaGuardia 
24. Newark International 
25. Orlando International 
26. Philadelphia International 
27. Phoenix Sky Harbor International 
28. Portland International 
29. Ronald Reagan National 
30. Salt Lake City International 
31. San Diego International Lindbergh 
32. San Francisco International 
33. Seattle-Tacoma International 
34. Tampa International 
35. Washington Dulles International

Senator BURNS. Thank you, and we appreciate your report. 
Now we’ll hear from Mr. Amr ElSawy, Senior Vice President and 
General Manager of the MITRE Corporation. Thank you for coming 
this morning. 
STATEMENT  OF  AMR  A.  ELSAWY,  SENIOR  VICE  PRESIDENT/
GENERAL  MANAGER  OF  THE  CENTER  FOR  ADVANCED
AVIATION SYSTEM DEVELOPMENT, MITRE CORPORATION 
Mr. ELSAWY. Thank you, Mr. Chairman and Senator Burns, good 
morning. Thank you, Senator Nelson. In addressing the Committee 
today in my prepared remarks, I talk about four topics: Traffic and 
delay trends, factors contributing to the increased system duplicity, 
how the aviation community is responding; and finally, specific ac-
tions that we must pursue in order to meet the forecasted demand 
and maintain global leadership. 

As  the  Administrator,  Inspector  General  and  Dr.  Dillingham 
have  highlighted,  there  is  a  lot  going  on.  There’s  a  lot  of  changes 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  14:42 May 04, 2006 Jkt 027295 PO 00000 Frm 00044 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\27295.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

41

that  have  been  implemented,  improvements  have  been—are  in 
place;  and  the  challenges  have  been  described  extremely  well.  So 
I would ask that my prepared statement be included in the record. 
But  I’d  like  to  focus  this  morning  on  how  do  we  meet  the  future 
challenges.  In  order  to  meet  the  challenges  of  the  future,  the  FAA 
and the aviation community need to be flexible, agile and adaptive 
to  the  very  changing  set  of  circumstances,  requirements  and  de-
mands. We must continue to implement changes in technology, pro-
cedures,  avionics  and  policy  that  can  together  increase  operational 
efficiency  and  productivity;  and  we  believe  that  the  following  ac-
tions are required to achieve those goals. 

Specifically, first, as the Administrator mentioned, relying on the 
aircraft  capabilities  and  avionics  to  implement  a  roadmap  or  per-
formance-based  navigation  is  extremely  significant.  This  is  a  most 
significant  change  because  it  is  equivalent  to  adding  precise  navi-
gation  lanes  in  the  sky  without  requiring  greater  ground-based 
equipment. 

Moving  to  a  performance-based  system  will  transform  the  way 
that the National Airspace System operates by taking advantage of 
the  aircraft’s  flight  management  system  in  avionics.  Area  Naviga-
tion and Required Navigation Performance procedures lead to safe-
ty, efficiency and capacity improvements, especially in complex and 
congested airspace such as Atlanta and the Eastern United States. 
Over  200  procedures  are  being  planned  for  implementation  over 
the next few years. The initial RNP procedure implementation will 
be in New York’s Kennedy, Reagan National, and Houston Airport. 
The  FAA’s  addressing  key  challenges  to  ensure  these  procedures 
are  implemented  expeditiously  by  streamlining  both  FAA  and  in-
dustry  processes.  I  emphasize  the  collaboration  required  in  those 
areas. 

This  will  provide  direct  operating  benefits  to  customers  and  will 
enable the FAA to reduce the size, complexity and cost of its infra-
structure to selective divestment of ground-based navigational aids. 
Second  action  is  to  accelerate  the  implementation  of  airspace 
changes—we’ve  heard  a  lot  about  that  this  morning—to  be  more 
flexible and to accommodate the expected growth in traffic and new 
airspace  users,  such  as  unmanned  area  vehicles.  Again,  this  has 
the  real  effect  of  streamlining  flows  into  congested  areas  and  pro-
viding  more  efficient,  reliable  arrival  and  departure  paths  for  all 
users. 

Third action, emphasize enhancement of automation and decision 
support  tools  to  enable  controllers  to  handle  more  traffic  by  pre-
senting  them  with  automated  conflict-free  resolutions,  thereby  in-
creasing  system  capacity  and  productivity  and  improving  safety 
and the quality of the services provided to customers. 

Fourth,  develop  a  firm  plan  for  the  implementation  of  air-to-
ground  data  link  that  will  enable  controllers  and  pilots  and  their 
respective  ground  and  onboard  aircraft  automation  systems  to  ex-
change digital messages that yield efficiency, productivity and safe-
ty improvements. 

Fifth,  improve  traffic  flow  management  capabilities,  such  as  ac-
cess to timely and accurate information, especially for unscheduled 
flights.  That  will  permit  the  FAA  to  identify  and  solve  congestion 
problems more quickly and efficiently. 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  14:42 May 04, 2006 Jkt 027295 PO 00000 Frm 00045 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\27295.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

42

Sixth, transition to a new technology, Automatic Dependent Sur-
veillance-Broadcast. This is equivalent to providing pilots with elec-
tronic eyes in the sky and will permit the FAA to migrate to a less 
costly  and  more  accurate  surveillance  system.  By  relying  on  air-
craft avionics and the power of satellite navigation, we can improve 
situational  awareness  for  the  pilots,  allowing  better  access  and  ef-
fective  communications  about  weather  and  terrain.  We  can  also 
achieve  capacity  and  performance  under  instrument  flight  rules, 
which are only possible today under visual flight rules. 

The  positive  experience  and  the  results  shown  by  the  Capstone 
Phase I program in Alaska are achievable in the rest of the United 
States. 

Seventh,  use  advanced  simulation  technologies  to  train  the  new 
controller  workforce.  This  will  reduce  the  time  and  cost  needed  to 
train controllers and will improve trainee proficiency and readiness 
to implement the advanced concept we talked about. 

Eighth, maintain a strategic view of investments in airport infra-
structure and runways. The Administrator, Inspector General, and 
Mr. Dillingham have all emphasized that point. 

Ninth, develop a comprehensive air traffic infrastructure consoli-
dation  plan.  To  the  extent  that  we  have  an  aging  infrastructure 
that adds to the cost, we need to figure out how to reduce that; and 
with  the  technologies  that  we  discussed,  that  will  be  extremely 
achievable. 

And  finally,  develop  and  implement  policies  that  enable  en-
hanced access to airports through the use of modern and improved 
avionics and procedures instead of ground-based infrastructure. 

These  actions  will  position  us  to  meet  ever-increasing  demands 
and  have  the  potential  for  improving  overall  productivity  between 
20 percent and 40 percent while reducing future operating costs by 
several hundred million dollars per year. 

Over the next year MITRE will be working the FAA’s Air Traffic 
Organization  and  Joint  Planning  and  Development  Office  to  simu-
late and validate the productivity and development cost savings. 

Mr. Chairman, implementing these changes will keep the United 
States as innovators and leaders of the global aviation community; 
and we have a lot of opportunities ahead. 

Thank you, Mr. Chairman. 
[The prepared statement of Mr. ElSawy follows:]

PREPARED STATEMENT OF AMR A.  ELSAWY,  SENIOR VICE PRESIDENT/GENERAL
MANAGER OF THE CENTER FOR ADVANCED AVIATION SYSTEM DEVELOPMENT,
MITRE CORPORATION 
Mr. Chairman, Senator Rockefeller, and Members of the Subcommittee, thank you 
for  inviting  me  to  appear  before  your  Committee.  My  name  is  Amr  ElSawy  and  I 
am a Senior Vice President at the MITRE Corporation. I am also the General Man-
ager  of  MITRE’s  Center  for  Advanced  Aviation  System  Development  (CAASD), 
which  is  the  FAA’s  Federally  Funded  Research  and  Development  Center  (FFRDC). 
I would ask that my statement be included in the record. 

In  addressing  the  Committee  today,  I  will  focus  on  four  topics:  Traffic  and  delay 
trends,  factors  contributing  to  the  increased  system  complexity,  how  the  aviation 
community  is  responding,  and  finally  specific  actions  that  we  must  pursue  in  order 
to  meet  the  forecasted  demand  and  maintain  global  leadership  in  aviation  safety, 
capacity and efficiency. 

Traffic levels and delays have returned to levels seen prior to 9/11 in many areas 
of  the  country.  These  areas  include  airports  in  Chicago,  Atlanta,  the  Washington 
area,  the  New  York  area,  Las  Vegas,  and  south  Florida.  There  have  also  been  in-

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  14:42 May 04, 2006 Jkt 027295 PO 00000 Frm 00046 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\27295.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

43

creases in traffic in smaller airports in many areas of the country. Examples include 
Scottsdale,  Teterboro,  and  West  Palm  Beach.  Traffic  in  major  en  route  corridors  is 
also generating congestion not just due to higher traffic volume, but also as a result 
of increasing traffic pattern complexity. 

The following factors have created challenges that are different than those experi-

enced in 1999 and 2000. For example:

NAS will face its usual severe convective weather challenges.

• Regional  jets  have  replaced  larger  jets  and  turboprop  aircraft  resulting  in  dif-
ferent  traffic  flows  and  mix  which  require  changes  in  operational  techniques 
and strategies.
• North/south  traffic  flows  have  increased  in  the  winter  months  changing  how 
traffic  flows  must  be  managed  around  ceiling  and  visibility  constraints.  Un-
scheduled traffic has grown in south Florida and the Southwest.
• For  the  coming  summer  season,  traffic  growth  is  expected  at  Houston,  and  the 
• Traffic  increases  in  areas  such  as  New  York  and  Washington  with  airports  in 
close proximity to each other resulted in greater complexity due to traffic climb-
ing, descending, and crossing other traffic in the same airspace.
• Denser overhead traffic streams in areas such as the Chicago/New York corridor 
create  challenges  in  merging  the  departing  aircraft  into  already  full  traffic 
streams.
• Increased security operations (such as Combat Air Patrol and Temporary Flight 
Restrictions)  have  also  generated  challenges  in  accommodating  higher  volume 
and  more  complex  traffic  around  restricted  areas  such  as  within  the  New  York 
and Washington airspace, as well as during major events.

The FAA and aviation community have responded to these new challenges in such 

a way that performance across the NAS is good by most measures:

• The  airport  and  customer  community  and  the  FAA  worked  together  on  actions 
to minimize delays resulting from major growth at Chicago’s O’Hare and Wash-
ington’s Dulles Airport. Emerging issues resulting from growth at airports such 
as Fort Lauderdale and Las Vegas are being actively worked.
• The  FAA,  the  airports,  and  lead  carriers  have  increased  airport  capacity 
through the development of new arrival and departure procedures that use air-
craft  navigation  capabilities.  For  example,  new  area  navigation  (RNAV)  depar-
ture  procedures  were  implemented  at  Atlanta’s  Hartsfield  Airport.  In  addition, 
new  procedures  are  being  implemented  at  Dulles,  Las  Vegas,  Portland,  Phila-
delphia, Dallas Fort Worth, and South Florida.
• Airspace  changes  have  also  been  worked  collaboratively  to  relieve  congestion 
points in new ‘‘hot-spots’’ such as south Florida. In addition, the vertical separa-
tion  minima  have  been  successfully  reduced  in  high  altitude  airspace  and  are 
providing controllers with more flexibility to move the traffic.
• The  FAA  has  been  continually  refining  procedures  and  actions  in  conjunction 
with the customer community to manage traffic flows to minimize delays when 
congestion does occur.
• The FAA worked in collaboration with organizations that provide flight services 
for  unscheduled  operations  to  receive  more  timely  and  more  accurate  informa-
tion on planned flights.

Beyond  this  year,  commercial  and  general  aviation  will  continue  to  see  changes. 
The  NAS  will  likely  continue  to  see  traffic  growth,  changes  in  the  traffic  patterns 
between  major  airports  and  metropolitan  areas,  and  changes  in  the  mix  of  aircraft 
that  make  up  the  traffic.  In  addition,  unmanned  aerial  vehicles  (UAV),  very  light 
jets, and commercial space launches will need to be accommodated in the NAS, with 
each  bringing  their  own  challenges  for  the  operation  of  airspace,  controller  work-
load,  system  complexity,  and  overall  operational  productivity.  Projections  developed 
by  DOT,  FAA  and  MITRE  (and  documented  in  the  Capacity  Needs  in  the  National 
Airspace  System)  indicate  that  by  2013,  15  airports  and  7  metropolitan  areas  will 
need additional capacity to meet expected demand. 

In  order  to  meet  the  challenges  of  the  future,  the  FAA  and  the  aviation  commu-
nity  need  to  be  flexible  and  agile  in  adapting  to  changing  requirements  and  de-
mands.  We  must  implement  changes  in  technology,  procedures,  avionics,  and  policy 
that  can—together—increase  operational  efficiency  and  productivity.  We  believe 
that the following actions will be required to achieve those goals: 

Take  advantage  of  aircraft  capabilities  and  avionics  to  implement  the 
Roadmap for Performance-based Navigation. This is a most significant change 
because  it  is  equivalent  to  adding  precise  navigation  lanes  in  the  sky  without  re-

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  14:42 May 04, 2006 Jkt 027295 PO 00000 Frm 00047 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\27295.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

44

quiring ground based equipment. Moving to a performance based system will trans-
form  the  way  the  National  Airspace  System  (NAS)  operates.  By  taking  advantage 
of  the  aircraft’s  flight  management  systems  and  avionics,  Area  Navigation  (RNAV) 
and  Required  Navigation  Performance  (RNP)  procedures  lead  to  safety,  efficiency 
and  capacity  improvements,  especially  in  complex  and  congested  airspace  such  as 
Atlanta, and the Eastern United States. Over 200 procedures are being planned for 
implementation  over  the  next  few  years.  The  initial  RNP  procedure  implementa-
tions  will  be  in  New  York’s  Kennedy,  Reagan  National,  and  Houston  airports.  FAA 
is  addressing  key  challenges  to  ensure  these  procedures  are  implemented  expedi-
tiously  by  streamlining  both  FAA  and  industry  processes.  This  will  provide  direct 
operating  benefits  to  customers  and  will  enable  the  FAA  to  reduce  the  size,  com-
plexity, and cost of its infrastructure through selective divestments of ground-based 
navigation aids. 

Accelerate the implementation of Airspace changes to be more flexible, and 
to  accommodate  the  expected  growth  in  traffic  and  new  airspace  users  such  as 
UAVs.  Again  this  has  the  real  effect  of  streamlining  traffic  flows  into  congested 
areas and providing more efficient arrival and departure paths for all users. 

Emphasize  enhancement  of  automation  and  decision  support  tools  to  en-
able  controllers  to  handle  more  traffic  by  presenting  them  with  automated-conflict 
free resolutions, thereby increasing system capacity and productivity and improving 
safety and the quality of service provided to customers. 

Develop  a  firm  plan  for  the  implementation  of  air/ground  data  link  that 
will  enable  controllers  and  pilots,  and  their  respective  ground  and  onboard  aircraft 
automation systems, to exchange digital messages that yield efficiency, productivity, 
and safety improvements. 

Improve traffic flow management capabilities, such as access to more timely 
and accurate information (e.g., for unscheduled flights), will permit the FAA to iden-
tify and solve congestion problems more quickly and efficiently. 

Transition to Automatic Dependent Surveillance-Broadcast—This is equiv-
alent  to  providing  pilots  with  electronic  eyes  in  the  sky  and  will  permit  the  FAA 
to migrate to a less costly and more accurate surveillance system. By relying on air-
craft  avionics  and  the  power  of  satellite  navigation,  we  can  improve  situational 
awareness  for  pilots,  allowing  better  access  and  effective  communication  about 
weather  and  terrain.  We  can  also  achieve  capacity  and  performance  under  instru-
ment  flight  rules  (IFR),  which  are  only  possible  today  under  visual  flight  rules 
(VFR). The positive experience and results shown by the Capstone Phase I program 
in Alaska are achievable in the rest of the United States. 

Use  advanced  simulation  technologies  to  train  the  new  controller  work-
force.  This  will  reduce  the  time  and  cost  needed  to  train  controllers  and  will  im-
prove  trainee  proficiency  and  readiness  to  implement  advanced  concepts  of  oper-
ation. 

Maintain  a  strategic  view  of  investments  in  airport  infrastructure  and 
runways. We must continue to build runways and improve taxiways to stay ahead 
of the demand. 

Develop a comprehensive air traffic infrastructure consolidation plan.
Develop  and  implement  polices  that  enable  enhanced  access  to  airports 
through  the  use  of  modern  and  improved  avionics  and  procedures  instead 
of ground based infrastructure.

These  actions  will  position  us  to  meet  ever  increasing  demands  and  have  the  po-
tential for improving overall productivity between 20 and 40 percent while reducing 
future  operating  costs  by  several  hundred  million  dollars  per  year.  Over  the  next 
year,  MITRE  will  be  working  with  FAA’s  ATO  and  JPDO  to  simulate  and  validate 
the productivity and cost saving estimates. 

Implementing  these  changes  will  keep  the  United  States  as  innovators  and  lead-

ers of the Global aviation community. We have a lot of opportunities ahead. 

Thank you, Mr. Chairman. I would be happy to answer questions.

Senator BURNS. Thank you for your testimony, and I’ve just been 
handed  a  note  by  our  Chairman.  He  has  an  obligation  at  11  that 
is  sort  of  a  must,  and  I’m  going  to  give  way  to  Senator  Stevens. 
Senator Pryor’s joined us. 

Do you have a statement? 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  14:42 May 04, 2006 Jkt 027295 PO 00000 Frm 00048 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\27295.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

45

STATEMENT OF HON. MARK PRYOR,

U.S. SENATOR FROM ARKANSAS 

tion. 

Senator  PRYOR.  No.  I’m  anxious  to  hear  Senator  Stevens’s  ques-

Senator BURNS. Thank you very much. I’m not too anxious to go 

to the end, but we are going to anyway. Senator Stevens. 

The  CHAIRMAN.  Thank  you  very  much,  and  I’m  sorry,  but  we  do 
have  a  conference  on  allocations  of  funds,  appropriations  and 
it’s——

That  leads  me  to  my  first  question,  Ms.  Blakey.  We  had  a  long 
discussion  about  the  concept  of  up-front  money  and  paying  it  off 
over  a  period  of  years,  a  concept  of  creating  some  sort  of  an  entity 
that would bond and go to the general market to get funds and be 
repaid through the normal flow of funds to FAA. 

Have we come anywhere close to that yet? 
Ms.  BLAKEY.  After  your  initial  discussion  about  this  in  January, 
certainly  we  began  looking  at  this  very  carefully;  and  we  held  a 
forum  at  the  end  of  April  where  we  were  looking  at  the  various 
ways  to  approach  changing  the  funding  structure  for  the  Trust 
Fund  and  also  looking  at  the  challenges  there.  We  also  brought  in 
a  number  of  the  analysts  from  the  financial  community  who  were 
real  experts  on  the  issue  of  bonding  and  debt  financing  and  how 
it  can  be  approached;  and  I  was  very  encouraged  by  the  number 
of  ways  that  this  can  be  addressed,  even  in  a  government  context. 
I will also tell you that it was very interesting because we invited 
the  Tennessee  Valley  Authority,  the  TVA,  which  is  one  of  the  ex-
amples  where  debt  financing  is  being  used  in  the  Federal  Govern-
ment arena. And again, they talked about what this has made pos-
sible  in  terms  of  capital  investment  in  the  Tennessee  Valley.  It’s 
very impressive. 

I  can’t  tell  you  where  we  may  go  at  this  point  from  the  stand-
point  of  proposals;  but  we’re  looking  forward  very  much  to  sitting 
down  with  you  and  others  to  discuss  what  the  potential  could  be. 
But  this  is  obviously  one  of  the  ways  you  can  have  a  large  trough 
of up-front capital to invest in the Next Generation System to real-
ly begin to get the benefits of that and lower the unit costs, which 
is something we all want to do when we’re talking three times the 
travel. 

The CHAIRMAN. If we look at the myriad of instances in our Fed-
eral  Government  where  immediate  up-front  capital  is  needed  for 
modernization  and  look  at  the  Federal  budget,  it’s  really  not  pos-
sible to achieve what we have to do in a short period of time with-
out charting a concept similar to TVA in several different places in 
the government and relying on private capital to come in and take 
part of the risk; but actually, they will be relying upon the contin-
ued  level  of  existing  appropriations  in  various  areas  to  repay  the 
bonds to be issued. 

I still think that that’s the only way to accomplish what we have 
to  do  in  aviation,  and  I  would—I  think  Chairman  Barton  and  I 
would  be  pleased  to  call  a  summit  between  literally  everybody  to 
sit  down  and  work  out  something  jointly  so  we  can  introduce—to 
start this on its road. 

I think we absolutely have to have that money up front; and you 
have to know how much you have before you can really solidly fol-

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  14:42 May 04, 2006 Jkt 027295 PO 00000 Frm 00049 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\27295.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

46

low  Mr.  Mead’s  suggestions  that  some  of  them—maybe  not  all  of 
them, Mr. Mead—but most of them; and I think he’s been very as-
tute  in  pointing  out  the  areas  of  real  concern;  and  there  has  to  be 
some prioritization on that. But I do hope we can get to that point. 
I  want  to  applaud  what  you’ve  done  in  terms  of  Reagan  Airport. 
I  think  that  solution,  if  it  works,  ought  to  be  looked  at  to  see  how 
we  might  regulate  the  use  of  general  aviation  at  some  of  these 
highly  congested  places.  Now,  they  may  not  like  to  hear  that,  but 
there’s  just  too  many  new  business  jets  coming  online  for  you  to—
and put them fully into the total freedom of the airways system as 
it’s existed in the past. 

I  think  we’ll  have  to  find  some  way  to  prioritize  flights  and  to 
have  some  flights—some  entities  know  how  many  flights  a  week 
they  can  have  in  a  certain  airport,  rather  than  just  an  announce-
ment  that  they’re  coming  2  hours  from  now.  That  concept  of  ad-
vanced  planning  has  got  to  come  into  this.  Am  I  right?  Mr.  Mead, 
do you disagree? 

Mr. MEAD. No, sir. No, sir. 
The CHAIRMAN. Are we going to have to move to a satellite-based 
system for your communications? Are we going to change our basic 
concept  of  communications  as  these  new  technologies  tumble  in 
communications?  Are  you  going  to  broadband?  Are  you  going  to 
save  your  existing  system?  What’s  going  to  be  the  basic  commu-
nications concept for your airwaves into the future? 

Ms.  BLAKEY.  I  think  there’s  no  question  about  the  fact  we  will 
be moving very significantly to a satellite-based system; and we, of 
course,  are  looking  at  the  communications  issues  in  terms  of  spec-
trum and what will be required. We have a real expert at the table 
in Amr ElSawy. 

Amr, you might want to address that. 
Mr.  ELSAWY.  Thank  you,  ma’am.  I  think  the  answer  is,  we’ll 
have  to  use  multiple  communications  systems.  Satellite  commu-
nications is an integral part of the future concept. ADS-B is an in-
tegral link, is an integral part of the concept. 

As we move to the future with routing technologies and Internet 
technologies, we are able to, in fact, have every element of it be ad-
dressable with an address so that we can know where it is; and we 
can  direct  communications  to  it.  And  I  think  that  broadband  com-
munications,  satellite  communications,  ADS-B  are  all  elements  of 
the future—for the future concept. 

The CHAIRMAN. Well, what you choose will really have an impact 
on  the  modernization  of  some  of  the  aircraft,  right?  I  think  you 
have  to  be—people  have  to  know  in  advance  what  you’re  going  to 
do. 

Mr. ELSAWY. Precisely. 
The  CHAIRMAN.  Let  me  thank  you  for  your  comment  about  Cap-

stone. 

Mr. Mead, did you ever look into the Medallion program in Alas-
ka as far as safety is concerned? Are you familiar with what we’ve 
done up there? 

Mr.  MEAD.  I’m  not  familiar  with  the  term  Medallion,  but  I  am 

familiar with Capstone and ADS-B. 

The  CHAIRMAN.  Medallion  is  a  voluntary  concept  that  was 
worked  out  with  Ms.  Blakey,  and  it  is  a  concept  of  continued  up-

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  14:42 May 04, 2006 Jkt 027295 PO 00000 Frm 00050 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\27295.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

47

grading  of  pilot  skills  and  commitment  of  the  entities  that  own 
these aircraft to the expenditures that are necessary to accomplish 
that. 

We  have  reduced  our  fatalities  in  aviation  dramatically;  and  we 
have increased awareness of not only the pilots and the basic oper-
ators  but  of  the  public,  of  the  things  that  must  be  done  to  reduce 
the  fatalities  in  aviation  in  our  state  where,  as  you  know,  we  only 
have  one  main  road  system.  We  depend  either  on  air  or  water  for 
basic  transportation.  Seventy-five  percent  of  all  travel  in  Alaska  is 
done by air. 

But I think you should study it and see if we can’t take that out 
into  other  areas  where  they  have  substantial  amounts  of  general 
aviation  and  make—this  is  a  system  for  general  awareness  of—of 
the things that can be done to make flying safer. 

Mr.  MEAD.  I  think  that  program  in  Alaska  has  tremendous 
merit. I really think it is the wave for the future. The only sad part 
about  it  is  it  took  so  long  to  get  started.  There  was  a  fair  amount 
of resistance. 

The CHAIRMAN. A little bit of money helped. 
Mr. MEAD. Money always helps. 
The  CHAIRMAN.  I  think  Congress  would  be  perfectly  willing  to 
put  that  up.  That  was  not  that  much  money.  After  that  it  became 
all voluntary support, not Federal money now. Isn’t that right, Ms. 
Blakey? 

Ms.  BLAKEY.  Absolutely.  I  must  tell  you,  Mr.  Chairman,  we  in-
vited  the  Capstone  Foundation  down  this  spring  to  join  a  group  of 
carriers that do not have scheduled service. Whereas, you know we 
are  having  some  challenges  in  the  lower  48  these  days.  We  really 
felt  that  the  Medallion  Program  was  a  great  example  of  how  you 
can  incentivize  the  private  carriers  to  really  step  up  the  pace  on 
the safety front. 

The CHAIRMAN. I have a few of my friends coming up to join me 
for  a  little  bit  of  marine  research  this  summer.  Maybe  we  can  ar-
range  to  have  some  meeting  there  while  we’re  there  for  them  to 
talk a little bit about Capstone and about Medallion. They may be 
able to take it home with them. 

Thank you very much, Mr. Chairman. 
Senator  BURNS.  In  other  words  and  where  I’d  say,  we’re  going 

fishing. Senator Nelson. 

Senator  BEN NELSON.  Thank  you,  Mr.  Chairman.  Thank  you, 
Senator Burns. My question with regard to the short-term response 
to congestion that we might be facing this summer or that we have 
faced  is—I  am  thinking  of  capacity  issues  at  O’Hare,  just  as  one 
example,  since  many  of  the  flights  coming  into  and  from  Omaha 
and Lincoln will go through Chicago as a hub. 

Now, my first question is: When there is a backup and flights are 
getting  canceled  or  delayed,  how  is  it  determined  which  ones  to 
cancel  or  delay?  Is  it  based  on  the  size  of  the  airplane  and  the  ca-
pacity—the  passenger  capacity?  Is  it  based  on  where  the  flight  is 
coming  from  or  going  to?  Is  pain  shared  equally?  Is  it  based  on 
smaller airports versus larger airports? What is—how is the deter-
mination made for those decisions? 

I  would—I  guess,  Ms.  Blakey,  you  probably  are  under  some  du-

ress to make those decisions or help airports establish priorities. 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  14:42 May 04, 2006 Jkt 027295 PO 00000 Frm 00051 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\27295.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

48

Ms.  BLAKEY.  Well,  I’ll  tell  you,  we  certainly  have  paid  a  great 
deal of attention to the issue of service to smaller communities and 
trying to make sure there was an equitable approach in the system 
where we have had, in effect, limited capacity. Most of our airports, 
of  course,  we  have  not  had  to  do  that;  but  O’Hare  is  an  example 
where  we  were  forced  into  that;  and  we  are  talking  about  essen-
tially  88  arrivals  an  hour  in  that  congested  period.  That  is  to  say, 
there was a very definite concern and a good bit of discussion given 
to making sure that the smaller communities remain served. 

The specific decisions, though, about which flights are delayed or 
canceled  are  those  of  the  airlines.  The  carriers  themselves  look  at 
what  is  happening  in  terms  of  delays  at  that  airport.  They  realize 
that  maybe  we’re  only  getting  62  flights  an  hour  out  instead  of  88 
because of low ceilings or other kinds of problems. 

As  you  know,  O’Hare  has  wind  problems  and  bad  weather;  and 
it is at that point that the carriers themselves have to look at such 
things  as  the  load  factor  onboard  the  aircraft,  how  many  people, 
where’s it going, do they have backup service there, and will there 
be  another  flight  in  an  hour  or  two.  All  those  are  kinds  of  things 
the airline itself and the dispatcher makes the decisions. 

Senator  BEN NELSON.  Is  there  any  oversight  over  their  deter-
mination?  In  other  words,  if  our  concern  is  for  equitable  consider-
ation,  is  that  applied  to  their  decision-making  process  and  the  re-
sults of that process? 

Mr. MEAD. I think there’s very little oversight of the airline deci-

sion-making process on what flights to cancel. 

Senator  BEN NELSON.  Do  you  have  any  data  that  would  show 
over  a  period  of  time  the  cancellation  of  or  delaying  of  flights  that 
might  help  us  understand  how  they—how  they’ve  decided  it  or  at 
least look at the results of their decisions? 

Mr. MEAD. I can assemble that data. 
Senator BEN NELSON. I would like to see it. 
Mr.  MEAD.  If  you  like.  And  we’ll  speak  to  your  staff  afterwards 

Omaha. 

about it. A short discussion would be helpful. 

I  also  think—there  were  really  two  parts  to  your  question.  One 
part  was,  how  do  you  get  the  flight  scheduled  in  the  first  place? 
You know, in a place like out of O’Hare or LaGuardia——

Senator  BEN NELSON.  Or  McCook  International  or  Lincoln  or 

Mr. MEAD. You have plenty of departure space in your state. It’s 
the question of getting from a hub—a place like Chicago O’Hare to 
there, especially now that Chicago O’Hare has administrative caps. 
And  I  think  the  first  part  of  your  question  had  to  do  with  how 
much  you  set  aside  for  service  to  small  communities  in  terms  of 
flights. 

The  second  part  of  your  question  is,  well,  once  you’ve  done  that 
set  aside,  and  a  decision  has  to  be  made  about  whether  to  cancel 
one flight over another, how is that decision made? 

Senator  BEN NELSON.  Well,  if  pain  is  spread  out  equitably,  I 
think  everybody  understands;  but  if  pain  is  disproportionate,  a  lot 
of folks won’t understand. Some people will be happier while other 
people will be clearly, less happy. 

And certainly in a state like Nebraska which would not—Omaha 
is not going to be in the top one or twenty-five airports; but it’s cer-

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  14:42 May 04, 2006 Jkt 027295 PO 00000 Frm 00052 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\27295.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

49

tainly number one in the State of Nebraska and Eastern Iowa; and 
Lincoln becomes important and so do all the other airports that ex-
perience Essential Air Service issues. 

So I would be very happy to see what—how this decision-making 
is  done  and  what  the  effects  of  it  are  because  I  think  that  we’re 
certainly going to look at efficiency, cost effectiveness; but we have 
to  look  at  the  equitable  treatment  of  passengers  and  communities 
as well. 

What—Ms. Blakey, what is the commitment to smaller airports? 
We  continue  to  go  through  the  battle  for  Essential  Air  Service 
funds every year, and they’re cut. We fight. We get some money in; 
the next budget comes around; and they’re cut; and we go through 
this dance every year. 

Is  there  a  commitment  to  smaller  communities  that  are,  by  na-
ture,  inefficient  but  totally  dependent  on  travel?  The  Chairman 
says about Alaska that 75 percent of their travel is related to—not 
to road transportation or surface transportation but to air transpor-
tation and water transportation. 

I don’t know how cost effective it is up there. I know it’s probably 
not  cost  effective  to  some  of  the  small  airports  in  Nebraska,  but  it 
is  essential.  That’s  where  we  go  for  these  Essential  Air  Service 
funds. What is the commitment? 

Ms. BLAKEY. Well, the Essential Air Service program is one that 
the Department is funding; and while it is a Department of Trans-
portation program, not an FAA program so I do not have direct re-
sponsibility  there,  I  can  tell  you  that  we  are  assiduously  collecting 
the overflight fees from those carriers, that overfly the U.S, mostly 
foreign flights, obviously, to be able to put up the $50 million from 
that source. 

Senator BEN NELSON. Do you think that is—it’s obviously better 
than  nothing,  and  it’s  a  lot  better  than  nothing.  How  far  off  the 
mark  would  you  say  that  this—how  much  more  would  we  need  to 
really fund Essential Air Service? 

Ms. BLAKEY. I’ve not done any analysis of this because, again, it’s 
outside my realm of responsibility; but I will tell you this, there are 
several changes in terms of what’s going on with the fleet mix that 
I  think  are  very  encouraging  to  smaller  communities  to  move  to 
smaller regional jets, which really can work out of smaller commu-
nities  and  make  it  cost  efficient  for  the  carriers  which  is,  at  the 
bottom of it, very critical. 

The move to the microjets is an example. As we’re talking about 
this  movement  to  four-  and  six-seat  small  jets,  which  are  cost  effi-
cient,  I  think  you  will  see  much  more  service  into  these  smaller 
areas. So those things I think will make a difference. 

One of the things, though, that’s a countervailing pressure is the 
fact that many of the low-cost carriers are serving relatively signifi-
cant  city  pairs.  That  means  a  lot  of  people  are  driving  instead  of 
flying  out  of  the  smaller  communities.  I  can  tell  you  when  I  sit 
down with small airport directors, they often bemoan the fact that 
they will find people in their town willing to drive 200 miles to get 
a  good  airfare  rather  than  use  the  air  service  going  out.  So  it  is 
an  issue  there  that  there  are  countervailing  pressures  that  the 
market is largely sorting out. 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  14:42 May 04, 2006 Jkt 027295 PO 00000 Frm 00053 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\27295.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

50

Senator  BEN NELSON.  My  time  has  expired.  Thank  you,  Mr. 

Chairman. 

Senator BURNS. Thank you, Senator Nelson. 
I  think  my  microphone  went  dead.  So  I’ll  just  lung  it.  I  have  a 

couple questions and a followup on what Senator Nelson said. 

We  who  live  in  rural  areas  not  only  whenever  we  start  making 
the  decisions  of—in  airports  like  O’Hare,  usually  those  decisions—
the  delay  of  persons  going  to  North  Platte,  Nebraska,  or  Omaha, 
Nebraska,  that’s  not  because  that’s  where  you  usually  terminate. 
What  happens  is,  and  when  it  gets  very  expensive  for  travelers, 
and  you  really  get  an  amount  of  humor  is  when  they  leave  North 
Platte  or  Scottsbluff  or  Omaha  and  they  can’t—and  they—they’re 
delayed getting into Chicago; and they misconnect; and then you go 
through  this  process  of  a  rebook;  and  then  that  next  flight  is  sold 
out. 

So  we’ve  got  this  big  tie-up  that  is  really—not  only  is  it  expen-
sive for the airlines, but it’s also expensive for the traveling public 
because you lose—sometimes you lose an entire day. 

In  Montana,  we’ve  got  to  make  the  early  morning  flight  or  the 
evening flight. We don’t have anything in between. So we are very, 
very  much  aware  of  those  delays  that’s  in  a  principal  or  a  major 
hub.  Minneapolis  being  mine  to  get—and  of  course  you  use  Min-
neapolis. 

But  I  wanted  to  followup  on  that  because  sometimes  I  think  we 

are—we are caught in sort of a catch–22. 

If  the  FAA  doesn’t,  say,  monitor  some  of  this,  so  to  speak;  and 
you  have  a  report  on  it,  Mr.  Mead,  I  would  be  interested  in  the 
same report; and if MITRE would have some of the same informa-
tion, I would be anxious to look at that. 

New runways, environmental streamlining continue to be a chal-
lenge  for  us.  I  guess  it  is  more  from  a  financial  end  of  it  or  eco-
nomic  end  of  it  or  the  availability  of  capital  end  of  it  rather  than 
the policies set by government. Is that a true statement? That’s for 
anybody to address if——

Dr.  DILLINGHAM.  Mr.  Chairman,  I  think  you  know,  the  things 
that  Congress  has  done  in  terms  of  streamlining  the  runway  con-
struction  process  and,  in  fact,  from  the  work  that  we’ve  done,  we 
see  that  there’s  ample  funding  for  runways.  The  problem  seems  to 
come in the local jurisdiction more than anything else. 

There tends to be a lot of groups and persons who are not enam-
ored  about  having  an  airport  in  their  area  or  runway  extension 
that may be involved with environmental issues or noise issues. So 
I think it’s the latter as opposed to the former. 

Senator  BURNS.  Do  we—does  MITRE  have  an  estimate  on  what 
those  kinds  of  discussions  and  those  kinds  of  delays,  what  it  costs 
us in the end to save—to expand an airport or to build a new one? 
Mr.  ELSAWY.  We  don’t,  sir;  but  we  would  be  happy  to  look  at  it. 
Senator BURNS. How about Ms. Blakey and the FAA? 
Ms. BLAKEY. Well, we’ve got some broad figures in terms of what 
it  has  cost  recently.  It’s  a  little  bit  hard  because  every  runway  is 
different;  so  I  don’t  want  to  extrapolate  too  much.  I  wouldn’t  want 
us to just divide this up. But the cost of the last eight runways that 
we  did  was  approximately  $1.96  billion;  and  out  of  that,  the  U.S. 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  14:42 May 04, 2006 Jkt 027295 PO 00000 Frm 00054 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\27295.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

51

Government—the  AIP  funding  was  $941  million.  So  about  half, 
roughly, is what the AIP funds put up. 

Now, for 2008 we’re expecting to have eight more runways come 
onboard.  The  price  has  jumped  way  up.  At  this  point  we  are  talk-
ing $4.75 billion for those; and again, AIP funding for this is going 
to be somewhat over a billion dollars. 

Senator  BURNS.  I  know  it’s  costly  whenever  we  start  talking 
about  getting  things  done  in  the  local  community  and  environ-
mental  rules  and  this  type  of  thing.  So  I’m  not  real  sure  we 
shouldn’t look at that. 

Our  numbers  of  traveling  people  will  almost  equal  2000  shortly. 
They may even make it in 2005; but yet even though our numbers 
are back, we have increased traffic in the air. 

Give  me  some  idea  of  the  comparison  and  the  challenge  you 
might  have  from—in  those  2  years  of  trying  to  handle  that  traffic. 
Mr. MEAD. Well, I think one example, a good one, is the regional 
jets.  Regional  jets,  of  course,  hold  fewer  people.  Back  in  2000  10 
percent  of  flights  were  regional  jet  based.  Now  they’re  32  percent. 
There’s an increase in operations there. 

Senator  Stevens  has  pointed  out  repeatedly  this  phenomena 
that’s expected to hit next year, these microjets. To buy a jet right 
now  at  the  low  end,  you’re  probably  talking  seven  or  eight  million 
dollars. There are jets that are going to be hitting the market next 
year  that  are—they  are  originally  taking  orders  for  slightly  under 
$1  million  and  are  now  up  to  about  $1.2  million.  There’s  a  lot  of 
controversy  about  where  exactly  are  these  aircraft  going  to  fly? 
Questions  also  focus  on:  Are  they  going  to  be  air  taxis?  Are  they 
going  to  be  fractional  ownership  with  business  people?  FAA  is 
going to have to deal with this. 

Now, the big difference for FAA is that these planes are not pro-
peller-driven.  So  they  are  flying  up  there  at  high  altitudes  with 
your  big  777s.  They  basically  have  the  same  impact  on  air  traffic 
control that’s quite comparable to a 777, whereas the old propeller 
planes did not. 

Ms. BLAKEY. I have to admit, I will put in a plug for the fact that 
certain  passenger  traffic  is  coming  back;  and  that’s  great.  The  fact 
of the matter is, we are seeing smaller aircraft carrying those pas-
sengers,  which  means  from  a  workload  standpoint  for  the  FAA,  it 
is  really  ramping  up;  and  that  is  something  we  all  need  to  recog-
nize because more aircraft in the sky with fewer numbers of people 
in them—obviously from our standpoint, it costs the same thing to 
move a small plane as it does a big one. 

Senator BURNS. Senator Pryor. 
Senator PRYOR. Thank you, Mr. Chairman. 
I  think  that  the  witnesses  have  given  us  a  good  sense  of  what 
some  of  the  challenges  are.  You’ve  got  some  congestion  problems; 
clearly you’ve got capacity problems, some now and maybe large ca-
pacity problems down the road. You’ve got changing circumstances 
with  these  microjets  or  very  light  jets,  I’ve  also  heard  them  called; 
and the regional jet phenomenon, even though I like those person-
ally  because  a  lot  of  those  fly  in  and  out  of  places  I  fly  in  and  out 
of. 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  14:42 May 04, 2006 Jkt 027295 PO 00000 Frm 00055 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\27295.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

52

I  understand  it  does  exacerbate  the  problem  or  at  least  it  adds 
to the circumstances in which you have to deal because they occupy 
airspace, ground space, etc., etc. 

Also  another  thing  I  think  you’ve  touched  on,  but  I  just  want  to 
make sure that we’re on the same page here. So as another concern 
I  have,  and  that  is  high-growth  areas.  We  have  one  part  of  my 
state  that’s  growing  very  very  rapidly.  It’s  the  northwest  corner  of 
the  state.  It’s  about  four,  five  counties  up  in  this  part  of  the  state 
that  are  really  among  if  not  the  fastest-growing  part  of  the  entire 
Nation. 

That’s  where  Wal–Mart,  Tyson  Foods,  University  of  Arkansas, 
J.B. Hunt and Trucking, among other companies, are located there; 
and  it  is  expected  to  double  in  population  over  the  next  20  years. 
I  mean,  this  is  a  very  rapidly  growing  area.  Ten  years  ago  they 
didn’t have a large airport at all. They’ve now built one. 

And  the  only  reason  why  I  mention  that  is  because  when  I  look 
at  you  all  having  to  make  funding  priorities,  and  certainly  you 
have  a  lot  of  challenges  in  making  determinations  on  where  to  do 
capital  improvements,  where  you  should  have  runways  and  all 
those  things,  what  makes  sense  today  may  not  make  sense  15 
years down the road. 

And  when  you  make  a  big  investment  in  infrastructure,  like  a 
runway  or  more  capacity  in  one  way  or  another,  I  just  hope  you’ll 
look  to  the  future  and  look  for  areas  like  what  we  have  in  the 
northwest  part  of  Arkansas;  and  I’m  sure  there  are  a  lot  of  other 
areas around the country that are experiencing that type of growth; 
and I just hope you’ll be sensitive to that growth. 

Another  thing  that  we  touched  on,  but  I  just  would  like  to  get 
your  thoughts  on—Ms.  Blakey,  maybe  you’re  the  best  one  to  men-
tion  this—is  trying  to  manage  the  congestion  at  these  larger  air-
ports.  Not  to  pick  on  O’Hare,  but  we’ll  talk  about  Chicago  O’Hare. 
Let’s  just  say  that  we’ve  got  a  regional  jet  coming  out  of  one  of 
our  airports  in  Arkansas  directly  to  O’Hare;  and  then  there  are 
larger  planes  coming  out  of  other  cities  that  are  connecting  into 
O’Hare;  and  there’s  only  so  much  capacity  there.  Might  we  get 
bumped  out  of  O’Hare  and  our  access  to  O’Hare  if  the  capacity 
there—or if the capacity there is strained too much? 

And  so  I  just  have  that  concern.  Do  you  have  any  thoughts  on 
that?  We  kind  of  get  squeezed  out  as  you’re  trying  to  manage  the 
slots in and out of, say, O’Hare. 

Ms. BLAKEY. Well, it was a legitimate concern of ours, I will tell 
you,  when  we  did  have  to  impose  administrative  caps  on  O’Hare. 
We  analyzed  pretty  carefully  what  the  major  carriers  were,  there-
fore,  planning  to  do  in  terms  of  either  flights  that  they  were  mov-
ing  to  the  less  congested  part  of  the  day;  there  was  a  good  bit  of 
that going on, but also those that were actually canceled on a per-
manent basis. 

We  actually  found  there  was  very  little  loss  of  service—actually 
none,  in  fact,  to  small  communities  in  terms  of  absolute  service. 
Now,  it  may  have  dropped  from  four  to  three  flights  a  day,  two  to 
one flight a day; but this was a handful of flights. We’re not talking 
significant  numbers  at  all.  This  was  almost  a  year  ago  now  when 
a  lot  of  this  took  place.  So  I  think  at  this  point  what  the  concern 
would be, I’m sure on your part, is when bad weather hits and can-

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  14:42 May 04, 2006 Jkt 027295 PO 00000 Frm 00056 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\27295.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

53

cellations hit, is there some view that it’s the larger cities that are 
being served. 

I think the Inspector General is taking a look at that and giving 
us  some  sense  of  what  happens—that  would  be  a  very  valuable 
thing. 

Let me return, if I might, to—because as I say, it really is a deci-

sion of the carriers. It’s a market-based decision. 

Senator PRYOR. Right. 
Ms.  BLAKEY.  Let  me  return  to  your  point  on  high-growth  areas 
because  you  are  hitting  on  an  important  point.  One  of  the  things 
we  are  doing  right  now  is  updating  a  study  we  did  a  couple  years 
ago.  We  carried  it  out  over  last  June;  but  we  will  quickly  update 
it, looking at 300 communities around the country in terms of what 
their airport needs will be, looking at 2020 and 2030 and trying to 
forecast  on  the  basis  of  the  kind  of  economic  and  demographic 
trends  you’re  talking  about,  where  we  really  are  going  to—where 
we are going to need more infrastructure because I think it’s vitally 
important that we anticipate that; and we plan for it. 

So  we  will  be  bringing  out  an  update  on  that,  and  we  will  cer-

tainly be looking at that section of Arkansas. 

Senator PRYOR. Great. 
Mr.  MEAD.  One  thing  that  would  be  good  to  look  at,  is  FAA’s 
planning profile for airports. I think it’s called the NPIAS for short. 
It’s  like  a  national  airport  planning  guide.  It  would  be  good  to  see 
what  the  State  of  Arkansas  has  submitted  in  terms  of  its  own  ex-
pectations for that area of Arkansas. 

FAA  waits  for  the  area  to  make  suggestions,  and  there  is  the 
document  I  mentioned.  I’ll  look  at  it  and  check  it  out  when  I  get 
back to the office this afternoon. 

Senator  PRYOR.  Great.  Thank  you.  Because  when  you  look  at, 
say,  the  Little  Rock  area,  it’s  growing  about  the  same  rate  as  the 
Nation  is  growing.  It’s  kind  of  a  steady,  solid  whatever.  But  that 
northwest part is really just booming. 

Let  me—speaking  of  that  northwest  part  of  the  state,  general 
aviation,  as  I  understand  the  microjet  or  the  very  light  jet  phe-
nomenon  that’s  coming,  first  question  I  had  on  that  is:  Are  these 
coming  on  the  market  just  because  of  market-based  dynamics?  Or 
has the Federal Government somehow now authorized these lighter 
jets  and  so  they’re  entering  the  U.S.  market  for  the  first  time?  I 
just don’t know the history of that. 

Ms.  BLAKEY.  It’s  a  market-based  phenomenon.  Some  entre-
preneurs  looked  around  and  decided  there  was  a  way  to  take  this 
technology that had been developed and really be able to put it into 
a  very  highly  cost-efficient  very  small  aircraft.  However,  the  FAA 
does have a significant role in certifying it. We must certify it from 
a  safety  standpoint  before  they  will  ever  market  it.  That’s  in  the 
process now. 

Senator PRYOR. That’s in the process now. So I guess another one 
of  these  things  that  you  have  to  consider  is  you  have  a  lot  of  con-
gestion  around  a  lot  of  airports  and  with  these  small  microjets,  or 
very  light  jets,  that’s  just  more  planes  in  the  air,  more  capacity 
that’s needed, and more congestion’s created. 

So  I  would  assume  that  smaller  airports  maybe  near  large  air-
ports,  but  smaller  airports  might  pick  up  a  lot  of  that  traffic  be-

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  14:42 May 04, 2006 Jkt 027295 PO 00000 Frm 00057 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\27295.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

54

cause  they  just  can’t  get  into  larger  airports  with  the  more  con-
gested airspace. And I assume, therefore, we need to look at the in-
frastructure requirements of these smaller airports and look at the 
general aviation needs of these smaller airports. 

Again,  it  may  be  very  different.  If  this  market  does  develop  like 
you have indicated, just what will that look like over the next dec-
ade or two decades. Any comments on that, I’d appreciate it. 

Ms.  BLAKEY.  Well,  I’ll  certainly  say  this,  the  intent,  I  think,  in 
a  lot  of  the  utilization  of  these  small  jets  is  to  be  able  to  go  into 
smaller  airports,  fly  point-to-point,  closer  to  where  people  want  to 
be.  After  all,  who  wants  to  be  in  the  downtown  congestion  of  Chi-
cago if there’s another airport closer to where you actually want to 
go, using the pavement that’s out there? 

We  really  don’t  have  a  pavement  problem  in  this  country.  We 
have  one  only  in  terms  of  these  large  congested  airports.  Other-
wise,  we  have  a  fair  amount  of  tarmac  to  use.  So  I  think  you  will 
see that going on; and it will be a very good thing from the stand-
point of congestion. 

In  terms  of  Federal  funding  for  airports,  you  will  see  if  you  look 
at the funding from the Airport Improvement Program, a very sig-
nificant amount of that funding does go to smaller airports. Larger 
airports  have  a  lot  more  flexibility  in  terms  of  bond  authority,  in 
terms of going to private sources; and they also use passenger facil-
ity  charges,  PFCs,  so  they  can  raise  money  through  that.  Smaller 
communities get a fair slice of the AIP funding. 

Mr.  ELSAWY.  If  I  may  add,  the  issue  of  access.  Senator  Nelson 
asked a question; and you did too, Senator Pryor. I think one of the 
really  pieces  of  good  news  here  is  with  the  Wide  Area  Augmenta-
tion System. You now have access and precision navigational capa-
bilities at close to 5,000 airports in the United States with the pro-
cedures that we talked about. 

Now,  the  requirement  for  infrastructure,  ground-based  infra-
structure  is  minimized  while  the  access  is  actually  increased  be-
cause  you  now  have  precision  navigation  capability  almost  a  cat-
egory  one  to  a  lot  of  these  airports.  So  in  terms  of  enabling  the 
small  communities  and  enabling  access  to  small  communities,  the 
area  navigation  procedures  the  Administrator  mentioned  earlier, 
the  Required  Navigational  Performance,  the  higher  capability  in 
the aircraft all will contribute toward actually increasing the access 
with precise navigation and the satellite-based system; but we have 
to put the procedures in place to make sure that actually material-
izes. 

Mr. MEAD. That’s an important point because one thing that may 
happen  with  these  smaller—these  very  light  jets  is—depending  on 
the  market  for  on-demand  air  taxi  service  looks  like  to  airports 
that  don’t  really  have  scheduled  service  now.  There  will  be  an  ex-
pectation that they have precision landing capabilities. 

Senator PRYOR. Thank you, Mr. Chairman. 
Senator BURNS. Thank you. I’ve got—oh, my light’s back on. 
I’ve  got  a  couple  of  questions,  and  I  think  everybody  else  has 

kind of covered them. A couple questions. 

Mr.  Dillingham,  in  your  report,  how  much  will  people  put  up 
with  delays  and  problems  in  an  airport  before  they  start  avoiding 
that  airport?  In  other  words,  when  I  go  into  New  York,  I’m  just 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  14:42 May 04, 2006 Jkt 027295 PO 00000 Frm 00058 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\27295.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

55

going  to  go  around  LaGuardia.  I’m  going  to  try  Newark  or  I’ll  try 
Kennedy or I’ll try something else. What’s our breaking point when 
we start saying, I’m not going to connect through Chicago anymore; 
and I want to go to Minneapolis or I’ll try to hub out of somewhere 
else; but I don’t want to go through Chicago? 

Dr. DILLINGHAM. Mr. Chairman, it’s pretty hard to predict where 
the  individual  tipping  points  are;  but  even  personally,  I  try  not  to 
go  through  Chicago  in  the  wintertime  because  you  never  know 
what will happen; but I think a part of it fits into the plan. 

That is, if people can, in fact, go to airports other than the major 
hub  airports,  that  might  help  with  the  situation.  So  it’s  an  indi-
vidual  decision,  and  I  don’t  know  if  you  can  sort  of  make  that  for 
anybody. 

Senator  BURNS.  Well,  in  other  words,  I  guess  we’ve  all  got  dif-

ferent levels of intolerance, I would assume. 

Dr. DILLINGHAM. Yes, sir. 
Senator BURNS. Mr. ElSawy, would you like to comment on that? 
Mr. ELSAWY. I agree with Dr. Dillingham. 
Senator  BURNS.  This  is  something  for  the  whole  panel.  Some 
technologies  are  under  consideration,  like  better  surveillance  for 
controllers  and  pilots.  They  will  require  users  to  equip  new  avi-
onics. I would imagine this is more geared toward the MITRE Cor-
poration here. This has been a roadblock in the past. 

What  incentives  could  FAA  rely  on  to  speed  up  the  introduction 
in these new systems? Is there anything we can do or the FAA can 
do to require airspace users to install and equip new avionics? 

Mr.  ELSAWY.  I  think  that,  as  the  Administrator  mentioned  ear-
lier, as we think about the aircraft as being an integral part of the 
system,  to  the  extent  that  the  aircraft  is  capable,  the  system  will 
operate  better;  and  the  examples  we  saw  with  the  area  navigation 
which was just one example with avionics in the aircraft are really 
helping us change the procedures, changing the ways to control the 
traffic. 

If we think about the traffic and the volume and complexity and 
growth and the way we manage traffic today, the controller’s actu-
ally voicing commands and vectors to the aircraft. Changes the fre-
quencies, changes the vectors, re-routes are all today voiced. 

If you think in the future, those routine types of communications 
can  be,  in  fact,  data-linked  to  the  aircraft.  Using  existing  avionics 
that they have on the aircraft today that they use for airline oper-
ational communications, we can, in fact, start the process of chang-
ing the procedures, reducing the requirements of voicing commands 
and  increasing  the  precision  and  the  predictability  of  the  commu-
nications, also contributing to a reduction in the operational errors 
and that is as a result of hear-back/read-back errors. 

So I think that as you go forward, the data-link technologies will 
be  critical  in  helping  us  improve;  and  I  think  the  incentive  will 
come  from  efficient  streaming  of  flows  in  and  out  of  major  areas. 
And  certainly  the  airlines  are  very  very  aware  of  the  benefits  of 
data link and for their operational control. 

Senator BURNS. Anyone else want to comment on that? 
Mr.  MEAD.  I  think  it’s  important  to  look  at  this  transition  that 
Chairman Stevens was referring to. How quickly it’s going to occur; 
how  quickly  you’re  going  to  come  to  a  vision  of  the  future  is  going 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  14:42 May 04, 2006 Jkt 027295 PO 00000 Frm 00059 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\27295.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

56

to  be  dependent  on  how  quickly  you  have  universal  equipage. 
FAA’s going to have to make some hard calls on some policy issues. 
Historically, FAA has tried to rely on voluntary equipage for long 
periods  of  time.  It  gets  to  be  very  controversial  when  you  start  to 
tell  the  carriers  or  general  aviation  that  they  must  purchase  and 
install certain avionics. So there’s some hard calls ahead. 

Ms.  BLAKEY.  I  do  think,  though,  that  the  carriers  respond  very 
well when we begin to say you can reduce the unit cost. So we can 
have  a  lot  more  capacity  for  less  money  per  aircraft  in  terms  of 
what it’s going to cost to move them through the system. 

The other thing that I would mention is that we do also have to 
remember  that  there’s  some  foundation  building  blocks  in  mod-
ernization  we’re  going  to  have  to  stick  with.  The  host,  if  you  will, 
for  the  entire  aviation  system  of  air  traffic  control  is  going  to  be 
based on a new program called ERAM. 

Now,  I’m  very  pleased  to  say  that  ERAM  is  on  schedule  and  on 
budget;  but  it  really  will  be  the  enabling  technology  for  all  this. 
And  we’re  going  through  a  major  modernization  of  our  terminals; 
and  again,  terminal  modernization  will  have  to  take  place  so  that 
some of these other further-out-there technologies will really be in-
corporated. 

Senator BURNS. Now, this leads me to my last question. The Sub-
committee is worried about the comments being made that the U.S. 
airspace  industry  is  losing  its  competitive  edge  and  that  other 
countries  are  moving  forward  technologies  that  we  have  aban-
doned,  like  controller/pilot  data  link.  Are  other  countries  ahead  of 
us? 

Ms. BLAKEY. No, I don’t think so. 
Senator BURNS. In comparison, I mean around the world. 
Ms. BLAKEY. I think what’s happening is this: we’re seeing major 
resolve  on  the  part  of  the  European  Union  in  terms  of  moving 
ahead  with  their  aviation  systems,  both  the  Galileo  satellite-based 
system  as  well  as  what  they  call  SESAME,  which  is  their  Single 
European  Sky  initiative,  with  a  major  commitment  to  air  traffic 
control technology. 

They’re  not  ahead  of  us  yet;  but  they  are  making  major  invest-
ments.  And  I  think  we  have  to  recognize  that  so  that  as  we  are 
looking  at  this  and  the  expressed  desire  on  their  part  to  assume 
the  leadership  position  in  aviation  technology,  which  the  United 
States has always held, it certainly is a challenge. 

Senator BURNS. What do we have to do to stay ahead and be the 

imagination of air traffic control? 

Ms. BLAKEY. Well, I think one of the things we have to do is stick 
with  the  plan  that  we  have  laid  out.  We  do  have  a  plan  for  the 
Next  Generation  System,  and  we  will  be  updating  that  and  bring-
ing that to this Committee before the year is out. 

I  think  you’re  going  to  see  some  very  exciting  progress  on  the 
very  things  that  the  Inspector  General’s  saying.  We  need  to  have 
near-term  deadlines.  We  need  to  know  what  the  investments  are, 
and we need to make real progress over the short range as well as 
the  longer  term.  We’re  very  committed  to  making  that  happen.  I 
think we can do it. 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  14:42 May 04, 2006 Jkt 027295 PO 00000 Frm 00060 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\27295.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

57

Mr. MEAD. I second that. Senator Stevens made a point about fi-
nancing. And he’s right to be concerned about it. The current situa-
tion the FAA is facing, as Mr. Dillingham said, is untenable. 

But  before  you  have  a  financing  plan,  people  have  the  right  to 
ask  how  much  money  do  you  need;  and  what  do  you  need  it  for; 
and  when  do  you  need  it?  So  I  totally  second  what  you  just  said. 

Senator BURNS. Mr. Dillingham, I saw your eyes light up. 
Dr.  DILLINGHAM.  We  have  just  started  a  major  study  to  answer 
just  the  question  that  you’ve  just  asked.  Where  are  we;  where  do 
we need to be; and what do we need in order to get there? 

Senator BURNS. I would imagine—policy has always been on this 
Committee no matter what field we talk about, we talk about com-
munications or whatever. We try to kind of stay technology-neutral. 
We  figure  the  marketplace  determines  what  technology  will  be 
used and what can be the platform that will launch us into the fu-
ture  and  that  we  can’t  make  that  decision  as  policymakers;  but  it 
has to be made by the folks who use these systems. 

And I’m wondering—I would hate to get into a position as policy-
makers to be dictating what we use because nine times out of ten, 
that  will  change.  Technology  changes  every—well,  more  often  now 
than  ever  before;  and  you  know,  we  don’t  change  all  that  quickly. 
I’ve  always  laughed  at  how  long  does  it  take  with  government, 
the  bureaucracy  to  change  a  lightbulb?  Nobody  really  knows  be-
cause  some  of  them  don’t  change  anything;  and  we’re  reluctant  to 
do  that;  and  I  don’t  want  to  get  locked  into  a  technology  or  a  sys-
tem  that  prevents  us  from  moving  to  the  next  generation  because 
it will change. 

How  much  redundancy  in  our  R&D  do  we  find  between  NASA 
and  FAA?  And  can  we  save  dollars  there  on  what  each  other’s 
doing? Have you ever taken a look at that? 

Ms.  BLAKEY.  I  think  it’s  a  very  important  question.  What  has 
happened is over time, in terms of R&D, more and more of the re-
search  for  the  air  traffic  control  system  has  shifted  from  the  FAA 
significantly  to  NASA.  I  might  say  MITRE  also  does  very  impor-
tant  work  for  us  in  that  area,  but  NASA  is  doing  some  critical 
work. 

The great thing that I must really compliment this Committee on 
is Vision 100 because when you all called for this plan for the Next 
Generation  System,  you  said  you  wanted  five  agencies  of  govern-
ment  to  pull  together:  NASA,  the  FAA,  the  Department  of  Trans-
portation, but also the Department of Defense and Homeland Secu-
rity,  they  spend  significant  research  dollars  as  well.  And  the  De-
partment  of  Commerce  is  also  included  because  they  have  the 
Weather  Service,  and  we’ve  been  talking  about  weather  all  morn-
ing. 

With  all  of  that  research,  we  are  working  very  hard  to  align 
those  research  plans  and  to  look  at  the  budgets  we’re  submitting 
to  OMB  and  then  to  the  Congress.  You’ll  see  a  lot  of  that  in  2007 
where  they  really  are  aligned  in  a  way  that  didn’t  happen  before; 
and  I  think  it  is  going  to  give  the  taxpayer  a  lot  more  benefit  for 
the dollars that are going into that. 

Senator BURNS. Do these agencies collaborate and communicate? 
Ms.  BLAKEY.  Absolutely.  And  they’re  doing  it  through  a  joint 
planning  and  development  office  that  was  part  of  the  Vision  100 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  14:42 May 04, 2006 Jkt 027295 PO 00000 Frm 00061 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\27295.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

58

approach.  So  it  is  an  office  that  the  FAA  and  NASA  are  signifi-
cantly  putting  resources  into  and  so  are  the  other  agencies.  We 
have  eight  different  teams,  and  each  of  these  agencies  is  leading 
at least one of them where they have the particular expertise. But 
the  key  is  to  look  at  the  research  dollars,  look  at  the  budgets  and 
say, are we spending it on the right things; and are we duplicating 
or are we complementing and pulling it together? 

Senator BURNS. Mr. ElSawy? 
Mr.  ELSAWY.  I’d  like  to  address  the  issue  of  leadership  because 

I think there’s a really good news story here. 

If you look at leadership, leadership comes with implementation. 
The United States was the first country in the world to have a con-
flict probe in the airspace most advanced in the world, and it’s im-
plemented  its  operating  inspection  system  today.  Time-based  mir-
roring  systems  are  implemented  in  the  system  today.  We  are  pro-
viding leadership, really, for the entire world in area-based naviga-
tion, based on what is happening today. 

The implementations in Alaska, ADS-B is absolutely essential to 
helping  the  rest  of  the  world  move  toward  ADS-B  concepts.  So  I 
think  we’ve  been  very  successful  with  implementing;  and  I  think 
that ought to be our strategy going forward, getting it done, leading 
the way. 

Senator BURNS. I would say we need competition in the research 
area  because  competition  usually  gives  us  a  lot  better  product  at 
the  end  of  the  day;  but  I  do  feel  every  now  and  again  that  redun-
dancy is somewhat—I don’t know how you judge it, to be quite hon-
est with you; but I would look at that to save some dollars because 
we’re going to have to do some more work. 

I  have  no  more  questions  for  this  panel,  and  I  appreciate  you 
coming  this  morning.  There  are  other  Senators  that  have  got  con-
flicts  this  morning  and  couldn’t  make  it.  They  will  probably  have 
some questions. If you could respond to their questions and submit 
your  responses  to  the  Committee  for  the  record,  we  would  appre-
ciate that. 

And  we  appreciate  your  testimony  this  morning  and  also  your 
work  that  you’re  doing  because  I  know  it’s  one  of  those—it’s  in 
progress  every  day.  And  I  appreciate  your  dedication  to  that  and 
to keep us flying. Keep us flying safely and hope we get from A to 
B. 

And have a nice Memorial Day weekend. Stand adjourned. 
[Whereupon, at 11:28 a.m., the hearing was adjourned.] 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  14:42 May 04, 2006 Jkt 027295 PO 00000 Frm 00062 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\27295.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

A P P E N D I X

RESPONSE TO WRITTEN QUESTIONS SUBMITTED BY HON. FRANK R. LAUTENBERG TO

HON. KENNETH M. MEAD 

Question.  We  know  rail  is  competitive  with  air  for  certain  markets,  and  we  need 
rail  as  part  of  a  balanced  transportation  system.  We  all  know  how  essential  the 
aviation  trust  fund  is  to  the  aviation  community.  Could  a  Federal  rail  trust  fund 
be used to provide for rail infrastructure? 

Answer.  In  theory,  a  rail  infrastructure  trust  fund  similar  to  the  aviation  trust 
fund could be used as a mechanism to fund some or all passenger rail capital needs, 
although  developing  such  a  vehicle  and  ensuring  equitable  distribution  of  funds 
would pose extremely difficult challenges. 

The Airport and Airway Trust Fund (aviation trust fund) was established in 1970 
to  help  fund  the  development  of  a  national  system  of  airports  and  airways,  and  to 
fund investment in air traffic control facilities. To fund these activities, the aviation 
trust fund relies on a number of taxes for revenue, including passenger ticket, fuel, 
and cargo taxes That are paid by airline passengers and airlines. 

If  a  similar  funding  scheme  were  contemplated  for  a  rail  trust  fund,  Amtrak  and 
commuter  rail  passengers  would  be  asked  to  pay  higher  ticket  prices—something 
which they may or may not be willing to do, especially at the level necessary to pro-
vide  sufficient  funding  for  infrastructure  reinvestment.  For  example,  according  to 
the  airlines,  it  has  been  difficult  for  them  to  pass  through  to  passengers  the  addi-
tional security fees imposed by the government after September 11. This reflects the 
competitive  ticket  environment  and  passengers’  unwillingness  to  pay.  The  airlines 
assert that the inability to raise fares to cover the new fees has forced them to lower 
base fares in order to keep absolute ticket prices constant. 

In the same vein, if an infrastructure ticket tax (similar in construct to the avia-
tion  security  fees)  were  applied  to  Amtrak’s  fares,  Amtrak  would  need  to  raise  its 
fares. If passengers were unwilling to pay the higher fares, ridership and total rev-
enue would decline, requiring an equivalent increase in Federal operating subsidies. 
If  Amtrak  were  to  respond  as  the  airlines  did—lowering  base  fares  to  keep  total 
ticket  prices  constant—the  same  effect  would  occur.  Amtrak’s  operating  revenues 
would  decline,  resulting  in  a  need  for  higher  Federal  subsidies.  The  fact  that  Am-
trak  operates  at  a  deficit  is  strong  evidence  that  this  scenario  would  result.  If  rail 
passengers  were  willing  to  pay  higher  fares,  Amtrak  would  have  raised  fares  al-
ready so as to reduce the deficit and its dependence on Federal subsidies. 

In  addition  to  funding,  issues  of  fairness  would  need  to  be  addressed.  Unlike  the 
aviation  industry  where  the  infrastructure  is  owned  by  public  entities,  much  of  the 
Nation’s  rail  infrastructure  is  owned  by  privately-owned  freight  railroads.  It  is  un-
likely that passenger rail operators would be willing to subsidize the upkeep of pri-
vately-owned infrastructure for which they already pay access fees, just as it is un-
likely  that  the  privately  owned  freight  railroads  would  be  willing  to  subsidize 
(through fuel and cargo taxes) the investment in stations and track required to sup-
port higher-speed passenger service for which they receive little or no benefits. 

The  ultimate  challenge  in  funding  the  significant  infrastructure  requirements  to 
support rail service is not the vehicle for funding, but the amount of funding. ‘‘Cre-
ating’’  a  trust  fund  is  not  the  same  as  ‘‘funding’’  a  trust  fund.  Funds  distributed 
from the trust fund to address infrastructure needs would have to come from some-
where—passengers, cargo taxes, and/or fuel taxes—and it is almost certain that any 
of  these  options  could  potentially  result  in  a  greater  need  for  increased  operating 
subsidies. 

RESPONSE TO WRITTEN QUESTIONS SUBMITTED BY HON. FRANK R. LAUTENBERG TO

GERALD L. DILLINGHAM, PH.D. 

Question.  We  know  rail  is  competitive  with  air  for  certain  markets  and  we  need 
rail  as  part  of  a  balanced  transportation  system.  We  all  know  how  essential  the 

(59)

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  14:42 May 04, 2006 Jkt 027295 PO 00000 Frm 00063 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\27295.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

60

aviation trust fund is to the aviation community. Could a Federal trust fund be used 
to provide for rail infrastructure? 

Answer. We have not conducted any studies to determine whether a Federal trust 
fund  is  a  viable  option  for  funding  rail  infrastructure.  However,  we  think  that  the 
costs and benefits of this option would need to be assessed to determine its viability. 
Past GAO reports and other research have indicated that for rail transport to pro-
vide  a  viable  alternative  to  air  service,  the  distance  between  markets  has  to  be  ei-
ther  short  enough,  generally  between  100–500  miles,  or  trains  must  travel  at  high 
enough  speeds  to  make  rail  travel  time  competitive  with  air  travel,  generally  with 
2 to 3 hours total travel time. 1 Both of these issues could potentially require signifi-
cant investment in rail infrastructure. 

As we have reported in prior reports, transportation programs and funding mech-
anisms are already largely stovepiped by transportation mode through mode-specific 
trust  funds,  and  this  situation  makes  it  difficult  for  intermodal  projects  and  other 
modal  projects  (e.g.,  freight  or  passenger  trail)  to  be  integrated  into  the  transpor-
tation system. This stovepiping can also prevent states and local governments from 
choosing  the  best  transportation  investment  to  solve  a  mobility  problem.  To  break 
down  these  stovepipes.  there  are  a  number  of  steps  the  Federal  Government  could 
take, short of creating a new trust fund, such as increasing the flexibility of current 
programs,  applying  different  Federal  matching  criteria  for  projects  that  reflect  fed-
eral priorities, establishing a performance-oriented funding or reward-based system, 
or expanding support for alternative financing mechanisms. 2 

Æ

1 See  GAO,  Intercity  Passenger  Rail:  Issues  or  Consideration  in  Developing  an  Intercity  Pas-
senger  Rail  Policy,  GAO–03–712T  (Washington,  D.C.:  April  30,  2003);  Economic  Research  Cen-
tre, Airports as Multimodal Interchange Nodes (Paris, France; 2005); Reconnecting America and 
Center for Neighborhood Technology, Missed Connections II (Chicago, Illinois: 2003); IATA, Air/
Rail  Intermodality  Study,  (United  Kingdom,  2003);  DOT,  Airport  Congestion  Impacts  Resulting 
from  Introduction  of  Improved  Service  in  Eleven  FR  Designated  High-Speed  Rail  Corridors 
(Cambridge, Massachusetts: March 2002). 

2 See  GAO,  Executive  Guide:  Leading  Practices  in  Capital  Decision-Making,  GAO/AIMD–99–
32  (Washington,  D.C.:  December  1998);  GAO,  Marine  Transportation:  Federal  Financing  and  a 
Framework  for  Infrastructure  Investments,  GAO–02–1033  (Washington,  D.C.:  Sept.  9,  2002); 
GAO,  Surface  Transportation:  Many  Factors  Affect  Investment  Decisions,  GA0–04–744  (Wash-
ington,  D.C.:  June  30,  2004);  GAO,  21st  Century  Challenges:  Reexamining  the  Base  of  the  Fed-
eral Government, GAO–05–325SP (Washington, D.C.: 2005).

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  14:42 May 04, 2006 Jkt 027295 PO 00000 Frm 00064 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6611 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\27295.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

